CHAPTER I.
An inner room I have,
Where thou shalt rest and some refreshment take,
And then we will more fully talk of this.
Orra
.
The
coast of England, though infinitely finer than our
own, is more remarkable for its verdure, and for a general
appearance of civilisation, than for its natural beauties.
The chalky cliffs may seem bold and noble to the
American
,
though compared to the granite piles that buttress the
Mediterranean they are but mole-hills; and the travelled
eye seeks beauties instead, in the retiring vales, the leafy
hedges, and the clustering towns that dot the teeming island.
Neither is Portsmouth a very favourable specimen of a
British port, considered solely in reference to the
picturesque
.
A town situated on a humble point, and fortified
after the manner of the Low Countries, with an excellent
haven, suggests more images of the useful than of the
pleasing; while a background of modest receding hills
offers little beyond the verdant swales of the country. In
this respect England itself has the fresh beauty of youth,
rather than the mellowed hues of a more advanced period
of life; or it might be better to say, it has the young
freshness
and retiring sweetness that distinguish her females, as
compared with the warmer tints of Spain and Italy, and
which, women and landscape alike, need the near view to
be appreciated.
Some such thoughts as these passed through the mind
of the traveller who stood on the deck of the packet
Montauk
,
resting an elbow on the quarter-deck rail, as he
contemplated
the view of the coast that stretched before him
east and west for leagues. The manner in which this
gentleman
,
whose temples were sprinkled with grey hairs,
regarded
the scene, denoted more of the thoughtfulness of
experience, and of tastes improved by observation, than it
is usual to meet amid the bustling and common-place
characters
that compose the majority in almost every situation
of life. The calmness of his exterior, an air removed
equally
from the admiration of the novice and the
superciliousness
of the tyro, had, indeed, so strongly distinguished him
from the moment he embarked in London to that in which
he was now seen in the position mentioned, that several of
the seamen swore he was a man-of-war's-man in disguise.
The fair-haired, lovely, blue-eyed girl at his side, too,
seemed a softened reflection of all his sentiment,
intelligence
,
knowledge, tastes, and cultivation, united to the
artlessness
and simplicity that became her sex and years.
We have seen nobler coasts, Eve, said the gentleman,
pressing the arm that leaned on his own; but, after all,
England will always be fair to American eyes.
More particularly so if those eyes first opened to the
light in the eighteenth century, father.
You, at least, my child, have been educated beyond the
reach of national foibles, whatever may have been my own
evil fortune; and still, I think even you have seen a great
deal to admire in this country, as well as in this coast.
Eve Effingham glanced a moment towards the eye of her
father, and perceiving that he spoke in playfulness, without
suffering a cloud to shadow a countenance that usually
varied with her emotions, she continued the discourse,
which had, in fact, only been resumed by the remark first
mentioned.
I have been educated, as it is termed, in so many
different
places and countries, returned Eve, smiling, that I
sometimes fancy I was born a woman, like my great
predecessor
and namesake, the mother of Abel. If a congress
of nations, in the way of masters, can make one
independent
of prejudice, I may claim to possess the advantage.
My greatest fear is, that in acquiring liberality, I have
acquired nothing else.
Mr. Effingham turned a look of parental fondness, in
which parental pride was clearly mingled, on the face of
his daughter, and said with his eyes, though his tongue did
not second the expression, This is a fear, sweet one, that
none besides thyself would feel.
A congress of nations, truly! muttered another male
voice near the father and daughter. You have been
taught music in general, by seven masters of as many
different
states, besides the touch of the guitar by a Spaniard;
Greek by a German; the living tongues by the European
powers, and philosophy by seeing the world; and now,
with a brain full of learning, fingers full of touches, eyes
full of tints, and a person full of grace, your father is
taking
you back to America, to `waste your sweetness on the
desert air.'
Poetically expressed, if not justly imagined, cousin
Jack, returned the laughing Eve; but you have forgot
to add, and a heart full of feeling for the land of my birth.
We shall see, in the end.
In the end, as in the beginning, now and for evermore.
All love is eternal in the commencement.
Do you make no allowance for the constancy of
woman
?
Think you that a girl of twenty can forget the
country
of her birth, the land of her forefathersor, as you
call it yourself when in a good humour, the land of liberty?
A pretty specimen
you
will have of its liberty!
returned
the cousin sarcastically. After having passed a
girlhood of wholesome restraint in the rational society of
Europe, you are about to return home to the slavery of
American female life, just as you are about to be married!
Married! Mr. Effingham?
I suppose the catastrophe will arrive, sooner or later,
and it is more likely to occur to a girl of twenty than to a
girl of ten.
Mr. John Effingham never lost an argument for the
want of a convenient fact, my love, the father observed
by way of bringing the brief discussion to a close. But
here are the boats approaching; let us withdraw a little,
and examine the chance medley of faces with which we are
to become familiar by the intercourse of a month.
You will be much more likely to agree on a verdict of
murder, muttered the kinsman.
Mr. Effingham led his daughter into the hurricane-house
or, as the packet-men quaintly term it, the
coach
-house,
where they stood watching the movements on the
quarter-deck
for the next half-hour; an interval of which we shall
take advantage to touch in a few of the stronger lights of
our picture, leaving the softer tints and the shadows to be
discovered by the manner in which the artist tells the
story.
Edward and John Effingham were brothers' children;
were born on the same day; had passionately loved the
same woman, who had preferred the first-named, and died
soon after Eve was born; had, notwithstanding this
collision
in feeling, remained sincere friends, and this the more
so, probably, from a mutual and natural sympathy in their
common loss; had lived much together at home, and
travelled
much together abroad, and were now about to return
in company to the land of their birth, after what might be
termed an absence of twelve years; though both had
visited
America for short periods in the intervals,John not
less than five times.
There was a strong family likeness between the cousins,
their persons and even features being almost identical;
though it was scarcely possible for two human beings to
leave more opposite impressions on mere casual spectators
when seen separately. Both were tall, of commanding
presence, and handsome; while one was winning in
apparance
,
and the other, if not positively forbidding, at least
distant and repulsive. The noble outline of face in Edward
Effingham had got to be cold severity in that of John; the
aquiline nose of the latter, seeming to possess an eagle-like
and hostile curvature,his compressed lip, sarcastic and
cold expression, and the fine classical chin, a feature in
which so many of the Saxon race fail, a haughty scorn that
caused strangers usually to avoid him. Eve drew with
great facility and truth, and she had an eye, as her cousin
had rightly said, full of tints. Often and often had she
sketched both of these loved faces, and never without
wondering
wherein that strong difference existed in nature
which she had never been able to impart to her drawings.
The truth is, that the subtle character of John Effingham's
face would have puzzled the skill of one who had made the
art his study for a life, and it utterly set the graceful but
scarcely profound knowledge of the beautiful young painter
at defiance. All the points of character that rendered her
father so amiable and so winning, and which were rather
felt than perceived, in his cousin were salient and bold, and
if it may be thus expressed, had become indurated by
mental
suffering and disappointment.
The cousins were both rich, though in ways as opposite
as their dispositions and habits of thought. Edward
Effingham
possessed a large hereditary property, that brought a
good income, and which attached him to this world of our
by kindly feelings towards its land and water; while John,
much the wealthier of the two, having inherited a large
commercial fortune, did not own ground enough to bury
him. As he sometimes deridingly said, he kept his gold
in corporations, that were as soulless as himself.
Still, John Effingham was a man of cultivated mind, of
extensive intercourse with the world, and of manners that
varied with the occasion; or perhaps it were better to say,
with his humours. In all these particulars but the latter
the cousins were alike; Edward Effingham's deportment
being as equal as his temper, though also distinguished for
a knowledge of society.
These gentlemen had embarked at London, on their
fiftieth birthday, in the packet of the 1st of October, bound
to New York; the lands and family residence of the
proprietor
lying in the state of that name, of which all of the
parties were natives. It is not usual for the cabin
passengers
of the London packets to embark in the docks; but
Mr. Effingham,as we shall call the father in general, to
distinguish him from the bachelor, John,as an old and
experienced traveller, had determined to make his daughter
familiar with the peculiar odours of the vessel in smooth
water, as a protection against sea-sickness; a malady,
however, from which she proved to be singularly exempt in
the end. They had, accordingly, been on board three days,
when the ship came to an anchor off Portsmouth, the point
where the remainder of the passengers were to join her on
that particular day when the scene of this tale commences.
At this precise moment, then, the Montauk was lying at
a single anchor, not less than a league from the land, in a
flat calm, with her three topsails loose, the courses in the
brails, and with all those signs of preparation about her that
are so bewildering to landsmen, but which seamen
comprehend
as clearly as words. The captain had no other
business
there than to take on board the wayfarers, and to
renew his supply of fresh meat and vegetables; things of
so familiar import on shore as to be seldom thought of until
missed, but which swell into importance during a passage
of a month's duration. Eve had employed her three days
of probation quite usefully, having, with the exception of
the two gentlemen, the officers of the vessel, and one other
person, been in quiet possession of all the ample, not to say
luxurious cabins. It is true, she had a female attendant;
but to her she had been accustomed from childhood, and
Nanny Sidley, as her quondam nurse and actual
lady's-maid
was termed, appeared so much a part of herself, that,
while her absence would be missed almost as greatly as that
of a limb, her presence was as much a matter of course as
a hand or foot. Nor will a passing word concerning this
excellent and faithful domestic be thrown away, in the
brief preliminary explanations we are making.
Ann Sidley was one of those excellent creatures who, it
is the custom with the European travellers to say, do not
exist at all in America, and who, while they are certainly
less numerous than could be wished, have no superiors in
the world, in their way. She had been born a servant,
lived a servant, and was quite content to die a servant,
and this, too, in one and the same family. We shall not
enter into a philosophical examination of the reasons that
had induced old Ann to feel certain she was in the precise
situation to render her more happy than any other that to
her was attainable; but feel it she did, as John Effingham
used to express it, from the crown of her head to the sole
of her foot. She had passed through infancy, childhood,
girlhood, up to womanhood,
pari passu
, with the mother of
Eve, having been the daughter of a gardener, who died in
the service of the family, and had heart enough to feel that
Vol. I.2
the mixed relations of civilised society, when properly
understood and appreciated, are more pregnant of happiness
than the vulgar scramble and heart-burnings, that, in the
mle
of a migrating and unsettled population, are so
injurious
to the grace and principles of American life. At the
death of Eve's mother, she had transferred her affections to
the child; and twenty years of assiduity and care had
brought her to feel as much tenderness for her lovely young
charge as if she had been her natural parent. But Nanny
Sidley was better fitted to care for the body than the mind
of Eve; and when, at the age of ten, the latter was placed
under the control of an accomplished governess, the good
woman had meekly and quietly sunk the duties of the nurse
in those of the maid.
One of the severest trialsor crosses, as she herself
termed itthat poor Nanny had ever experienced, was
endured when Eve began to speak in a language she could
not herself comprehend; for, in despite of the best
intentions
in the world, and twelve years of use, the good woman
could never make anything of the foreign tongues her young
charge was so rapidly acquiring. One day, when Eve had
been maintaining an animated and laughing discourse in
Italian with her instructress, Nanny, unable to command
herself, had actually caught the child to her bosom, and,
bursting into tears, implored her not to estrange herself
entirely from her poor old nurse. The caresses and
solicitations
of Eve soon brought the good woman to a sense of
her weakness; but the natural feeling was so strong, that
it required years of close observation to reconcile her to the
thousand excellent qualities of Mademoiselle Viefville, the
lady to whose superintendence the education of Miss
Effingham
had been finally confided.
This Mademoiselle Viefville was also among the
passengers
,
and was the one other person who now occupied the
cabins in common with Eve and her friends. She was the
daughter of a French officer who had fallen in Napoleon's
campaigns, had been educated at one of those admirable
establishments which form points of relief in the ruthless
history of the conqueror, and had now lived long enough
to have educated two young persons, the last of whom was
Eve Effingham. Twelve years of close communion with
her
lve
had created sufficient attachment to cause her to
yield to the solicitations of the father to accompany his
daughter to America, and to continue with her during the
first year of her probation, in a state of society that the
latter
felt must be altogether novel to a young woman
educated
as his own child had been.
So much has been written and said of French
governesses
,
that we shall not anticipate the subject, but leave this
lady to speak and act for herself in the course of the
narrative
.
Neither is it our intention to be very minute in
these introductory remarks concerning any of our
characters
;
but having thus traced their outlines, we shall return
again to the incidents as they occurred, trusting to make
the reader better acquainted with all the parties as we
proceed
.
CHAPTER II.
Lord Cram and Lord Vultur.
Sir Brandish O'Cultur,
With Marshal Carouzer,
And old Lady Mouser.
Bath Guide
.
The
assembling of the passengers of a packet-ship is at
all times a matter of interest to the parties concerned.
During the western passage in particular, which can never
safely be set down at less than a month, there is the
prospect
of being shut up or the whole of that period, within
the narrow compass of a ship, with those whom chance has
brought together, influenced by all the accidents and
caprices
of personal character, and a difference of nations,
conditions in life, and education. The quarter-deck, it is
true, forms a sort of local distinction, and the poor creatures
in the steerage seem the rejected of Providence for the time
being; but all who know life will readily comprehend that
the
ple-mle
of the cabins can seldom offer anything very
enticing to people of refinement and taste. Against this,
evil, however, there is one particular source of relief; most
persons feeling a disposition to yield to the circumstances in
which they are placed, with the laudable and convenient
desire
to render others comfortable, in order that they may be
made comfortable themselves.
A man of the world and a gentleman, Mr. Effingham had
looked forward to this passage with a good deal of concern,
on account of his daughter, while he shrank with the
sensitiveness
of his habits from the necessity of exposing one
of her delicacy and plastic simplicity to the intercourse of
a ship. Accompanied by Mademoiselle Viefville, watched
over by Nanny, and guarded by himself and his kinsman,
he had lost some of his apprehensions on the subject
during the three probationary days, and now took his stand
in the centre of his own party to observe the new arrivals,
with something of the security of a man who is entrenched
in his own door-way.
The place they occupied, at a window of the
hurricane-house
,
did not admit of a view of the water; but it was
sufficiently evident from the preparations in the gangway
next the land, that boats were so near as to render that
unnecessary.
Genus
, cockney;
species
, bagman, muttered John
Effingham, as the first arrival touched the deck. That
worthy has merely exchanged the basket of a coach for the
deck of a packet; we may now learn the price of buttons.
It did not require a naturalist to detect the species of the
stranger, in truth; though John Effingham had been a little
more minute in his description than was warranted by the
fact. The person in question was one of those mercantile
agents that England scatters so profusely over the world,
some of whom have all the most sterling qualities of their
nation, though a majority, perhaps, are a little disposed to
mistake the value of other people as well as their own.
This was the
genus
, as John Effingham had expressed it;
but the
species
will best appear on dissection. The master
of the ship saluted this person cordially, and as an old
acquaintance
,
by the name of Monday.
A
mousquetaire
resuscitated, said Mademoiselle Vief
ville, in her broken English, as one who had come in the
same boat as the first-named, thrust his whiskered and
mustachoed
visage above the rail of the gangway.
More probably a barber, who has converted his own
head into a wig-block, growled John Effingham.
It cannot, surely, be Wellington in disguise! added
Mr. Effingham, with a sarcasm of manner that was quite
unusual for him.
Or a peer of the realm in his robes! whispered Eve,
who was much amused with the elaborate toilet of the
subject
of their remarks, who descended the ladder supported
by a sailor, and, after speaking to the master, was formally
presented to his late boat-companion, as Sir George
Templemore
.
The two bustled together about the quarter-deck
for a few minutes, using eye-glasses, which led them into
several scrapes, by causing them to hit their legs against
sundry objects they might otherwise have avoided, though
both were much too high-bred to betray feelingsor fancied
they were, which answered the same purpose.
After these flourishes, the new comers descended to the
cabin in company, not without pausing to survey the party
in the hurricane-house, more especially Eve, who, to old
Ann's great scandal, was the subject of their manifest and
almost avowed admiration and observation.
One is rather glad to have such a relief against the
tediousness of a sea-passage, said Sir George as they
went down the ladder. No doubt you are used to this
sort of thing, Mr. Monday; but with me, it is voyage the
first,that is, if I except the Channel and the seas one
encounters
in making the usual run on the Continent.
Oh, dear me! I go and come as regularly as the
equinoxes
,
Sir George, which you know is quite, in rule, once
a year. I call my passages the equinoxes, too, for I
religiously
make it a practice to pass just twelve hours out of
the twenty-four in my berth.
This was the last the party on deck heard of the opinions
of the two worthies, for the time being; nor would they
have been favoured with all this, had not Mr. Monday what
he thought a rattling way with him, which caused him
usually
to speak in an octave above every one else. Although
their voices were nearly mute, or rather lost to those above,
they were heard knocking about in their state-rooms; and
2 *
Sir George, in particular, as frequently called out for the
steward, by the name of Saunders, as Mr. Monday made
similar appeals to the steward's assistant for succour, by the
appropriate appellation of Toast.
I think we may safely claim this person, at least, for a
countryman, said John Effingham: he is what I have
heard termed an American in a European mask.
The character is more ambitiously conceived than
skilfully
maintained, replied Eve, who had need of all her
retenue
of manner to abstain from laughing outright. Were
I to hazard a conjecture, it would be to describe the
gentleman
as a collector of costumes, who had taken a fancy to
exhibit an assortment of his riches on his own person.
Mademoiselle Viefville, you, who so well understand
costumes
,
may tell us from what countries the separate parts
of that attire have been collected?
I can answer for the shop in Berlin where the
travelling
cap was purchased, returned the amused governess;
in no other part of the world can a parallel be found.
I should think, ma'am, put in Nanny, with the quiet
simplicity of her nature as well as of her habits, that the
gentleman must have bought his boots in Paris, for they
seem to pinch his feet, and all the Paris boots and shoes
pinch one's feet,at least, all mine did.
The watch-guard is stamped `Geneva,'  continued
Eve.
The coat comes from Frankfort:
c'est une quivoque
.
And the pipe from Dresden, Mademoiselle Viefville.
The
conchiglia
savours of Rome, and the little chain
annexed bespeaks the Rialto; while the
moustaches
are
anything but
indignes
, and the
tout ensemble
the world:
the man is travelled, at least.
Eve's eyes sparkled with humour as she said this: while
the new passenger, who had been addressed as Mr. Dodge,
and as an old acquaintance also, by the captain, came so
near them as to admit of no further comments. A short
conversation between the two soon let the listeners into the
secret that the traveller had come from America in the
spring, whither, after having made the tour of Europe, he
was about to return in the autumn.
Seen enough, ha! added the captain, with a friendly
nod of the head, when the other had finished a brief
summary
of his proceedings in the eastern hemisphere. All
eyes, and no leisure or inclination for more?
I've seen as much as I
warant
to see, returned the
traveller
,
with an emphasis
on
, and a pronunciation
of
, the
word we have italicised, that cannot be committed to paper,
but which were eloquence itself on the subject of
self-satisfaction
and self-knowledge.
Well, that is the main point. When a man has got all
he wants of a thing, any addition is like over-ballast.
Whenever I can get fifteen knots out of the ship, I make it
a point to be satisfied, especially under close-reefed topsails
and on a taut bow-line.
The traveller and the master nodded their heads at each
other, like men who understood more than they expressed;
when the former, after inquiring with marked interest if his
room-mate, Sir George Templemore, had arrived, went
below
.
An intercourse of three days had established
something
like an acquaintance between the latter and the
passengers
she had brought from the River, and turning his
red quizzical face towards the ladies, he observed with
inimitable
gravity,
There is nothing like understanding when one has
enough, even if it be of knowledge. I never yet met with
the navigator who found two `noons' in the same day, that
he was not in danger of shipwreck. Now I dare say, Mr.
Dodge there, who has just gone below, has, as he says,
seen all he
warnts
to see, and it is quite likely he knows
more already than he can cleverly get along with.Let the
people be getting the booms on the yards, Mr. Leach; we
shall be
warnting
to spread our wings before the end of the
passage.
As Captain Truck, though he often swore, seldom
laughed
,
his mate gave the necessary order with a gravity equal
to that with which it had been delivered to him; and even
the sailors went aloft to execute it with greater alacrity for
an indulgence of humour that was peculiar to their trade,
and which, as few understood it so well, none enjoyed so
much as themselves. As the homeward-bound crew was
the same as the outward-bound, and Mr. Dodge had come
abroad quite as green as he was now going home ripe, this
traveller of six months' finish did not escape divers
commentaries
that literally cut him up from clew to ear-ring,
and which flew about in the rigging much as active birds
flutter from branch to branch in a tree. The subject of all
this wit, however, remained profoundly, not to say happily,
ignorant of the sensation he had produced, being occupied
in disposing of the Dresden pipe, the Venetian chain, and
the Roman
conchiglia
in his state-room, and in instituting
an acquaintance, as he expressed it, with his room-mate,
Sir George Templemore.
We must surely have something better than this,
observed
Mr. Effingham, for I observed that two of the
state-rooms
in the main cabin are taken singly.
In order that the general reader may understand this, it
may be well to explain that the packet-ships have usually
two berths in each state-room, but they who can afford to
pay an extra charge are permitted to occupy the little
apartment
singly. It is scarcely necessary to add, that persons
of gentlemanly feeling, when circumstances will at all
permit
,
prefer economising in other things in order to live by
themselves for the month usually consumed in the passage,
since in nothing is refinement more plainly exhibited than
in the reserve of personal habits.
There is no lack of vulgar fools stirring with full
pockets
,
rejoined John Effingham; the two rooms you
mention
may have been taken by some `yearling' travellers,
who are little better than the semi-annual
savant
who has
just passed us.
It is at least
something
, cousin Jack, to have the wishes
of a gentleman.
It
is something
, Eve, though it end in wishes, or even
in caricature.
What are the names? pleasantly asked Mademoiselle
Viefville; the
names
may be a clue to the characters.
The papers pinned to the bed-curtains bear the
antithetical
titles of Mr. Sharp and Mr. Blunt; though it is quite
probable the first is wanting of a letter or two by accident,
and the last is merely a synonyme of the old
nom de guerre
`Cash.'
Do persons, then, actually travel with borrowed names,
in our days? asked Eve, with a little of the curiosity of
the common mother whose name she bore.
That do they, and with borrowed money too, as well
as in other days. I dare say, however, these two
co-voyagers
of ours will come just as they are, in truth, Sharp
enough, and Blunt enough.
Are they Americans, think you?
They ought to be; both the qualities being thoroughly
indignes
, as Mademoiselle Viefville would say.
Nay, cousin John, I will bandy words with you no
longer; for the last twelve months you have done little else
than try to lessen the joyful anticipations with which I
return
to the home of my childhood.
Sweet one, I would not willingly lessen one of thy
young and generous pleasures by any of the alloy of my
own bitterness; but what wilt thou? A little preparation
for that which is as certain to follow as that the sun
succeeds
the dawn, will rather soften the disappointment thou
art doomed to feel.
Eve had only time to cast a look of affectionate gratitude
towards him,for whilst he spoke tauntingly, he spoke
with a feeling that her experience from childhood had taught
her to appreciate,ere the arrival of another boat drew
the common attention to the gangway. A call from the
officer in attendance had brought the captain to the rail;
and his order to pass in the luggage of Mr. Sharp and
Mr. Blunt, was heard by all near.
Now for
les indignes
, whispered Mademoiselle
Viefville
,
with the nervous excitement that is a little apt to
betray
a lively expectation in the gentler sex.
Eve smiled, for there are situations in which trifles help
to awaken interest, and the little that had just passed served
to excite curiosity in the whole party. Mr. Effingham
thought it a favourable symptom that the master, who had
had interviews with all his passengers in London, walked
to the gangway to receive the new-comers; for a boat-load
of the quarter-deck
oi polloi
had come on board a moment
before without any other notice on his part than a general
bow, with the usual order to receive their effects.
The delay denotes Englishmen, the caustic John had
time to throw in, before the silent arrangement at the
gangway
was interrupted by the appearance of the passengers.
The quiet smile of Mademoiselle Viefville, as the two
travellers appeared on deck, denoted approbation, for her
practised eye detected at a glance, that both were certainly
gentlemen. Women are more purely creatures of
convention
in their way than men, their education inculcating
nicer distinctions and discriminations than that of the other
sex; and Eve, who would have studied Sir George
Templemore
and Mr. Dodge as she would have studied the
animals
of a caravan, or as creatures with whom she had no
affinities, after casting a sly look of curiosity at the two
who now appeared on deck, unconsciously averted her eyes
like a well-bred young person in a drawing-room.
They are indeed English, quietly remarked Mr.
Effingham
;
but, out of question, English gentlemen.
The one nearest appears to me to be Continental,
answered
Mademoiselle Viefville, who had not felt the same
impulse to avert her look as Eve; he is
jamais Anglais!
Eve stole a glance in spite of herself, and, with the
intuitive
penetration of a woman, intimated that she had come
to the same conclusion. The two strangers were both tall,
and decidedly gentleman-like young men, whose personal
appearance would cause either to be remarked. The one
whom the captain addressed as Mr. Sharp had the most
youthful look, his complexion being florid, and his hair
light; though the other was altogether superior in outline
of features as well as in expression; indeed, Mademoiselle
Viefville fancied she never saw a sweeter smile than that
he gave on returning the salute of the deck; there was
more than the common expression of suavity and of the
usual play of features in it, for it struck her as being
thoughtful and as almost melancholy. His companion was
gracious in his manner, and perfectly well toned; but his
demeanour had less of the soul of the man about it, partaking
more of the training of the social caste to which it belonged.
These may seem to be nice distinctions for the
circumstances
;
but Mademoiselle Viefville had passed her life in
good company, and under responsibilities that had rendered
observation and judgment highly necessary, and
particularly
observations of the other sex.
Each of the strangers had a servant; and while their
luggage was passed up from the boat, they walked aft
nearer to the hurricane-house, accompanied by the captain.
Every American, who is not very familiar with the world,
appears to possess the mania of introducing. Captain
Truck was no exception to the rule; for, while he was
perfectly acquainted with a ship, and knew the etiquette of
the quarter-deck to a hair, he got into blue water the
moment
he approached the finesse of depertment. He was
exactly of that school of
lgants
who fancy drinking a
glass of wine with another, and introducing, are touches of
breeding; it being altogether beyond his comprehension
that both have especial uses, and are only to be resorted to
on especial occasions. Still, the worthy master, who had
begun life on the forecastle, without any previous
knowledge
of usages, and who had imbibed the notion that
manners make the man, taken in the narrow sense of
the axiom, was a devotee of what he fancied to be good
breeding, and one of his especial duties, as he imagined, in
order to put his passengers at their ease, was to introduce
them to each other; a proceeding which, it is hardly
necessary
to say, had just a contrary effect with the better
class of them.
You are acquainted, gentlemen? he said, as the three
approached the party in the hurricane-house.
The two travellers endeavoured to look interested, while
Mr. Sharp carelessly observed that they had met for the
first time in the boat. This was delightful intelligence to
Captain Truck, who did not lose a moment in turning it to
account. Stopping short, he faced his companions, and,
with a solemn wave of the hand, he went through the
ceremonial
in which he most delighted, and in which he piqued
himself at being an adept.
Mr. Sharp, permit me to introduce you to Mr. Blunt;
Mr. Blunt, let me make you acquainted with Mr. Sharp.
The gentlemen, though taken a little by surprise at the
dignity and formality of the captain, touched their hats
civilly to each other, and smiled. Eve, not a little amused
at the scene, watched the whole procedure; and then she
too detected the sweet melancholy of the one expression,
and the marble-like irony of the other. It may have been
this that caused her to start, though almost imperceptibly,
and to colour.
Our turn will come next, muttered John Effingham:
get the grimaces ready.
His conjecture was right; for, hearing his voice without
understanding the words, the captain followed up his
advantage
to his own infinite gratification.
Gentlemen,Mr. Effingham, Mr. John Effingham
(every one soon came to make this distinction in addressing
the cousins)  Miss Effingham, Mademoiselle Viefville:
Mr. Sharp, Mr. Blunt, ladies;gentlemen, Mr. Blunt,
Mr. Sharp.
The dignified bow of Mr. Effingham, as well as the faint
and distant smile of Eve, would have repelled any undue
familiarity in men of less tone than either of the strangers,
both of whom received the unexpected honour like those
who felt themselves to be intruders. As Mr. Sharp raised
his hat to Eve, however, he held it suspended a moment
above his head, and then dropping his arm to its full length,
he bowed with profound respect, though distantly. Mr.
Blunt was less elaborate in his salute, but as pointed as the
circumstances at all required. Both gentlemen were a little
struck with the distant hauteur of John Effingham, whose
bow, while it fulfilled all the outward forms, was what Eve
used laughingly to term imperial. The bustle of
preparation
,
and the certainty that there would be no want
of opportunities to renew the intercourse, prevented more
than the general salutations, and the new-comers descended
to their state-rooms.
Did you remark the manner in which those people took
my introduction? asked Captain Truck of his chief mate,
whom he was training up in the ways of packet-politeness,
as one in the road of preferment. Now, to my notion,
they might have shook hands at least. That's what I call
Vattel
.
One sometimes falls in with what are
rum
chaps,
returned
the other, who, from following the London trade, had
caught a few cockneyisms. If a man chooses to keep his
hands in the beckets, why let him, say I; but I take it as
a slight to the company to sheer out of the usual track in
such matters.
I was thinking as much myself; but after all, what can
packet-masters do in such a case? We can set luncheon
and dinner before the passengers, but we can't make them
eat. Now, my rule is, when a gentleman introduces me, to
do the thing handsomely, and to return shake for shake, if it
is three times three; but as for a touch of the beaver, it is like
setting a top-gallant sail in passing a ship at sea, and means
just nothing at all. Who would know a vessel because he
has let run his halyards and swayed the yard up again?
One would do as much to a Turk for manners' sake. No,
no! there is something in this, and, d me, just to make
sure of it, the first good opportunity that offers, I'll  ay,
I'll just introduce them all over again!Let the people ship
their handspikes, Mr. Leach, and heave in the slack of the
chain.Ay, ay! I'll take an opportunity when all hands
are on deck, and introduce them, ship-shape, one by one, as
your greenhorns go through a lubber's-hole, or we shall
have no friendship during the passage.
The mate nodded approbation, as if the other had hit
upon the right expedient, and then he proceeded to obey the
orders, while the cares of his vessel soon drove the subject
temporarily from the mind of his commander.
CHAPTER III.
By all description, this should be the place.
Who's here?Speak, ho!No answer!What is this?
Timon of Athens
.
A SHIP with her sails loosened and her ensign abroad is
always a beautiful object; and the Montauk, a noble
New-York-built
vessel of seven hundred tons burthen, was a
first-class specimen of the kettle-bottom school of naval
architecture, wanting in nothing that the taste and
experience
of the day can supply. The scene that was now
acting before their eyes therefore soon diverted the thoughts
of Mademoiselle Viefville and Eve from the introductions
Vol. I.  3
of the captain, both watching with intense interest the
various
movements of the crew and passengers as they passed
in review.
A crowd of well-dressed, but of an evidently humbler
class of persons than those farther aft, were thronging the
gangways, little dreaming of the physical suffering they
were to endure before they reached the land of promise,
that distant America, towards which the poor and oppressed
of nearly all nations turn longing eyes in quest of a
shelter
.
Eve saw with wonder aged men and women among
them; beings who were about to sever most of the ties of
the world in order to obtain relief from the physical pains
and privations that had borne hard on them for more than
threescore years. A few had made sacrifices of themselves
in obedience to that mysterious instinct which man feels in
his offspring; while others, again, went rejoicing, flushed
with the hope of their vigour and youth. Some, the
victims
of their vices, had embarked in the idle expectation
that a change of scene, with increased means of indulgence,
could produce a healthful change of character. All had
views that the truth would have dimmed, and, perhaps, no
single adventurer among the emigrants collected in that ship
entertained either sound or reasonable notions of the mode
in which his step was to be rewarded, though many may
meet with a success that will surpass their brightest picture
of the future. More, no doubt, were to be disappointed.
Reflections something like these passed through the mind
of Eve Effingham, as she examined the mixed crowd, in
which some were busy in receiving stores from boats; others
in holding party conferences with friends, in which a few
were weeping; here and there a group was drowning
reflection
in the parting cup; while wondering children
looked
up with anxiety into the well-known faces, as if fearful
they might lose the countenances they loved, and the
charities
on which they habitually relied, in such a
mle
.
Although the stern discipline which separates the cabin
and steerage passengers into castes as distinct as those of
the Hindoos had not yet been established, Captain Truck
had too profound a sense of his duty to permit the
quarter-deck
to be unceremoniously invaded. This part of the
ship, then, had partially escaped the confusion of the
moment
;
though trunks, boxes, hampers, and other similar
appliances of travelling, were scattered about in tolerable
affluence. Profiting by the space, of which there was still
sufficient for the purpose, most of the party left the
hurricane-house
to enjoy the short walk that a ship affords. At
that instant, another boat from the land reached the vessel's
side, and a grave-looking personage, who was not disposed
to lessen his dignity by levity or an omission of forms,
appeared
on deck, where he demanded to be shown the
master
.
An introduction was unnecessary in this instance; for
Captain Truck no sooner saw his visiter than he recognized
the well-known features and solemn pomposity of a civil
officer of Portsmouth, who was often employed to search
the American packets, in pursuit of delinquents of all
degrees
of crime and folly.
I had just come to the opinion I was not to have the
pleasure of seeing you this passage, Mr. Grab, said the
captain, shaking hands familiarly with the myrmidon of the
law; but the turn of the tide is not more regular than
you gentlemen who come in the name of the king.Mr.
Grab, Mr. Dodge; Mr. Dodge, Mr. Grab. And now, to
what forgery, or bigamy, or elopement, or
scandalum
magnatum
,
do I owe the honour of your company this time?
Sir George Templemore, Mr. Grab; Mr. Grab, Sir George
Templemore.
Sir George bowed with the dignified aversion an honest
man might be supposed to feel for one of the other's
employment
;
while Mr. Grab looked gravely and with a
counter
dignity at Sir George. The business of the officer,
however, was with none in the cabin; but he had come in
quest of a young woman who had married a suitor rejected
by her uncle,an arrangement that was likely to subject
the latter to a settlement of accounts which he found
inconvenient
,
and which he had thought it prudent to anticipate
by bringing an action of debt against the bridegroom for
advances, real or pretended, made to the wife during her
nonage. A dozen eager ears caught an outline of this tale
as it was communicated to the captain, and in an incredibly
short space of time it was known throughout the ship, with
not a few embellishments.
I do not know the person of the husband, continued
the officer, nor indeed does the attorney who is with me
in the boat; but his name is Robert Davis, and you can
have no difficulty in pointing him out. We know him to
be in the ship.
I never introduce any steerage passengers, my dear
sir; and there is no such person in the cabin, I give you
my honour,and that is a pledge that must pass between
gentlemen like us. You are welcome to search, but the
duty of the vessel must go on. Take your manbut do
not detain the ship.Mr. Sharp, Mr. Grab; Mr. Grab, Mr.
Sharp.Bear a hand there, Mr. Leach, and let us have the
slack of the chain as soon as possible.
There appeared to be what the philosophers call the
attraction of repulsion between the parties last introduced,
for the tall gentlemanly-looking Mr. Sharp eyed the officer
with a supercilious coldness, neither party deeming much
ceremony on the occasion necessary. Mr. Grab now
summoned
his assistant, the attorney, from the boat, and there
was a consultation between them as to their further
proceedings
.
Fifty heads were grouped around them, and
curious eyes watched their smallest movements, one of the
crowd occasionally disappearing to report proceedings.
Man is certainly a clannish animal; for without knowing
any thing of the merits of the case, without pausing to
inquire into the right or the wrong of the matter, in the
pure spirit of partisanship, every man, woman, and child
of the steerage, which contained fully a hundred souls, took
sides against the law, and enlisted in the cause of the
defendant
.
All this was done quietly, however, for no one
menaced or dreamed of violence, crew and passengers
usually taking their cues from the officers of the vessel on
such occasions, and those of the Montauk understood too
well the rights of the public agents to commit themselves in
the matter.
Call Robert Davis, said the officer, resorting to a
ruse
,
by affecting an authority he had no right to assume.
Robert
Davis! echoed twenty voices, among which was that
of the bridegroom himself, who was nigh to discover his
secret by an excess of zeal. It was easy to call, but no
one answered.
Can you tell me which is Robert Davis, my little
fellow
?
the officer asked coaxingly, of a fine flaxen-headed
boy, whose age did not exceed ten, and who was a curious
spectator of what passed. Tell me which is Robert
Davis
,
and I will give you a sixpence.
The child knew, but professed ignorance.
C'est un esprit de corps admirable!
exclaimed
Mademoiselle
Viefville; for the interest of the scene had brought
nearly all on board, with the exception of those employed
in the duty of the vessel, near the gangway.
Ceci est
dlicieux
, and I could devour that boy!
What rendered this more odd, or indeed absolutely
ludicrous
,
was the circumstance that, by a species of
legerdemain
,
a whisper had passed among the spectators so
stealthily
,
and yet so soon, that the attorney and his companion
were the only two on deck who remained ignorant of the
person of the man they sought. Even the children caught
the clue, though they had the art to indulge their natural
curiosity by glances so sly as to escape detection.
Unfortunately, the attorney had sufficient knowledge
of the family of the bride to recognize her by a general
resemblance, rendered conspicuous as it was by a pallid face
and an almost ungovernable nervous excitement. He
pointed her out to the officer, who ordered her to approach
him,a command that caused her to burst into tears. The
agitation and distress of his wife were near proving too
much for the prudence of the young husband, who was
making an impetuous movement towards her, when the
strong grasp of a fellow-passenger checked him in time to
prevent discovery. It is singular how much is understood
by
trisles
when the mind has a clue to the subject, and how
often signs, that are palpable as day, are overlooked when
suspicion is not awakened, or when the thoughts have
obtained
a false direction. The attorney and the officer
were the only two present who had not seen the
indiscretion
of the young man, and who did not believe him
betrayed. His wife trembled to a degree that almost
destroyed
the ability to stand; but, casting an imploring look
for self-command on her indiscreet partner, she controlled
her own distress, and advanced towards the officer, in
obedience
to his order, with a power of endurance that the
3 *
strong affections of a woman could alone enable her to
assume.
If the husband will not deliver himself up, I shall be
compelled to order the wife to be carried ashore in his
stead! the attorney coldly remarked, while he applied a
pinch of snuff to a nose that was already saffron-coloured
from the constant use of the weed.
A pause succeeded this ominous declaration, and the
crowd of passengers betrayed dismay, for all believed there
was now no hope for the pursued. The wife bowed her
head to her knees, for she had sunk on a box as if to hide
the sight of her husband's arrest. At this moment a voice
spoke from among the group on the quarter-deck.
Is this an arrest for crime, or a demand for debt?
asked the young man who has been announced as Mr.
Blunt.
There was a quiet authority in the speaker's manner that
reassured the failing hopes of the passengers, while it caused
the attorney and his companion to look round in surprise,
and perhaps a little in resentment. A dozen eager voices
assured the gentleman' there was no crime in the matter
at allthere was even no just debt, but it was a villanous
scheme to compel a wronged ward to release a fraudulent
guardian from his liabilities. Though all this was not very
clearly explained, it was affirmed with so much zeal and
energy as to awaken suspicion, and to increase the interest
of the more intelligent portion of the spectators. The
attorney surveyed the travelling dress, the appearance of
fashion, and the youth of his interrogator, whose years
could not exceed five-and-twenty, and his answer was given
with an air of superiority.
Debt or crime, it can matter nothing in the eye of the
law.
It matters much in the view of an honest man,
returned
the youth with spirit. One might hesitate about
interfering in behalf of a rogue, however ready to exert
himself in favour of one who is innocent, perhaps, of every
thing but misfortune.
This looks a little like an attempt at a rescue! I hope
we are still in England, and under the protection of English
laws?
No doubt at all of that, Mr. Seal, put in the captain,
who having kept an eye on the officer from a distance, now
thought it time to interfere, in order to protect the interests
of his owners. Yonder is England, and that is the Isle
of Wight, and the Montauk has hold of an English Bottom,
and good anchorage it is; no one means to dispute your
authority, Mr. Attorney, nor to call in question that of the
king. Mr. Blunt merely throws out a suggestion, sir; or
rather, a distinction between rogues and honest men;
nothing more, depend on it, sir.Mr. Seal, Mr. Blunt; Mr.
Blunt, Mr. Seal. And a thousand pities it is, that the
distinction
is not more commonly made.
The young man bowed slightly, and with a face flushed,
partly with feeling, and partly at finding himself
unexpectedly
conspicuous among so many strangers, he advanced a
little from the quarter-deck group, like one who feels he is
required to maintain the ground he has assumed.
No one can be disposed to question the supremacy of
the English laws in this roadstead, he said, and least of
all myself; but you will permit me to doubt the legality of
arresting, or in any manner detaining, a wife in virtue of a
process issued against the husband.
A briefless barrister! muttered Seal to Grab. I dare
say a timely guinea would have silenced the fellow. What
is now to be done?
The lady must go ashore, and all these matters can be
arranged before a magistrate.
Ay, ay! let her sue out a
habeas corpus
if she please,
added the ready attorney, whom a second survey caused to
distrust his first inference. Justice is blind in England
as well as in other countries, and is liable to mistakes; but
still she is just. If she does mistake sometimes, she is
always ready to repair the wrong.
Cannot
you
do something here? Eve involuntarily
half-whispered to Mr. Sharp, who stood at her elbow.
This person started on hearing her voice making this
sudden appeal, and glancing a look of intelligence at her,
he smiled and moved nearer to the principal parties.
Really, Mr. Attorney, he commenced, this appears
to be rather irregular, I must confess,quite out of the
ordinary way, and it may lead to unpleasant consequences.
In what manner, sir? interrupted Seal, measuring the
other's ignorance at a glance.
Why, irregular in form, if not in principle. I am
aware that the
habeas corpus
is all-essential, and that the
law must have its way; but really this does seem a little
irregular, not to describe it by any harsher term.
Mr. Seal treated this new appeal respectfully, in
appearance
at least, for he saw it was made by one greatly his
superior, while he felt an utter contempt for it in essentials,
as he perceived intuitively that this new intercession was
made in a profound ignorance of the subject. As respects
Mr. Blunt, however, he had an unpleasant distrust of the
result, the quiet manner of that gentleman denoting more
confidence in himself, and a greater practical knowledge of
the laws. Still, to try the extent of the other's information,
and the strength of his nerves, he rejoined in a magisterial
and menacing tone
Yes, let the lady sue out a writ of
habeas corpus
if
wrongfully arrested; and I should be glad to discover the
foreigner who will dare to attempt a rescue in old England,
and in defiance of English laws.
It is probable Paul Blunt would have relinquished his
interference
,
from an apprehension that he might be
ignorantly
aiding the evil-doer, but for this threat; and even the
threat might not have overcome his prudence, had not he
caught the imploring look of the fine blue eyes of Eve.
All are not necessarily foreigners who embark on
board an American ship at an English port, he said
steadily, nor is justice denied those that are. The
habeas
corpus
is as well understood in other countries as in this,
for happily we live in an age when neither liberty nor
knowledge is exclusive. If an attorney, you must know
yourself that you cannot legally arrest a wife for a
husband
,
and that what you say of the
habeas corpus
is little
worthy of attention.
We arrest, and whoever interferes with an officer in
charge of a prisoner is guilty of a rescue. Mistakes must
be rectified by the magistrates.
True, provided the officer has warranty for what he
does.
Writs and warrants may contain errors, but an arrest
is an arrest, growled Grab.
Not the arrest of a woman for a man. In such a case
there is design, and not a mistake. If this frightened wife
will take counsel from me, she will refuse to accompany
you.
At her peril, let her dare do so!
At
your
peril do you dare to attempt forcing her from
the ship!
Gentlemen, gentlemen!let there be no
misunderstanding
,
I pray you, interposed the captain. Mr.
Blunt, Mr. Grab; Mr. Grab, Mr. Blunt. No warm words,
gentlemen, I beg of you. But the tide is beginning to
serve, Mr. Attorney, and `time and tide,' you know If
we stay here much longer, the Montauk may be forced to
sail on the 2d, instead of the 1st, as has been advertised in
both hemispheres. I should be sorry to carry you to sea,
gentlemen, without your small stores; and as for the cabin,
it is as full as a lawyer's conscience. No remedy but the
steerage in such a case.Lay forward, men, and heave
away. Some of you, man the fore-top-sail halyards.We
are as regular as our chronometers; the 1st, 10th, and
20th, without fail.
There was some truth, blended with a little poetry, in
Captain Truck's account of the matter. The tide had
indeed
made in his favour, but the little wind there was blew
directly into the roadstead, and had not his feelings become
warmed by the distress of a pretty and interesting young
woman, it is more than probable the line would have
incurred
the disgrace of having a ship sail on a later day
than had been advertised. As it was, however, he had
the matter up in earnest, and he privately assured Sir
George and Mr. Dodge, if the affair were not immediately
disposed of, he should carry both the attorney and officer
to sea with him, and that he did not feel himself bound to
furnish either with water. They may catch a little rain,
by wringing their jackets, he added, with a wink; though
October is a dryish month in the American seas.
The decision of Paul Blunt would have induced the
attorney
and his companion to relinquish their pursuit but
for two circumstances. They had both undertaken the
job as a speculation, or on the principle of no play, no
pay, and all their trouble would be lost without success.
Then the very difficulty that occurred had been foreseen,
and while the officer proceeded to the ship, the uncle had
been busily searching for a son on shore, to send off to
identify the husband,a step that would have been earlier
resorted to could the young man have been found. This
son was a rejected suitor, and he was now seen, by the aid
of a glass that Mr. Grab always carried, pulling towards
the Montauk, in a two-oared boat, with as much zeal as
malignancy and disappointment could impart. His
distance
from the ship was still considerable; but a peculiar
hat, with the aid of the glass, left no doubt of his identity.
The attorney pointed out the boat to the officer, and the
latter, after a look through the glass, gave a nod of
approbation
.
Exultation overcame the usual wariness of the
attorney
,
for his pride, too, had got to be enlisted in the
success
of his speculation,men being so strangely constituted
as often to feel as much joy in the accomplishment of
schemes that are unjustifiable, as in the accomplishment of
those of which they may have reason to be proud.
On the other hand, the passengers and people of the
packet seized something near the truth, with that sort of
instinctive readiness which seems to characterize bodies of
men in moments of excitement. That the solitary boat
which was pulling towards them in the dusk of the evening
contained some one who might aid the attorney and his
myrmidon, all believed, though in what manner none could
tell.
Between all seamen and the ministers of the law there is
a long-standing antipathy, for the visits of the latter are
usually
so timed as to leave nothing between the alternatives
of paying or of losing a voyage. It was soon apparent,
then, that Mr. Seal had little to expect from the apathy of
the crew, for never did men work with better will to get a
ship loosened from the bottom.
All this feeling manifested itself in a silent and intelligent
activity rather than in noise or bustle, for every man on
board exercised his best faculties, as well as his best good
will and strength; the clock-work ticks of the palls of the
windlass resembling those of a watch that had got the start
of time, while the chain came in with surges of half a
fathom at each heave.
Lay hold of this rope, men, cried Mr. Leach, placing
the end of the main-topsail halyards in the hands of
half-a-dozen
athletic steerage passengers, who had all the
inclination
in the world to be doing, though uncertain where to
lay their hands; lay hold, and run away with it.
The second mate performed the same feat forward, and
as the sheets had never been started, the broad folds of the
Montauk's canvas began to open, even while the men were
heaving at the anchor. These exertions quickened the
blood in the veins of those who were not employed, until
even the quarter-deck passengers began to experience the
excitement of a chase, in addition to the feelings of
compassion
.
Captain Truck was silent, but very active in
preparations. Springing to the wheel, he made its spokes
fly until he had forced the helm hard up, when he
unceremoniously
gave it to John Effingham to keep there. His
next leap was to the foot of the mizen-mast, where, after a
few energetic efforts alone, he looked over his shoulder and
beckoned for aid.
Sir George Templemore, mizen-topsail-halyards;
mizen-topsail-halyards
,
Sir George Templemore, muttered
the eager master, scarce knowing what he said. Mr.
Dodge, now is the time to show that your name and nature
are not identical.
In short, nearly all on board were busy, and, thanks to
the hearty good will of the officers, stewards, cooks, and a
few of the hands that could be spared from the windlass,
busy in a way to spread sail after sail with a rapidity little
short of that seen on board of a vessel of war. The
rattling
of the clew-garnet blocks, as twenty lusty fellows ran
forward with the tack of the mainsail, and the hauling
forward
of braces, was the signal that the ship was clear of
the ground, and coming under command.
A cross current had superseded the necessity of casting
the vessel, but her sails took the light air nearly abeam;
the captain understanding that motion was of much more
importance just then than direction. No sooner did he
perceive by the bubbles that floated past, or rather appeared
to float past, that his ship was dividing the water forward,
than he called a trusty man to the wheel, relieving John
Effingham from his watch. The next instant, Mr. Leach
reported the anchor catted and fished.
Pilot, you will be responsible for this if my prisoners
escape, said Mr. Grab menacingly. You know my
errand
,
and it is your duty to aid the ministers of the law.
Harkee, Mr. Grab, put in the master, who had warmed
himself with the exercise; we all know, and we all do our
duties, on board the Montauk. It is your duty to take
Robert Davis on shore if you can find him; and it is my
duty to take the Montauk to America: now, if you will
receive counsel from a well-wisher, I would advise you to
see that you do not go in her. No one offers any
impediment
to your performing your office, and I'll thank you to
offer me none in performing mine.Brace the yards further
forward, boys, and let the ship come up to the wind.
As there were logic, useful information, law, and
seamanship
united in this reply, the attorney began to betray
uneasiness
;
for by this time the ship had gathered so much
way as to render it exceedingly doubtful whether a
two-oared
boat would be able to come up with her, without the
consent of those on board. It is probable, as evening had
already closed, and the rays of the moon were beginning
to quiver on the ripple of the water, that he would have
abandoned his object, though with infinite reluctance, had
not Sir George Templemore pointed out to the captain a
six-oared boat, that was pulling towards them from a
quarter
that permitted it to be seen in the moonlight.
That appears to be a man-of-war's cutter, observed
the baronet uneasily, for by this time all on board felt a
sort of personal interest in their escape.
It does indeed, Captain Truck, added the pilot; and
if
she
make a signal, it will become my duty to heave-to
the Montauk.
Then bundle out of her, my fine fellow, as fast as you
can; for not a brace or a bowline shall be touched here,
with my consent, for any such purpose. The ship is
clearedmy hour is comemy passengers are on board
and America is my haven.Let them that want me, catch
me. That is what I call
Vattel
.
The pilot and the master of the Montauk were excellent
friends, and understood each other perfectly, even while the
former was making the most serious professions of duty.
The boat was hauled up, and, first whispering a few
cautions
about the shoals and the currents, the worthy marine
guide leaped into it, and was soon seen floating asterna
cheering proof that the ship had got fairly in motion. As
he fell out of hearing in the wake of the vessel, the honest
fellow kept calling out to tack in season.
If you wish to try the speed of your boat against that
of the pilot, Mr. Grab, called out the captain, you will
never have a better opportunity. It is a fine night for a
regatta, and I will stand you a pound on Mr. Handlead's
heels. For that matter, I would as soon trust his head, or
his hands, in the bargain.
The officer continued obstinately on board, for he saw
that the six-oared boat was coming up with the ship, and,
as he well knew the importance to his client of compelling
a settlement of the accounts, he fancied some succour might
be expected in that quarter. In the mean time, this new
movement on the part of their pursuers attracted general
attention, and, as might be expected, the interest of this
little incident increased the excitement that usually
accompanies
a departure for a long sea-voyage, fourfold. Men
and women forgot their griefs and leave-takings in anxiety,
and in that pleasure which usually attends agitation of the
mind that does not proceed from actual misery of our own.
CHAPTER IV.
Whither away so fast?
O God save you!
Even to the hall to hear what shall become
Of the great Duke of Buckingham.
Henry
VIII.
The
assembling of the passengers of the large
packet-ship
is necessarily an affair of coldness and distrust,
especially
with those who know the world, and more
particularly
Vol. I.  4
still when the passage is from Europe to America.
The greater sophistication of the old than of the new
hemisphere
,
with its consequent shifts and vices, the knowledge
that the tide of emigration sets westward, and that few
abandon the home of their youth unless impelled by
misfortune
at least, with other obvious causes, unite to produce
this distinction. Then come the fastidiousness of habits, the
sentiments of social castes, the refinements of breeding, and
the reserves of dignity of character, to be put in close
collision
with bustling egotism, ignorance of usages, an
absence
of training, and downright vulgarity of thought and
practices. Although necessity soon brings these chaotic
elements into something like order, the first week commonly
passes in reconnoitring, cool civilities, and cautious
concessions
,
to yield at length to the never-dying charities;
unless
,
indeed, the latter may happen to be kept in abeyance
by a downright quarrel, about midnight carousals, a
squeaking
fiddle, or some incorrigible snorer.
Happily, the party collected in the Montauk had the good
fortune to abridge the usual probation in courtesies, by the
stirring events of the night on which they sailed. Two
hours had scarcely elapsed since the last passenger crossed
the gangway, and yet the respective circles of the
quarter-deck
and steerage felt more sympathy with each other than
the boasted human charities ordinarily quicken in days of
common-place intercourse. They had already found out
each other's names, thanks to the assiduity of Captain
Truck, who had stolen time, in the midst of all his activity,
to make half-a-dozen more introductions, and the
Americans
of the less trained class were already using them as
freely as if they were old acquaintances. We say
Americans
,
for the cabins of these ships usually contain a
congress
of nations, though the people of England, and of her
ci-devant colonies, of course predominate in those of the
London lines. On the present occasion, the last two were
nearly balanced in numbers, so far as national character
could be made out; opinion (which, as might be expected,
had been busy the while,) being suspended in reference to
Mr. Blunt, and one or two others whom the captain called
foreigners, to distinguish them from the Anglo-Saxon
stock.
This equal distribution of forces might, under other
circumstances
,
have led to a division in feeling; for the
conflicts
between American and British opinions, coupled with
a difference in habits, are a prolific source of discontent in
the cabins of packets. The American is apt to fancy
himself
at home, under the flag of his country; while his
Transatlantic kinsman is strongly addicted to fancying that
when he has fairly paid his money, he has a right to
embark
all his prejudices with his other luggage.
The affair of the attorney and the newly-married couple,
however, was kept quite distinct from all feelings of
nationality
;
the English apparently entertaining quite as
lively a wish that the latter might escape from the fangs
of the law, as any other portion of the passengers. The
parties themselves were British, and although the authority
evaded was of the same origin, right or wrong, all on board
had taken up the impression that it was improperly
exercised
.
Sir George Templemore, the Englishman of highest
rank, was decidedly of this way of thinking,an opinion
he was rather warm in expressing,and the example of a
baronet had its weight, not only with most of his own
countrymen, but with not a few of the Americans also.
The Effingham party, together with Mr. Sharp and Mr.
Blunt, were, indeed, all who seemed to be entirely
indifferent
to Sir George's sentiments; and, as men are
intuitively
quick in discovering who do and who do not defer
to their suggestions, their accidental independence might
have been favoured by this fact, for the discourse of this
gentleman was addressed in the main to those who lent the
most willing ears. Mr. Dodge, in particular, was his
constant
and respectful listener, and profound admirer:But
then he was his room-mate, and a democrat of a water so
pure, that he was disposed to maintain no man had a right
to any one of his senses, unless by popular sufferance.
In the mean while, the night advanced, and the soft light
of the moon was playing on the waters, adding a
semi-mysterious
obscurity to the excitement of the scene. The
two-oared boat had evidently been overtaken by that
carrying
six oars, and, after a short conference, the first had
returned reluctantly towards the land, while the latter,
profiting by its position, had set two lug-sails, and was
standing out into the offing, on a course that would compel
the Montauk to come under its lee, when the shoals, as
would soon be the case, should force the ship to tack.
England is most inconveniently placed, Captain Truck
dryly remarked as he witnessed this manuvre. Were
this island only out of the way, now, we might stand on as
we head, and leave those man-of-war's men to amuse
themselves
all night with backing and filling in the roads of
Portsmouth.
I hope there is no danger of that little boat's overtaking
this large ship! exclaimed Sir George, with a vivacity
that did great credit to his philanthropy, according to the
opinion of Mr. Dodge at least; the latter having imbibed a
singular bias in favour of persons of condition, from having
travelled in an
eilwagen
with a German baron, from whom he
had taken a model of the pipe he carried but never smoked,
and from having been thrown for two days and nights into
the society of a Polish countess, as he uniformly termed
her, in the
gondole
of a
diligence
, between Lyons and
Marseilles
.
In addition, Mr. Dodge, as has just been hinted,
was an ultra-freeman at homea circumstance that seems
always to react, when the subject of the feeling gets into
foreign countries.
A feather running before a lady's sigh would outsail
either of us in this air, which breathes on us in some such
fashion as a whale snores, Sir George, by sudden puffs. I
would give the price of a steerage passage, if Great Britain
lay off the Cape of Good Hope for a week or ten days.
Or Cape Hatteras! rejoined the mate.
Not I; I wish the old island no harm, nor a worse
climate
than it has got already; though it lies as much in
our way just at this moment, as the moon in an eclipse of
the sun. I bear the old creature a great-grandson's love
or a step or two farther off, if you will,and come and go
too often to forget the relationship. But, much as I love
her, the affection is not strong enough to go ashore on her
shoals, and so we will go about, Mr. Leach; at the same
time, I wish from my heart that two-lugged rascal would
go about his business.
The ship tacked slowly but gracefully, for she was in
what her master termed racing trim; and as her bows
fell off to the eastward, it became pretty evident to all who
understood the subject, that the two little lug-sails that
were eating into the wind, as the sailors express it,
would weather upon her track ere she could stretch over to
the other shoal. Even the landsmen had some feverish
suspicions of the truth, and the steerage passengers were
already holding a secret conference on the possibility of
hiding the pursued in some of the recesses of the ship.
Such things were often done, one whispered to another,
and it was as easy to perform it now as at any other time.
But Captain Truck viewed the matter differently: his
vocation called him three times a year into the roads at
Portsmouth, and he felt little disposition to embarrass his
future intercourse with the place by setting its authorities
at a too open defiance. He deliberated a good deal on the
propriety of throwing his ship up into the wind, as she
slowly advanced towards the boat, and of inviting those in
the latter to board him. Opposed to this was the pride of
profession, and Jack Truck was not a man to overlook or
to forget the yarns that were spun among his fellows at
the New England Coffee-house, or among those farming
hamlets on the banks of the Connecticut, whence all the
packet-men are derived, and whither they repair for a
shelter
when their careers are run, as regularly as the fruit
decays
where it falleth, or the grass that has not been
harvested
or cropped withers on its native stalk.
There is no question, Sir George, that this fellow is a
man-of-war's man, said the master to the baronet, who
stuck close to his side. Take a peep at the creeping
rogue through this night-glass, and you will see his crew
seated at their thwarts with their arms folded, like men who
eat the king's beef. None but your regular public servant
ever gets that impudent air of idleness about him, either in
England or America. In this respect, human nature is the
same in both hemispheres, a man never falling in with luck,
but he fancies it is no more than his deserts.
There seems to be a great many of them! Can it be
their intention to carry the vessel by boarding?
If it is, they must take the will for the deed, returned
Mr. Truck a little coldly. I very much question if the
Montauk, with three cabin officers, as many stewards, two
4 *
cooks, and eighteen foremast-men, would exactly like the
notion of being `carried,' as you style it, Sir George, by a
six-oared cutter's crew. We are not as heavy as the planet
Jupiter, but have somewhat too much gravity to be `carried'
as lightly as all that, too.
You intend, then, to resist? asked Sir George, whose
generous zeal in behalf of the pursued apparently led him
to take a stronger interest in their escape than any other
person on board.
Captain Truck, who had never an objection to sport,
pondered with himself a little, smiled, and then loudly
expressed
a wish that he had a member of congress or a
member of parliament on board.
Your desire is a little extraordinary for the
circumstances
,
observed Mr. Sharp; will you have the goodness
to explain why?
This matter touches on international law, gentlemen,
continued the master, rubbing his hands; for, in addition
to having caught the art of introduction, the honest mariner
had taken it into his head he had become an adept in the
principles of Vattel, of whom he possessed a well-thumbed
copy, and for whose dogmas he entertained the deference
that they who begin to learn late usually feel for the
particular
master into whose hands they have accidentally
fallen. Under what circumstances, or in what category,
can a public armed ship compel a neutral to submit to
being boardednot `carried,' Sir George, you will please
to remark; for dme, if any man `carries' the
Montauk
that is not strong enough to `carry' her crew and
cargo along with her!but in what category, now, is a
packet like this I have the honour to command obliged, in
comity, to heave-to and to submit to an examination at all?
The ship is a-weigh, and has handsomely tacked under her
canvas; and, gentlemen, I should be pleased to have your
sentiments on the occasion. Just have the condescension
to point out the category.
Mr. Dodge came from a part of the country in which
men were accustomed to think, act, almost to eat and drink
and sleep, in common; or, in other words, from one of
those regions in America, in which there was so much
community, that few had the moral courage, even when
they possessed the knowledge, and all the other necessary
means, to cause their individuality to be respected. When
the usual process of conventions, sub-conventions,
caucusses
,
and public meetings did not supply the means of
concentrated action, he and his neighbours had long been
in the habit of having recourse to societies, by way of
obtaining
energetic means, as it was termed; and from
his tenth year up to his twenty-fifth, this gentleman had
been either a president, vice-president, manager, or
committee-man
,
of some philosophical, political, or religious
expedient
to fortify human wisdom, make men better, and
resist
error and despotism. His experience had rendered
him expert in what may well enough be termed the
language
of association. No man of his years, in the
twenty-six
states, could more readily apply the terms of taking up
excitementunqualified hostilitypublic
opinion
spreading
before the public, or any other of
those generic phrases that imply the privileges of all, and
the rights of none. Unfortunately, the pronunciation of
this person was not as pure as his motives, and he
misunderstood
the captain when he spoke of comity, as meaning
a committee; and although it was not quite obvious
what the worthy mariner could intend by obliged in
committee
(comity) to heave-to, yet, as he had known these
bodies to do so many energetic things, he did not see
why they might not perform this evolution as well as
another
.
It really does appear, Captain Truck, he remarked
accordingly, that our situation approaches a crisis, and
the suggestion of a comity (committee) strikes me as being
peculiarly proper and suitable to the circumstances, and in
strict conformity with republican usages. In order to save
time, and that the gentlemen who shall be appointed to
serve may have opportunity to report, therefore, I will at
once nominate Sir George Templemore as chairman,
leaving
it for any other gentleman present to suggest the name
of any candidate he may deem proper. I will only add,
that in my poor judgment this comity (committee) ought to
consist of at least three, and that it have power to send for
persons and papers.
I would propose five, Captain Truck, by way of
amendment
,
added another passenger of the same kidney as the
last speaker, gentlemen of their school making it a point to
differ a little from every proposition by way of showing
their independence.
It was fortunate for both the mover of the original
motion
,
and for the proposer of the amendment, that the
master
was acquainted with the character of Mr. Dodge, or a
proposition that his ship was to be worked by a committee,
(or indeed by comity,) would have been very likely to meet
with but an indifferent reception; but, catching a glimpse
of the laughing eyes of Eve, as well as of the amused faces
of Mr. Sharp and Mr. Blunt, by the light of the moon, he
very gravely signified his entire approbation of the
chairman
named, and his perfect readiness to listen to the report
of the aforesaid committee as soon as it might be prepared
to make it.
And if your committee, or comity, gentlemen, he
added, can tell me what Vattel would say about the
obligation
to heave-to in a time of profound peace, and when
the ship, or boat, in chase, can have no belligerent rights,
I shall be grateful to my dying day; for I have looked him
through as closely as old women usually examine
almanacks
to tell which way the wind is about to blow, and I
fear he has overlooked the subject altogether.
Mr. Dodge, and three or four more of the same
community-propensity
as himself, soon settled the names of the
rest of the committee, when the nominees retired to another
part of the deck to consult together; Sir George
Templemore
,
to the surprise of all the Effingham party, consenting
to serve with a willingness that rather disregarded forms.
It might be convenient to refer other matters to this
committee, captain, said Mr. Sharp, who had tact enough
to see that nothing but her habitual
retenue
of deportment
kept Eve, whose bright eyes were dancing with humour,
from downright laughter: these are the important points
of reefing and furling, the courses to be steered, the sail to
be carried, the times and seasons of calling all hands
together
,
with sundry other customary duties, that no doubt
would be well treated on in this forthcoming report.
No doubt, sir; I perceive you have been at sea before,
and I am sorry you were overlooked in naming the
members
of the comity: take my word for it, all that you have
mentioned can be done on board the Montauk by a comity,
as well as settling the question of heaving-to, or not, for
yonder boat.By the way, Mr. Leach, the fellows have
tacked, and are standing in this direction, thinking to cross
our bows and speak us.Mr. Attorney, the tide is setting
us off the land, and you may make it morning before you
get into your nests, if you hold on much longer. I fear
Mrs. Seal and Mrs. Grab will be unhappy women.
The bloodhounds of the law heard this warning with
indifference, for they expected succour of some sort, though
they hardly knew of what sort, from the man-of-war's boat,
which, it was now plain enough, must weather on the ship.
After putting their heads together, Mr. Seal offered his
companion
a pinch of snuff, helping himself afterwards, like a
man indifferent to the result, and one patient in time of
duty. The sun-burnt face of the captain, whose standing
colour was that which cooks get when the fire burns the
brightest, but whose hues no fire or cold ever varied, was
turned fully on the two, and it is probable they would have
received some decided manifestation of his will, had not
Sir George Templemore, with the four other
committeemen
,
approached to give in the result of their conference.
We are of opinion, Captain Truck, said the baronet,
that as the ship is under way, and your voyage may be
fairly said to have commenced, it is quite inexpedient and
altogether unnecessary for you to anchor again; but that
it is your duty
I have no occasion for advice as to my duty, gentlemen.
If you can let me know what Vattel says, or ought to have
said, on the subject, or touching the category of the right
of search, except as a belligerent right, I will thank you;
if not, we must e'en guess at it. I have not sailed a ship
in this trade these ten years to need any jogging of the
memory about port-jurisdiction either, for these are matters
in which one gets to be expert by dint of use, as my old
master used to say when he called us from table with half
a dinner. Now, there was the case of the blacks in
Charleston, in which our government showed clearly it had
not studied Vattel, or it never would have given the answer
it did. Perhaps you never heard that case, Sir George, and
as it touches a delicate principle, I will just run over the
category lightly; for it has its points, as well as a coast.
Does not this matter press,may not the boat
The boat will do nothing, gentlemen, without the
permission
of Jack Truck. You must know, the Carolinians
have a law that all niggers brought into their state by ships,
must be caged until the vessel sails again. This is to
prevent
emancipation, as they call it, or abolition, I know not
which. An Englishman comes in from the islands with a
crew of blacks, and, according to law, the authorities of
Charleston house them all before night. John Bull
complains
to his minister, and his minister sends a note to our
secretary, and our secretary writes to the Governor of
Carolina, calling on him to respect the treaty, and so on.
Gentlemen, I need not tell you what a treaty isit is a
thing in itself to be obeyed; but it is all important to know
what it commands. Well, what was this said treaty? That
John should come in and out of the ports, on the footing of
the most favoured nation; on the
statu quo ante bellum
principle, as Vattel has it. Now, the Carolinians treated
John just as they treated Jonathan, and there was no more
to be said. All parties were bound to enter the port,
subject
to the municipals, as is set forth in Vattel. That was
a case soon settled, you perceive, though depending on a
nicety.
Sir George had listened with extreme impatience, but,
fearful of offending, he listened to the end; then, seizing
the first pause in the captain's discourse, he resumed his
remonstrances with an interest that did infinite credit to his
humanity, at the same time that he overlooked none of the
obligations of politeness.
An exceedingly clear case, I protest, he answered,
and capitally putI question if Lord Stowell could do it
betterand exceedingly apt, that about the
ante bellum;
but I confess my feelings have not been so much roused for
a long time as they have been on account of these poor
people
.
There is something inexpressibly painful in being
disappointed
as one is setting out in the morning of life, as it
were, in this cruel manner; and rather than see this state
of things protracted, I would prefer paying a trifle out of
my own pocket. If this wretched attorney will consent,
now, to take a hundred pounds and quit us, and carry back
with him that annoying cutter with the lug-sails, I will give
him the money most cheerfully,most cheerfully, I
protest
.
There is something so essentially respectable in practical
generosity, that, though Eve and all the curious auditors of
what was passing felt an inclination to laugh at the whole
procedure up to this declaration, eye met eye in
commendation
of the liberality of the baronet. He had shown he
had a heart, in the opinion of most of those who heard him,
though his previous conversation had led several of the
observers
to distrust his having the usual quantum of head.
Give yourself no trouble about the attorney, Sir
George, returned the captain, shaking the other cordially
by the hand: he shall not touch a pound of your money,
nor do I think he is likely to touch Robert Davis. We have
caught the tide on our lee bow, and the current is wheeling
us up to windward, like an opposition coach flying over
Blackheath. In a few minutes we shall be in blue water;
and then I'll give the rascal a touch of Vattel that will
throw him all aback, if it don't throw him overboard.
But the cutter?
Why, if we drive the attorney and Grab out of the
ship, there will be no process in the hands of the others,
by which they can carry off the man, even admitting the
jurisdiction. I know the scoundrels, and not a shilling
shall either of the knaves take from this vessel with my
consent. Harkee, Sir George, a word in your ear: two
of as dd cockroaches as ever rummaged a ship's
bread-room
;
I'll see that they soon heave about, or I'll heave
them both into their boat, with my own fair hands.
The captain was about to turn away to examine the
position
of the cutter, when Mr. Dodge asked permission to
make a short report in behalf of the minority of the comity
(committee), the amount of which was, that they agreed in
all things with the majority, except on the point that, as it
might become expedient for the ship to anchor again in
some of the ports lower down the Channel, it would be wise
to keep that material circumstance in view, in making up a
final decision in the affair. This report, on the part of the
minority, which, Mr. Dodge explained to the baronet,
partook
rather of the character of a caution than of a protest,
had quite as little influence on Captain Truck as the opinion
of the majority, for he was just one of those persons who
seldom took advice that did not conform with his own
previous
decision; but he coolly continued to examine the
cutter, which by this time was standing on the same course
as the ship, a short distance to windward of her, and edging
a little off the wind, so as to bring the two nearer to each
other, every yard they advanced.
The wind had freshened to a little breeze, and the
captain
nodded his head with satisfaction when he heard,
even where he stood on the quarter-deck, the slapping of
the sluggish swell, as the huge bows of the ship parted the
water. At this moment those in the cutter saw the bubbles
glide swiftly past them, while to those in the Montauk the
motion was still slow and heavy; and yet, of the two, the
actual velocity was rather in favour of the latter, both
having
about what is technically termed four-knot way on
them. The officer of the boat was quick to detect the
change that was acting against him, and by easing the
sheets of his lug-sails, and keeping the cutter as much off
the wind as he could, he was soon within a hundred feet of
the ship, running along on her weather-beam. The bright
soft moonlight permitted the face of a young man in a
man-of-war
cap, who wore the undress uniform of a sea
lieutenant
,
to be distinctly seen, as he rose in the stern-sheets,
which contained also two other persons.
I will thank you to heave-to the Montauk, said the
lieutenant civilly, while he raised his cap, apparently in
compliment to the passengers who crowded the rail to see
and hear what passed. I am sent on the duty of the king,
sir.
I know your errand, sir, returned Captain Truck,
whose resolution to refuse to comply was a good deal
shaken
by the gentleman-like manner in which the request was
made; and I wish you to bear witness, that if I do
consent
to your request, it is voluntarily; for, on the principles
laid down by Vattel and the other writers on international
law, the right of search is a belligerent right, and England
being at peace, no ship belonging to one nation can have a
right to stop a vessel belonging to another.
I cannot enter into these niceties, sir, returned the
lieutenant, sharply: I have my orders, and you will
excuse
me if I say, I intend to execute them.
Execute them, with all my heart, sir: if you are
ordered
to heave-to my ship, all you have to do is to get on
board if you can, and let us see the style in which you
handle yards. As to the people now stationed at the braces,
the trumpet that will make them stir is not to be spoken
through at the Admiralty. The fellow has spirit in him,
and I like his principles as an officer, but I cannot admit
his conclusions as a jurist. If he flatters himself with
being able to frighten us into a new category, now, that is
likely to impair national rights, the lad has just got himself
into a problem that will need all his logic, and a good deal
of his spirit, to get out of again.
You will scarcely think of resisting a king's officer in
British waters! said the young man with that haughtiness
that the meekest tempers soon learn to acquire under a
pennant.
Resisting, my dear sir! I resist nothing. The
misconception
is in supposing that you sail this ship instead of
John Truck. That is my name, sir; John Truck. Do
your errand in welcome, but do not ask me to help you.
Come aboard, with all my heart; nothing would give me
more pleasure than to take wine with you; but I see no
necessity of stopping a packet, that is busy on a long road,
without an object, as we say on the other side of the big
waters.
There was a pause, and then the lieutenant, with the sort
of hesitation that a gentleman is apt to feel when he makes
a proposal that he knows ought not to be accepted, called
out that those in the boat with him would pay for the
detention
of the ship. A more unfortunate proposition could
not be made to Captain Truck, who would have hove-to his
ship in a moment had the lieutenant proposed to discuss
Vattel with him on the quarter-deck, and who was only
holding
out as a sort of salvo to his rights, with that disposition to
resist aggression that the experience of the last forty years
has so deeply implanted in the bosom of every American
sailor, in cases connected with English naval officers, and
who had just made up his mind to let Robert Davis take
Vol. I.5
his chance, and to crack a bottle with the handsome young
man who was still standing up in the boat. But Mr. Truck
had been too often to London not to understand exactly the
manner in which Englishmen appreciate American
character
;
and, among other things, he knew it was the general
opinion in the island that money could do any thing with
Jonathan, or, as Christophe is said once to have
sententiously
expressed the same sentiment, if there were a bag
of coffee in h, a Yankee could be found to go and bring
it out.
The master of the Montauk had a proper relish for his
lawful gains as well as another, but he was vain-glorious
on the subject of his countrymen, principally because he
found that the packets outsailed all other merchant-ships,
and fiercely proud of any quality that others were disposed
to deny them.
At hearing this proposal, or intimation, therefore, instead
of accepting it, Captain Truck raised his hat with formal
civility, and coolly wished the other good night. This
was bringing the affair to a crisis at once; for the helm of
the cutter was borne up, and an attempt was made to run
the boat alongside of the ship. But the breeze had been
steadily increasing, the air had grown heavier as the night
advanced, and the dampness of evening was thickening the
canvas of the coarser sails in a way sensibly to increase
the speed of the ship. When the conversation commenced,
the boat was abreast of the fore-rigging; and by the time
it ended, it was barely up with the mizzen. The lieutenant
was quick to see the disadvantage he laboured under, and
he called out Heave! as he found the cutter was falling
close under the counter of the ship, and would be in her
wake in another minute. The bowman of the boat cast a
light grapnel with so much precision that it hooked in the
mizzen rigging, and the line instantly tightened so as to tow
the cutter. A seaman was passing along the outer edge of
the hurricane-house at the moment, coming from the wheel,
and with the decision of an old salt, he quietly passed his
knife across the stretched cordage, and it snapped like
packthread
.
The grapnel fell into the sea, and the boat was
tossing in the wake of the ship, all as it might be while
one could draw a breath. To furl the sails and ship the
oars consumed but an instant, and then the cutter was
ploughing the water under the vigorous strokes of her
crew.
Spirited! spirited and nimble! observed Captain
Truck, who stood coolly leaning against a shroud, in a
position where he could command a view of all that was
passing, improving the opportunity to shake the ashes from
his cigar while he spoke; a fine young fellow, and one
who will make an admiral, or something better, I dare say,
if he live;perhaps a cherub, in time. Now, if he pull
much longer in the back-water of our wake, I shall have to
give him up, Leach, as a little marin-
ish:
ah! there he
sheers out of it, like a sensible youth as he is! Well,
there is something pleasant in the conceit of a six-oared
boat's carrying a London liner by boarding, even admitting
the lad could have got alongside.
So, it would seem, thought Mr. Leach and the crew of
the Montauk; for they were clearing the decks with as
much philosophy as men ever discover when employed in
an unthankful office. This
sang-froid
of seamen is always
matter of surprise to landsmen; but adventurers who have
been rocked in the tempest for years, whose utmost security
is a great hazard, and whose safety constantly depends on
the command of the faculties, come in time to experience
an apathy on the subject of all the minor terrors and
excitements
of life, that none can acquire unless by habit and
similar risks. There was a low laugh among the people,
and now and then a curious glance of the eye over the
quarter to ascertain the position of the struggling boat; but
there the effect of the little incident ceased, so far as the
seamen were concerned.
Not so with the passengers. The Americans exulted at
the failure of the man-of-war's man, and the English
doubted. To them, deference to the crown was habitual,
and they were displeased at seeing a stranger play a king's
boat such a trick, in what they justly enough thought to be
British waters. Although the law may not give a man any
more right than another to the road before his own door,
he comes in time to fancy it, in a certain degree, his
particular
road. Strictly speaking, the Montauk was perhaps
still under the dominion of the English laws, though she
had been a league from the land when laying at her anchor,
and by this time the tide and her own velocity had swept her
broad off into the offing quite as far again; indeed she had
now got to such a distance from the land, that Captain
Truck thought it his duty to bring matters to a
conclusion
with the attorney.
Well, Mr. Seal, he said, I am grateful for the
pleasure
of your company thus far; but you will excuse me if
I decline taking you and Mr. Grab quite to America. Half
an hour hence you will hardly be able to find the island;
for as soon as we have got to a proper distance from the
cutter, I shall tack to the south-west, and you ought,
moreover
,
to remember the anxiety of the ladies at home.
This may turn out a serious matter, Captain Truck, on
your return passage! The laws of England are not to be
trifled with. Will you oblige me by ordering the steward
to hand me a glass of water? Waiting for justice is dry
duty, I find.
Extremely sorry I cannot comply, gentlemen. Vattel
has nothing on the subject of watering belligerents, or
neutrals
,
and the laws of Congress compel me to carry so many
gallons to the man. If you will take it in the way of a
nightcap, however, and drink success to our run to
America
,
and your own to the shore, it shall be in champagne,
if you happen to like that agreeable fluid.
The attorney was about to express his readiness to
compromise
on these terms, when a glass of the beverage for
which he had first asked was put into his hand by the wife
of Robert Davis. He took the water, drank it, and turned
from the woman with the obduracy of one who never
suffered
feeling to divert him from the pursuit of gain. The
wine was brought, and the captain filled the glasses with a
seaman's heartiness.
I drink to your safe return to Mrs. Seal, and the little
gods and goddesses of justice,Pan or Mercury, which is
it? And as for you, Grab, look out for sharks as you pull
in. If they hear of your being afloat, the souls of
persecuted
sailors will set them on you, as the devil chases male
coquettes. Well, gentlemen, you are balked this time; but
what matters it? It is but another man got safe out of a
country that has too many in it; and I trust we shall meet
good friends again this day four months. Even man and
wife must part, when the hour arrives.
That will depend on how my client views your conduct
on this occasion, Captain Truck; for he is not a man that
it is always safe to thwart.
That for your client, Mr. Seal! returned the captain,
snapping his fingers. I am not to be frightened with an
attorney's growl, or a bailiff's nod. You come off with a
writ or a warrant, I care not which; I offer no resistance;
you hunt for your man, like a terrier looking for a rat, and
can't find him; I see the fine fellow, at this moment, on
deck,but I feel no obligation to tell you who or where he
is; my ship is cleared and I sail, and you have no power
to stop me; we are outside of all the head-lands, good two
leagues and a half off, and some writers say that a
gun-shot
is the extent of your jurisdiction, once out of which,
your authority is not worth half as much as that of my
chief cook, who has power to make his mate clean the
coppers
.
Well, sir, you stay here ten minutes longer and we
shall be fully three leagues from your nearest land, and
then you are in America, according to law, and a quick
passage you will have made of it. Now, that is what I call
a category.
As the captain made this last remark, his quick eye saw
that the wind had hauled so far round to the westward, as
to supersede the necessity of tacking, and that they were
actually going eight knots in a direct line from Portsmouth.
Casting an eye behind him, he perceived that the cutter had
given up the chase, and was returning towards the distant
roads. Under circumstances so discouraging, the attorney,
who began to be alarmed for his boat, which was flying
along on the water, towed by the ship, prepared to take his
leave; for he was fully aware that he had no power to
compel
the other to heave-to his ship, to enable him to get out
of her. Luckily the water was still tolerably smooth, and
with fear and trembling, Mr. Seal succeeded in blundering
into the boat; not, however, until the watermen had warned
him of their intention to hold on no longer. Mr. Grab
followed
,
with a good deal of difficulty, and just as a hand
was about to let go the painter, the captain appeared at the
5 *
gangway with the man they were in quest of, and said in
his most winning manner
Mr. Grab, Mr. Davis; Mr. Davis, Mr. Grab; I
seldom
introduce steerage passengers, but to oblige two old
friends I break the rule. That's what I call a category.
My compliments to Mrs. Grab. Let go the painter.
The words were no sooner uttered than the boat was
tossing and whirling in the caldron left by the passing
ship.
CHAPTER V.
What country, friends, is this?
Illyrin, lady.
Twelfth Night
.
Captain Truck
cast an eye aloft to see if everything
drew, as coolly as if nothing out of the usual course had
happened; he and his crew having, seemingly, regarded
the attempt to board them as men regard the natural
phenomena
of the planets, or in other words, as if the ship, of
which they were merely parts, had escaped by her own
instinct
or volition. This habit of considering the machine
as the governing principle is rather general among seamen,
who, while they ease a brace, or drag a bowline, as the
coachman checks a rein, appear to think it is only
permitting
the creature to work her own will a little more freely.
It is true all
know
better, but none talk, or indeed would
seem to
feel
, as if they thought otherwise.
Did you observe how the old barky jumped out of the
way of those rovers in the cutter? said the captain
complacently
to the quarter-deck group, when his survey aloft
had taken sufficient heed that his own nautical skill should
correct the instinct of the ship. A skittish horse, or a
whale with the irons in him, or, for that matter, one of the
funniest of your theatricals, would not have given a
prettier
aside than this poor old hulk, which is certainly just
the clumsiest craft that sails the ocean. I wish King
William
would take it into his royal head, now, to send one of
his light-heeled cruisers out to prove it, by way of
resenting
the cantaverous trick the Montauk played his boat!
The dull report of a gun, as the sound came short and
deadened up against the breeze, checked the raillery of Mr.
Truck. On looking to leeward, there was sufficient light to
see the symmetrical sails of the corvette they had left at
anchor, trimmed close by the wind, and the vessel itself
standing out under a press of canvas, apparently in chase.
The gun had evidently been fired as a signal of recall to the
cutter, blue lights being burnt on board of both the ship and
its boat, in proof that they were communicating.
The passengers now looked gravely at each other, for
the matter, in their eyes, began to be serious. Some
suggested
the possibility that the offence of Davis might be
other than debt, but this was disproved by the process and
the account of the bailiff himself; while most concluded
that a determination to resent the slight done the authorities
had caused the cruiser to follow them out, with the
intention
of carrying them back again. The English
passengers
in particular began now to reason in favour of the
authority
of the crown, while those who were known to be
Americans grew warm in maintaining the rights of their
flag. Both the Effinghams, however, were moderate in
the expression of their opinions; for education, years, and
experience, had taught them to discriminate justly.
As respects the course of Captain Truck, in refusing to
permit the cutter to board him, he is probably a better judge
than any of us, Mr. Effingham observed with gentlemanly
reservefor he must better understand the precise position
of his ship at the time; but concerning the want of right in
a foreign vessel of war to carry this ship into port in a time
of profound peace, when sailing on the high seas, as will
soon be the case with the Montauk,admitting that she is
not there at present,I should think there can be no
reasonable
doubt. The dispute, if there is to be any, has now
to become matter of negotiation; or redress must be sought
through the general agents of the two nations, and not
taken by the inferior officers of either party. The instant
the Montauk reaches the public highway of nations, she is
within the exclusive jurisdiction of the country under whose
flag she legally sails.
Vattel, to the back-bone! said the captain, giving a
nod of approbation, again clearing the end of his cigar.
Now, John Effingham was a man of strong feelings,
which is often but another word for a man of strong
prejudices
;
and he had been educated between thirty or forty
years before, which is saying virtually, that he was
educated
under the influence of the British opinions, that then
weighed (and many of which still weigh) like an incubus
on the national interests of America. It is true, Mr.
Effingham
was in all senses the contemporary, as he had been
the school-fellow, of his cousin; that they loved each other
as brothers, had the utmost reliance on each other's
principles
in the main, thought alike in a thousand things, and
yet, in the particular of English domination, it was scarcely
possible for one man to resemble another less than the
widowed kinsman resembled the bachelor.
Edward Effingham was a singularly just-minded man,
and having succeeded at an early age to his estate, he had
lived many years in that intellectual retirement which, by
withdrawing him from the strifes of the world, had left a
cultivated sagacity to act freely on a natural disposition.
At the period when the entire republic was, in substance,
exhibiting the disgraceful picture of a nation torn by adverse
factions, that had their origin in interests alien to its own;
when most were either Englishmen or Frenchmen, he had
remained what nature, the laws and reason intended him to
be, an American. Enjoying the
otium cum dignitate
on
his hereditary estate, and in his hereditary abode, Edward
Effingham, with little pretensions to greatness, and with
many claims to goodness, had hit the line of truth which
so many of the god-likes of the republic, under the
influence
of their passions, and stimulated by the transient
and fluctuating interests of the day, entirely overlooked, or
which, if seeing, they recklessly disregarded. A less
impracticable
subject for excitement,the
primum mobile
of
all American patriotism and activity, if we are to believe
the theories of the times,could not be found, than this
gentleman. Independence of situation had induced
independence
of thought; study and investigation rendered
him original and just, by simply exempting him from the
influence of the passions; and while hundreds were keener,
abler in the exposition of subtleties, or more imposing with
the mass, few were as often right, and none of less
selfishness
,
than this simple-minded and upright gentleman. He
loved his native land, while he saw and regretted its
weaknesses
;
was its firm and consistent advocate abroad, without
becoming its interested or mawkish flatterer at home, and
at all times, and in all situations, manifested that his heart
was where it ought to be.
In many essentials, John Effingham was the converse of
all this. Of an intellect much more acute and vigorous
than that of his cousin, he also possessed passions less
under control, a will more stubborn, and prejudices that
often neutralized his reason. His father had inherited most
of the personal property of the family, and with this he had
plunged into the vortex of monied speculation that
succeeded
the adoption of the new constitution, and verifying the
truth of the sacred saying, that where treasure is, there
will the heart be also, he had entered warmly and blindly
into all the factious and irreconcilable principles of party,
if such a word can properly be applied to rules of conduct
that vary with the interests of the day, and had adopted the
current errors with which faction unavoidably poisons the
mind.
America was then much too young in her independence,
and too insignificant in all eyes but her own, to reason and
act for herself, except on points that pressed too obviously
on her immediate concerns to be overlooked; but the great
social principles,or it might be better to say, the great
social interests,that then distracted Europe, produced
quite as much sensation in that distant country, as at all
comported with a state of things that had so little practical
connexion with the result. The Effingham family had
started Federalists, in the true meaning of the term; for
their education, native sense and principles, had a leaning
to order, good government, and the dignity of the country;
but as factions became fiercer, and names got to be
confounded
and contradictory, the landed branch settled down
into what they thought were American, and the commercial
branch into what might properly be termed English
Federalists
.
We do not mean that the father of John intended
to be untrue to his native land; but by following up the
dogmas of party he had reasoned himself into a set of
maxims which, if they meant anything, meant everything
but that which had been solemnly adopted as the governing
principles of his own country, and many of which were
diametrically opposed to both its interests and its honour.
John Effingham had insensibly imbibed the sentiments of
his particular sect, though the large fortune inherited from
his father had left him too independent to pursue the sinuous
policy of trade. He had permitted temperament to act on
prejudice to such an extent that he vindicated the right of
England to force men from under the American flag, a
doctrine
that his cousin was too simple-minded and
clear-headed
ever to entertain for an instant: and he was singularly
ingenious in discovering blunders in all the acts of the
republic
,
when they conflicted with the policy of Great
Britain
.
In short, his talents were necessary, perhaps, to
reconcile
so much sophistry, or to render that reasonably
plausible that was so fundamentally false. After the peace
of 1815, John Effingham went abroad for the second time,
and he hurried through England with the eagerness of strong
affection; an affection that owed its existence even more to
opposition than to settled notions of truth, or to natural ties.
The result was disappointment, as happens nineteen times
in twenty, and this solely because, in the zeal of a partisan,
he had fancied theories, and imagined results. Like the
English radical, who rushes into America with a mind
unsettled
by impracticable dogmas, he experienced a reaction,
and this chiefly because he found that men were not
superior
to nature, and discovered so late in the day, what he
might have known at starting, that particular causes must
produce particular effects. From this time, John Effingham
became a wiser and a more moderate man; though, as the
shock had not been sufficiently violent to throw him
backward
on truth, or rather upon the opposing prejudices of
another sect, the remains of the old notions were still to be
discovered lingering in his opinions, and throwing a species
of twilight shading over his mind; as, in nature, the hues
of evening and the shadows of the morning follow, or
precede
,
the light of the sun.
Under the influence of these latent prejudices, then, John
Effingham replied to the remarks of his cousin, and the
discourse soon partook of the discursive character of all
arguments, in which the parties are not singularly
clear-headed
,
and free from any other bias than that of truth.
Nearly all joined in it, and half an hour was soon passed
in settling the law of nations, and the particular merits or
demerits of the instance before them.
It was a lovely night, and Mademoiselle Viefville and
Eve walked the deck for exercise, the smoothness of the
water rendering the moment every way favourable. As
has been already said, the common feeling in the escape
of the new-married couple had broken the ice, and less
restraint existed between the passengers, at the moment
when Mr. Grab left the ship, than would have been the case
at the end of a week, under ordinary circumstances. Eve
Effingham had passed her time since her eleventh year
principally on the continent of Europe, and in the mixed
intercourse that is common to strangers in that part of the
world; or, in other words, equally without the severe
restraint that is usually imposed there on the young of her
own sex, or without the extreme license that is granted to
them at home. She came of a family too well toned to run
into the extravagant freedoms that sometimes pass for easy
manners in America, had she never quitted her father's
house even: but her associations abroad had unavoidably
imparted greater reserve to her ordinary deportment than
the simplicity of cis-Atlantic usages would have rendered
indispensable in the most fastidious circles. With the usual
womanly reserves, she was natural and unembarrassed in
her intercourse with the world, and she had been allowed
to see so many different nations, that she had obtained a
self-confidence that did her no injury, under the influence
of an exemplary education, and great natural dignity of
mind. Still, Mademoiselle Viefville, notwithstanding she
had lost some of her own peculiar notions on the subject, by
having passed so many years in an American family, was
a little surprised at observing that Eve received the
respectful
advances of Mr. Sharp and Mr. Blunt with less reserve
than it was usual to her to manifest to entire strangers.
Instead of remaining a mere listener, she answered several
remarks of the first, and once or twice she even laughed
with him openly at some absurdity of the committee of five.
The cautious governess wondered, but half disposed to fancy
that there was no more than the necessary freedom of a
ship in it all,for, like a true Frenchwoman, Mademoiselle
Viefville had very vague notions of the secrets of the mighty
deepshe permitted it to pass, confiding in the long-tried
taste and discretion of her charge. While Mr. Sharp
discoursed
with Eve, who held her arm the while, she herself
had fallen into an animated conversation with Mr. Blunt,
who walked at her side, and who spoke her own language
so well, that she at first set him down as a countryman,
travelling under an English appellation, as a
nom de guerre
.
While this dialogue was at its height of interestfor Paul
Blunt discoursed with his companion of Paris and its
excellencies
with a skill that soon absorbed all her attention,
Paris, ce magnifique Paris
, having almost as much
influence
on the happiness of the governess, as it was said to
have had on that of Madame de Stael, Eve's companion
dropped his voice to a tone that was rather confidential for
a stranger, although it was perfectly respectful, and said,
I have flattered myself, perhaps through the influence
of self-love alone, that Miss Effingham has not so far
forgotten
all whom she has met in her travels, as to think me
an utter stranger.
Certainly not, returned Eve, with perfect simplicity
and composure; else would one of my faculties, that of
memory, be perfectly useless. I knew you at a glance, and
consider the worthy captain's introduction as so much
finesse of breeding utterly thrown away.
I am equally gratified and vexed at all this; gratified
and infinitely flattered to find that I have not passed before
your eyes like the common herd, who leave no traces of
even their features behind them; and vexed at finding
myself
in a situation that, I fear, you fancy excessively
ridiculous
?
Oh, one hardly dare to attach such consequences to
acts of young men, or young women either, in an age as
original as our own. I saw nothing particularly absurd
but the introduction;and so many absurder have since
passed, that this is almost forgotten.
And the name?
Is certainly a keen one. If I am not mistaken, when
we were in Italy you were content to let your servant bear
it; but, venturing among a people so noted for sagacity as
the Yankees, I suppose you have fancied it was necessary
to go armed
cap--pi
.
Both laughed lightly, as if they equally enjoyed the
pleasantry, and then he resumed:
But I sincerely hope you do not impute improper
motives
to the incognito?
I impute it to that which makes many young men run
from Rome to Vienna, or from Vienna to Paris; which
causes you to sell the
vis-a-vis
to buy a
dormeuse;
to know
your friends to-day, and to forget them to-morrow; or, in
short, to do a hundred other things that can be accounted
for on no other motive.
And this motive?
Is simply caprice.
I wish I could persuade you to ascribe some better
reason
to all my conduct. Can you think of nothing, in the
present instance, less discreditable?
Perhaps I can, Eve answered, after a moment of
thought; then laughing lightly again, she added, quickly,
But I fear, in exonerating you from the charge of
unmitigated
caprice, I shall ascribe a reason that does little less
credit to your knowledge.
This will appear in the end. Does Mademoiselle
Viefville remember me, do you fancy?
It is impossible; she was ill, you will remember, the
three months we saw so much of you.
And your father, Miss Effingham;am I really
forgotten
by him?
I am quite certain you are not. He never forgets a
face, whatever in this instance may have befallen the
name.
He received me so coldly, and so much like a total
stranger!
He is too well-bred to recognise a man who wishes to
be unknown, or to indulge in exclamations of surprise, or
in dramatic starts. He is more stable than a girl,
moreover
,
and may feel less indulgence to caprice.
Vol. I.  6
I feel obliged to his reserve; for exposure would be
ridiculous
,
and so long as you and he alone know me, I shall
feel less awkward in the ship. I am certain neither will
betray me.
Betray!
Betray, discover, annihilate me if you will. Anything
is preferable to ridicule.
This touches a little on the caprice; but you flatter
yourself with too much security; you are known to one
more besides my father, myself, and the honest man whom
you have robbed of all his astuteness, which I believe was
in his name.
For pity's sake, who can it be?
The worthy Nanny Sidley, my whilom nurse, and
actual
femme de chambre
. No ogre was ever more vigilant
on his ward than the faithful Nanny, and it is vain to
suppose
she does not recall your features.
But ogres sometimes sleep; recollect how many have
been overcome in that situation.
Eve smiled, but shook her head. She was about to
assure
Mr. Sharp of the vanity of his belief, when an
exclamation
from her governess diverted the attention of both,
and before either had time to speak again, Mademoiselle
turned to them, and said rapidly in French
I assure you,
ma chre
, I should have mistaken
monsieur
for a
compatriote
by his language, were it not for a
single heinous fault that he has just committed.
Which fault you will suffer me to inquire into, that I
may hasten to correct it? asked Mr. Blunt.
Mais, monsieur, you speak
too
perfectly, too
grammatically
,
for a native. You do not take the liberties with the
language that one who feels he owns it thinks he has a right
to do. It is the fault of too much correctness.
And a fault it easily becomes. I thank you for the
hint, mademoiselle; but as I am now going where little
French will be heard, it is probable it will soon be lost in
greater mistakes.
The two then turned away again, and continued the
dialogue
that had been interrupted by this trifling.
There may also be one more to whom you are known,
continued Eve, as soon as the vivacity of the discourse of
the others satisfied her the remark would not be heard.
Surely, you cannot mean
him?
Surely, I do mean
him
. Are you quite certain that
`Mr. Sharp, Mr. Blunt; Mr. Blunt, Mr. Sharp,' never saw
each other before?
I think not until the moment we entered the boat in
company
.
He is a gentlemanly young man; he seems even
to be more, and one would not be apt to forget him. He is
altogether superior to the rest of the set: do you not agree
with me?
Eve made no answer, probably because she thought her
companion was not sufficiently intimate to interrogate her
on the subject of her opinions of others. Mr. Sharp had
too much knowledge of the world not to perceive the little
mistake he had made, and after begging the young lady,
with a ludicrous deprecation of her mercy, not to betray
him, he changed the conversation with the tact of a man
who saw that the discourse could not be continued without
assuming a confidential character that Eve was indisposed
to permit. Luckily, a pause in the discourse between the
governess and her colloquist permitted a happy turn to the
conversation.
I believe you are an American, Mr. Blunt, he
remarked
;
and as I am an Englishman, we may be fairly pitted
against each other on this important question of
international
law, and about which I hear our worthy captain
flourishing extracts from Vattel as familiarly as household
terms. I hope, at least, you agree with me in thinking that
when the sloop-of-war comes up with us, it will be very
silly on our part to make any objections to being boarded
by her?
I do not know that it is at all necessary I should be an
American to give an opinion on such a point, returned the
young man he addressed, courteously, though he smiled to
himself as he answeredFor what is right, is right, quite
independent of nationality. It really does appear to me
that a public-armed vessel ought, in war or peace, to have
a right to ascertain the character of all merchant-ships, at
least on the coast of the country to which the cruisers
belong. Without this power, it is not easy to see in what
manner they can seize smugglers, capture pirates, or
otherwise
enforce the objects for which such vessels are usually
sent to sea, in the absence of positive hostilities.
I am happy to find you agreeing with me, then, in the
legality of the doctrine of the right of search.
Paul Blunt again smiled, and Eve, as she caught a
glimpse of his fine countenance in turning in their short
walk, fancied there was a concealed pride of reason in the
expression. Still he answered as mildly and quietly as
before.
The right of search, certainly, to attain these ends, but
to attain no more. If nations denounce piracy, for instance,
and employ especial agents to detect and overcome the
free-booters
,
there is reason in according to these agents all the
rights that are requisite to the discharge of the duties: but,
in conceding this much, I do not see that any authority is
acquired beyond that which immediately belongs to the
particular
service to be performed. If we give a man
permission
to enter our house to look for thieves, it does not
follow
that, because so admitted, he has a right to exercise
any other function. I do believe that the ship in chase of
us, as a public cruiser, ought to be allowed to board this
vessel; but finding nothing contrary to the laws of nations
about her, that she will have no power to detain or
otherwise
molest her. Even the right I concede ought to be
exercised in good faith, and without vexatious abuses.
But, surely, you must think that in carrying off a
refugee
from justice we have placed ourselves in the wrong,
and cannot object, as a principle, to the poor man's being
taken back again into the country from which he has
escaped, however much we may pity the hardships of the
particular case?
I much question if Captain Truck will be disposed to
reason so vaguely. In the first place, he will be apt to say
that his ship was regularly cleared, and that he had
authority
to sail; that in permitting the officer to search his
vessel
,
while in British waters, he did all that could be required
of him, the law not compelling him to be either a bailiff or
an informer; that the process issued was to take Davis, and
not to detain the Montauk; that, once out of British waters,
American law governs, and the English functionary became
an intruder of whom he had every right to rid himself, and
that the process by which he got his power to act at all
became impotent the instant it was without the jurisdiction
under which it was granted.
I think you will find the captain of yonder cruiser
indisposed
to admit this doctrine.
That is not impossible; men often preferring abuses to
being thwarted in their wishes. But the captain of yonder
cruiser might as well go on board a foreign vessel of war,
and pretend to a right to command her, in virtue of the
commission by which he commands his own ship, as to
pretend to find reason or law in doing what you seem to
predict.
I rejoice to hear that the poor man cannot now be torn
from his wife! exclaimed Eve.
You then incline to the doctrine of Mr. Blunt, Miss
Effingham? observed the other controversialist a little
reproachfully
.
I fear you make it a national question.
Perhaps I have done what all seem to have done,
permitted
sympathy to get the better of reason. And yet it
would require strong proof to persuade me that
villanous-looking
attorney was engaged in a good cause, and that
meek and warm-hearted wife in a bad one!
Both the gentlemen smiled, and both turned to the fair
speaker, as if inviting her to proceed. But Eve checked
herself, having already said more than became her, in her
own opinion.
I had hoped to find an ally in you, Mr. Blunt, to
sustain
the claim of England to seize her own seamen when
found on board of vessels of another nation, resumed Mr.
Sharp, when a respectful pause had shown both the young
men that they need expect nothing more from their fair
companion; but I fear I must set you down as belonging
to those who wish to see the power of England reduced,
cote qui cote
.
This was received as it was meant, or as a real opinion
veiled under pleasantry.
I certainly do not wish to see her power maintained,
cote qui cote
, returned the other, laughing; and in
this opinion, I believe, I may claim both these ladies as
allies.
6 *
Certainement!
exclaimed Mademoiselle Viefville, who
was a living proof that the feelings created by centuries of
animosity are not to be subdued by a few flourishes of
the pen.
As for me, Mr. Sharp, added Eve, you may
suppose
,
being an American girl, I cannot subscribe to the
right of any country to do us injustice; but I beg you will
not include me among those who wish to see the land of
my ancestors wronged, in aught that she may rightfully
claim as her due.
This is powerful support, and I shall rally to the
rescue
.
Seriously, then, will you allow me to inquire, sir, if
you think the right of England to the services of her
seamen
can be denied?
Seriously, then, Mr. Sharp, you must permit me to ask
if you mean by force, or by reason?
By the latter, certainly.
I think you have taken the weak side of the English
argument; the nature of the service that the subject, or
the citizen, as it is now the fashion to say at Paris,
mademoiselle
Tant pis
, muttered the governess.
Owes his government, continued the young man,
slightly glancing at Eve, at the interruption, is purely a
point of internal regulation. In England there is
compulsory
service for seamen without restriction, or what is
much the same, without an equal protection; in France, it
is compulsory service on a general plan; in America, as
respects seamen, the service is still voluntary.
Your pardon;will the institutions of America permit
impressment at all?
I should think, not indiscriminate impressment; though
I do not see why laws might not be enacted to compel drafts
for the ships of war, as well as for the army: but this is a
point that some of the professional gentlemen on board, if
there be any such, might better answer than myself.
The skill with which you have touched on these
subjects
to-night, had made me hope to have found such a one
in you; for to a traveller, it is always desirable to enter a
country with a little preparation, and a ship might offer as
much temptation to teach as to learn.
If you suppose me an
American lawyer
, you give me
credit for more than I can lay claim to.
As he hesitated, Eve wondered whether the slight
emphasis
he had laid on the two words we have italicised, was
heaviest on that which denoted the country, or on that
which denoted the profession.
I have been much in America, and have paid a little
attention to the institutions, but should be sorry to mislead
you into the belief that I am at all infallible on such points,
Mr. Blunt continued.
You were about to touch on impressment.
Simply to say that it is a municipal national power;
one in no degree dependent on general principles, and that
it can properly be exercised in no situation in which the
exercise of municipal or national powers is forbidden. I
can believe that this power may be exercised on board
American
ships in British watersor at least, that it is a more
plausible right in such situations; but I cannot think it can
be rightfully exercised anywhere else. I do not think
England
would submit to such a practice an hour, reversing the
case, and admitting her present strength: and an appeal of
this sort is a pretty good test of a principle.
Ay, ay, what is sauce for the goose is sauce for the
gander, as Vattel says, interrupted Captain Truck, who
had overheard the last speech or two: not that he says
this in so many words, but then, he has the sentiment at
large scattered throughout his writings. For that matter,
there is little that can be said on a subject that he does not
put before his readers, as plainly as Beachy Head lies
before the navigator of the British Channel. With
Bowditch
and Vattel, a man might sail round the globe, and
little fear of a bad landfall, or a mistake in principles. My
present object is to tell you, ladies, that the steward has
reported the supper in waiting for the honour of your
presence
.
Before quitting the deck, the party inquired into the state
of the chase, and the probable intentions of the
sloop-of-war
.
We are now on the great highway of nations,
returned
Mr. Truck, and it is my intention to travel it
without jostling, or being jostled. As for the sloop, she
is standing out under a press of canvas, and we are
standing from her, in nearly a straight line, in like
circumstances
.
She is some eight or ten miles astern of us,
and there is an old saying among seamen that `a stern
chase is a long chase.' I do not think our case is about to
make an exception to the rule. I shall not pretend to say
what will be the upshot of the matter; but there is not the
ship in the British navy that can gain ten miles on the
Montauk, in her present trim, and with this breeze, in as
many hours; so we are quit of her for the present.
The last words were uttered just as Eve put her foot on
the step to descend into the cabin.
CHAPTER VI.
Trin
. Stephano,
Steph
. Doth thy other mouth call me? Mercy! Mercy!
Tempest
.
The
life of a packet steward is one of incessant mixing
and washing, of interrogations and compoundings, all in a
space of about twelve feet square. These functionaries,
usually clever mulattoes who have caught the civilisation
of the kitchen, are busy from morning till night in their
cabins, preparing dishes, issuing orders, regulating courses,
starting corks, and answering questions. Apathy is the
great requisite for the station; for wo betide the wretch who
fancies any modicum of zeal, or good nature, can alone fit
him for the occupation. From the moment the ship sails
until that in which a range of the cable is overhauled, or
the chain is rowsed up in readiness to anchor, no smile
illumines his face, no tone issues from his voice while on
duty, but that of dogged routineof submission to those
above, or of snarling authority to those beneath him. As
the hour for the drink gelt, or buona mana,
approaches
,
however, he becomes gracious and smiling. On
his first appearance in the pantry of a morning, he has a
regular series of questions to answer, and for which, like
the dutiful Zeluco, who wrote all his letters to his mother
on the same day, varying the dates to suit the progress
of time, he not unfrequently has a regular set of answers
cut and dried, in his gastronomical mind. How's the
wind? How's the weather? How's her head? all
addressed to this standing almanack, are mere matters
of course, for which he is quite prepared, though it is by no
means unusual to hear him ordering a subordinate to go on
deck, after the answer is given, with a view to ascertain the
facts. It is only when the voice of the captain is heard
from his state-room, that he conceives himself bound to be
very particular, though such is the tact of all connected
with ships, that they instinctively detect the know
nothings
,
who are uniformly treated with an indifference
suited to their culpable ignorance. Even the old salt on
the forecastle has an instinct for a brother tar, though a
passenger, and a due respect is paid to Neptune in
answering
his inquiries, while half the time the maiden
traveller meets with a grave equivoque, a marvel, or a
downright mystification.
On the first morning out, the steward of the Montauk
commenced the dispensation of his news; for no sooner
was he heard rattling the glasses, and shuffling plates in
the pantry, than the attack was begun by Mr. Dodge, in
whom a laudable thirst after knowledge, as exemplified
in putting questions, was rather a besetting principle. This
gentleman had come out in the ship, as has been mentioned,
and unfortunately for the interest of his propensity, not
only the steward, but all on board, had, as it is expressed
in slang language, early taken the measure of his foot.
The result of his present application was the following
brief dialogue.
Steward, called out Mr. Dodge, through the blinds
of his state-room; whereabouts are we?
In the British Channel, sir.
I might have guessed that, myself.
So I s'pose, sir; nobody is better at guessing and
diwining
than Mr. Dodge.
But in what part of the Channel are we, Saunders?
About the middle, sir.
How far have we come to night?
From Portsmouth Roads to this place, sir.
Mr. Dodge was satisfied, and the steward, who would
not have dared to be so explicit with any other
cabin-passenger
,
continued coolly to mix an omelette. The next
attack
was made from the same room, by Sir George
Templemore
.
Steward, my good fellow, do you happen to know
whereabouts we are?
Certainly, sir; the land is still werry obwious.
Are we getting on cleverly?
Nicely
, sir; with a mincing emphasis on the first
word, that betrayed there was a little waggery about the
grave-looking mulatto.
And the sloop-of-war, steward?
Nicely too, sir.
There was a shuffling in the state-room, followed by a
silence. The door of Mr. Sharp's room was now opened
an inch or two, and the following questions issued through
the crevice:
Is the wind favourable, steward?
Just her character, sir.
Do you mean that the wind is favourable?
For the Montauk, sir; she's a persuader in this
breeze.
But is she going in the direction we wish?
If the gentleman wishes to perambulate America, it is
probable he will get there with a little patience.
Mr. Sharp pulled-to his door, and ten minutes passed
without further questions; the steward beginning to hope
the morning catechism was over, though he grumbled a
wish that gentlemen would turn out and take a look for
themselves. Now, up to this moment, Saunders knew no
more, than those who had just been questioning him of the
particular situation of the ship, in which he floated as
indifferent
to the whereabouts and the winds, as men sail in the
earth along its orbit, without bethinking them of parallaxes,
nodes, ecliptics, and solstices. Aware that it was about
time for the captain to be heard, he sent a subordinate on
deck, with a view to be ready to meet the usual questions
from his commander. A couple of minutes were sufficient
to put him
au courant
of the real state of things. The next
door that opened was that of Paul Blunt, however, who
thrust his head into the cabin, with all his dark curls in the
confusion of a night scene.
Steward!
Sir.
How's the wind?
Quite exhilarating, sir.
From what quarter?
About south, sir.
Is there much of it?
A prewailing breeze, sir.
And the sloop?
She's to leeward, sir, operating along as fast as she
can.
Steward!
Sir, stepping hurriedly out of his pantry, in order to
hear more distinctly.
Under what sail are we?
Topgallant sails, sir.
How's her head?
West-south-west, sir.
Delicious! Any news of the rover?
Hull down to leeward, sir, and on our quarter.
Staggering along, eh?
Quite like a disguised person, sir.
Better still. Hurry along that breakfast of yours, sir;
I am as hungry as a Troglodyte.
The honest captain had caught this word from a recent
treatise against agrarianism, and having an acquired taste
for orders in one sense, at least, he flattered himself with
being what is called a Conservative; in other words, he had
a strong relish for that maxim of the Scotch freebooter,
which is rendered into English by the homely aphorism of
keep what you've got, and get what you can.
A cessation of the interrogatories took place, and soon
after the passengers began to appear in the cabin, one by
one. As the first step is almost invariably to go on deck,
especially in good weather, in a few minutes nearly all of
the last night's party were again assembled in the open air,
a balm that none can appreciate but those who have
experienced
the pent atmosphere of a crowded vessel. The
steward had rendered a faithful account of the state of the
weather to the captain, who was now seen standing in the
main-rigging, looking at the clouds to windward, and at the
sloop-of-war to leeward, in the knowing manner of one who
was making comparisons materially to the disadvantage of
the latter.
The day was fine, and the Montauk, bearing her canvas
nobly, was, to use the steward's language, also staggering
along, under everything that would draw, from her
topgallant-sails
down, with the wind near two points forward of
the beam, or on an easy bowline. As there was but little
sea, her rate was quite nine knots, though varying with the
force of the wind. The cruiser had certainly followed them
thus far, though doubts began to be entertained whether she
was in chase, or merely bound like themselves to the
west-ward
;
a course common to all vessels that wish to clear
the Channel, even when it is intended to go south, as the
rocks and tides of the French coast are inconvenient
neighbours
in long nights.
Who knows, after all, that the cutter which tried to
board us, asked the captain aloud, belongs to the ship to
leeward?
I know the boat, sir, answered the second mate; and
the ship is the Foam.
Let her foam away, then, if she wishes to speak us.
Has any one tried her bearings since daylight?
We set her by the compass at six o'clock, sir, and she
has not varied her bearing, as far as from one belaying pin
to another, in three hours; but her hull rises fast: you can
now make out her ports, and at daylight the bottom of her
courses dipped.
Ay, ay, she is a light-going Foam, then! If that is
the case, she will be alongside of us by night.
In which event, captain, you will be obliged to give him
a broadside of Vattel, threw in John Effingham, in his
cool manner.
If that will answer his errand, he is welcome to as
much as he can carry. I begin to doubt, gentlemen,
whether
this fellow be not in earnest: in which case you may
have an opportunity of witnessing how ships are handled,
when seamen have their management. I have no objection
to setting the experience of a poor come-and-go sort of a
fellow, like myself, in opposition to the geometry and
Hamilton Moore of a young man-of-war's-man. I dare
say, now, yonder chap is a lord, or a lord's progeny, while
poor Jack Truck is just as you see him.
Do you not think half-an-hour of compliance on our
part might bring the matter to an amicable conclusion at
once? said Paul Blunt. Were we to run down to him,
the object of his pursuit could be determined in a few
minutes.
What! and abandon poor Davis to the rapacity of that
rascally attorney? generously exclaimed Sir George
Templemore
.
I would prefer paying the port charges myself,
run into the handiest French port, and let the honest fellow
escape!
There is no probability that a cruiser would attempt to
take a mere debtor from a foreign vessel on the open sea.
If there were no tobacco in the world, Mr. Blunt, I
might feel disposed to waive the categories, and show the
gentleman that courtesy, returned the captain, who was
preparing another cigar. But while the cruiser might not
feel authorised to take an absconding debtor from this
vessel
,
he might feel otherwise on the subject of tobacco,
provided
there has been an information for smuggling.
Captain Truck then explained, that the subordinates of
the packets frequently got their ships into trouble, by taking
adventures of the forbidden weed clandestinely into
European
ports, and that his ship, in such circumstances, would
lose her place in the line, and derange all the plans of the
company to which she belonged. He did the English
government the justice to say, that it had always
manifested
a liberal disposition not to punish the innocent for the
guilty; but were any such complaints actually in the wind,
he thought he could settle it with much less loss to himself
on his return, than on the day of sailing. While this
explanation
was delivered, a group had clustered round the
speaker, leaving Eve and her party on the opposite side of
the deck.
This last speech of Mr. Blunt's quite unsettles my
opinion
of his national character, as Vattel and our worthy
Vol. I.7
captain would say, remarked Mr. Sharp. Last night, I
set him down as a right loyal American; but I think it
would not be natural for a thorough-going countryman of
yours, Miss Effingham, to propose this act of courtesy to a
cruiser of King William.
How far any countrymen of mine, thorough-going or
not, have reason to manifest extreme courtesy to any of
your cruisers, Eve laughingly replied, I shall leave
Captain
Truck to say. But, with you, I have long been at a
loss to determine whether Mr. Blunt is an Englishman or
an American, or indeed, whether he be either.
Long, Miss Effingham! He then has the honour of
being well known to you?
Eve answered steadily, though the colour mounted to her
brow; but whether from the impetuous exclamation of her
companion, or from any feeling connected with the subject
of their conversation, the young man was at a loss to
discover
.
Long, as girls of twenty count timesome four or five
years; but you may judge how well, when I tell you I am
ignorant of his country even.
And may I venture to ask which do you, yourself, give
him credit for being, an American or an Englishman?
Eve's bright eyes laughed, as she answered, You have
put the question with so much finesse, and with a politeness
so well managed, that I should indeed be churlish to refuse
an answer:Nay, do not interrupt me, and spoil all the
good you have done by unnecessary protestations of
sincerity
.
All I wish to say is, to ask an explanation of a finesse,
of which I am quite as innocent as of any wish to draw
down upon myself the visitations of your displeasure.
Do you, then, really conceive it a
credit
to be an
American?
Nobody of less modesty than yourself, Miss
Effingham
,
under all the circumstances, would dream of asking
the question.
I thank you for the civility, which must be taken as it
is offered, I presume, quite as a thing
en rgle;
but to leave
our fine opinions of each other, as well as our prejudices,
out of the question
You will excuse me if I object to this, for I feel my
good sense implicated.
You
can hardly attribute to me
opinions so utterly unreasonable, so unworthy of a
gentleman
so
unfounded, in short! Am I not incurring all the
risks and hardships of a long sea-voyage, expressly to visit
your great country, and, I trust, to improve by its example
and society?
Since you appear to wish it, Mr. Sharp Eve glanced
her playful eye up at him as she pronounced the nameI
will be as credulous as a believer in animal magnetism: and
that, I fancy, is pushing credulity to the verge of reason.
It is now settled between us, that you do conceive it an
honour to be an American, born, educated, and by
extraction
.
All of which being the case with Miss Effingham.
All but the second; indeed, they write me fearful things
concerning this European education of mine: some even
go so far as to assure me I shall be quite unfitted to live in
the society to which I properly belong!
Europe will be rejoiced to receive you back again, in
that case; and no European more so than myself.
The beautiful colour deepened a little on the cheek of
Eve, but she made no immediate reply.
To return to our subject, she at length said; Were
I required to say, I should not be able to decide on the
country
of Mr. Blunt; nor have I ever met with any one who
appeared to know. I saw him first in Germany, where he
circulated in the best company; though no one seemed
acquainted with his history, even there. He made a good
figure; was quite at his ease; speaks several languages
almost as well as the natives of the different countries
themselves
;
and, altogether, was a subject of curiosity with
those who had leisure to think of any thing but their own
dissipation and folly.
Mr. Sharp listened with obvious gravity to the fair speaker,
and had not her own eyes been fastened on the deck, she
might have detected the lively interest betrayed in his.
Perhaps the feeling which was at the bottom of all this, to
a slight degree, influenced his answer.
Quite an Admirable Crichton!
I do not say that, though certainly expert in tongues
My own rambling life has made me acquainted with a few
languages, and I do assure you, this gentleman speaks three
or four with almost equal readiness, and with no perceptible
accent. I remember, at Vienna, many even believed him
to be a German.
What! with the name of Blunt?
Eve smiled, and her companion, who silently watched
every expression of her varying countenance, as if to read
her thoughts, noted it.
Names signify little in these migratory times, returned
the young lady. You have but to imagine a
von
before
it, and it would pass at Dresden, or at Berlin. Von Blunt,
der Edelgeborne Graf Von Blunt, Hofrath
or if you like
it better,
Geheimer Rath mit Excellenz und eure Gnaden
.
Or,
Baw-Berg-Veg-Inspector-Substitut!
added Mr.
Sharp, laughing. No, no! this will hardly pass. Blunt
is a good old English name; but it has not finesse enough
for Italian, German, Spanish, or anything else but John
Bull and his family.
I see no necessity, for my part, for all this Bluntishness;
the gentleman may think frankness a good travelling
quality.
Surely, he has not concealed his real name!
Mr. Sharp, Mr. Blunt; Mr. Blunt, Mr. Sharp;
rejoined
Eve, laughing until her bright eyes danced with
pleasure
.
There would be something ridiculous, indeed, in
seeing so much of the finesse of a master of ceremonies
subjected to so profound a mystification! I have been told
that passing introductions amount to little among you men,
and this would be a case in point.
I would I dared ask if it be really so.
Were I to be guilty of indiscretion in another's case,
you would not fail to distrust me in your own. I am,
moreover
,
a protestant, and abjure auricular confessions.
You will not frown if I inquire whether the rest of your
party remember him?
My father, Mademoiselle Viefville, and the excellent
Nanny Sidley, again; but, I think, none other of the
servants
,
as he never visited us. Mr. John Effingham was
travelling in Egypt at the time, and did not see him at all,
and we only met in general society; Nanny's acquaintance
was merely that of seeing him check his horse in the
Prater
,
to speak to us of a morning.
Poor fellow, I pity him; he has, at least, never had the
happiness of strolling on the shores of Como and the
islands of Laggo Maggiore in your company, or of
studying
the wonders of the Pitti and the Vatican.
If I must confess all, he journeyed with us on foot and
in boats an entire month, among the wonders of the
Oberland
,
and across the Wallenstadt. This was at a time
when we had no one with us but the regular guides and the
German courier, who was discharged in London.
Were it not for the impropriety of tampering with a
servant, I would cross the deck and question your good
Nanny, this moment! said Mr. Sharp with playful
menace. Of all torture, that of suspense is the hardest
to be borne.
I grant you full permission, and acquit you of all sins,
whether of disrespect, meanness, impertinence,
ungentlemanlike
practices, or any other vice that may be thought
to attend and characterize the act.
This formidable array of qualities would check the
curiosity of a village gossip!
It has an effect I did not intend, then; I wish you to put
your threat in execution.
Not seriously, surely?
Never more so. Take a favourable moment to speak
to the good soul, as an old acquaintance; she remembers
you well, and by a little of that interrogating management
you possess, a favourable opportunity may occur to bring
in the other subject. In the mean time, I will glance over
the pages of this book.
As Eve began to read, Mr. Sharp perceived she was in
earnest, and hesitating a moment, in doubt of the propriety
of the act, he yielded to her expressed desire, and strolled
carelessly towards the faithful old domestic. He addressed
her indifferently at first, until believing he might go further,
he smilingly observed that he believed he had seen her in
Italy. To this Nanny quietly assented, and when he
indirectly
added that it was under another name, she smiled,
but merely intimated her consciousness of the fact, by a
quick glance of the eye.
7 *
You know that travellers assume names for the sake
of avoiding curiosity, he added, and I hope you will not
betray me.
You need not fear me, sir; I meddle with little besides
my own duty, and so long as Miss Eve appears to think
there is no harm in it, I will venture to say it is no more
than a gentleman's caprice.
Why, that is the very word she applied to it herself!
You have caught the term from Miss Effingham.
Well, sir, and if I have, it is caught from one who deals
little harm to any.
I believe I am not the only one on board who travels
under a false name, if the truth were known?
Nanny looked first at the deck, then at her interrogator's
face, next towards Mr. Blunt, withdrawing her eye again,
as if guilty of an indiscretion, and finally at the sails.
Perceiving
her embarrassment, respecting her discretion, and
ashamed of the task he had undertaken, Mr. Sharp said a
few civil things suited to the condition of the woman, and
sauntering about the deck for a short time, to avoid
suspicion
,
soon found himself once more alongside of Eve. The
latter inquired with her eyes, a little exultingly perhaps,
concerning his success.
I have failed, he said; but something must be
ascribed to my own awkward diffidence; for there is so
much meanness in tampering with a servant, that I had not
the heart to push my questions, even while I am devoured
by curiosity.
Your fastidiousness is not a disease with which all on
board are afflicted, for there is at least one grand inquisitor
among us, by what I can learn; so take heed to your sins,
and above all, be very guarded of old letters, marks, and
other tell-tales, that usually expose impostors.
To all that, I believe, sufficient care has already been
had, by that other Dromio, my own man.
And in what way do you share the name between you?
Is it Dromio of Syracuse, and Dromio of Ephesus? or does
John call himself Fitz-Edward, or Mortimer, or De
Courey?
He has complaisance enough to make the passage with
nothing but a Christian name, I believe. In truth, it was
by a mere accident that I turned usurper in this way. He
took the state-room for me, and being required to give a
name, he gave his own, as usual. When I went to the
docks to look at the ship, I was saluted as Mr. Sharp, and
then the conceit took me of trying how it would wear for
a month or six weeks. I would give the world to know if
the
Geheimer Rath
got his cognomen in the same honest
manner.
I think not, as his man goes by the pungent title of
Pepper. Unless poor John should have occasion for two
names during the passage, you are reasonably safe. And,
still, I think, continued Eve, biting her lips, like one who
deliberated, if it were any longer polite to bet, Mr. John
Effingham would hazard all the French gloves in his trunks,
against all the English finery in yours, that the inquisitor
just hinted at gets at your secret before we arrive. Perhaps
I ought rather to say, ascertains that you are not Mr. Sharp,
and that Mr. Blunt is.
Her companion entreated her to point out the person to
whom she had given the
sobriquet
she mentioned.
Accuse me of giving nicknames to no one. The man
has this title from Mademoiselle Viefville, and his own great
deeds. It is a certain Mr. Steadfast Dodge, who, it seems,
knows something of us, from the circumstance of living in
the same county, and who, from knowing a little in this
comprehensive manner, is desirous of knowing a great deal
more.
The natural result of all useful knowledge.
Mr. John Effingham, who is apt to fling sarcasms at
all lands, his native country included, affirms that this
gentleman
is but a fair specimen of many more it will be our
fortune to meet in America. If so, we shall not long be
strangers; for according to Mademoiselle Viefville and my
good Nanny, he has already communicated to them a
thousand
interesting particulars of himself, in exchange for
which he asks no more than the reasonable compensation
of having all his questions concerning us truly answered.
This is certainly alarming intelligence, and I shall take
heed accordingly.
If he discover that John is without a surname, I am far
from certain he will not prepare to have him arraigned for
some high crime or misdemeanour; for Mr. John Effingham
maintains that the besetting propensity of all this class is
to divine the worst the moment their imaginations cease to
be fed with facts. All is false with them, and it is flattery
or accusation.
The approach of Mr. Blunt caused a cessation of the
discourse
,
Eve betraying a slight degree of sensitiveness about
admitting him to share in these little asides, a circumstance
that her companion observed, not without satisfaction. The
discourse now became general, the person who joined them
amusing the others with an account of several proposals
already made by Mr. Dodge, which, as he expressed it, in
making the relation, manifested the strong
community-characteristics
of an American. The first proposition was
to take a vote to ascertain whether Mr. Van Buren or Mr.
Harrison was the greatest favourite of the passengers; and,
on this being defeated, owing to the total ignorance of so
many on board of both the parties he had named, he had
suggested the expediency of establishing a society to
ascertain
daily the precise position of the ship. Captain Truck
had thrown cold water on the last proposal, however, by
adding to it what, among legislators, is called a rider;
he having drily suggested that one of the duties of the said
society should be to ascertain also the practicability of
wading across the Atlantic.
CHAPTER VII.
When clouds are seen, wise men put on their cloaks;
When great leaves fall, then winter is at hand;
When the sun sets, who doth not look for night?
Untimely storms make men expect a dearth:
All may be well; but if God sort it so,
'T is more than we deserve, or I expect.
Richard
III.
These
conversations, however, were mere episodes of
the great business of the passage. Throughout the
morning
,
the master was busy in rating his mates, giving sharp
reprimands to the stewards and cooks, overhauling the
log-line
,
introducing the passengers, seeing to the stowage of
the anchors, in getting down the signal-pole, throwing in
touches of Vattel, and otherwise superintending duty, and
dispensing opinions. All this time, the cat in the grass does
not watch the bird that hops along the ground with keener
vigilance than he kept his eye on the Foam. To an
ordinary
observer, the two ships presented the familiar
spectacle
of vessels sailing in the same direction, with a very
equal rate of speed; and as the course was that necessary
to clear the Channel, most of the passengers, and, indeed,
the greater part of the crew, began to think the cruiser,
like themselves, was merely bound to the westward. Mr.
Truck, on the contrary, judging by signs and movements
that more naturally suggested themselves to one accustomed
to direct the evolutions of a ship, and to reason on their
objects, than to the mere subjects of his will, thought
differently
.
To him, the motive of the smallest change on board
the sloop-of-war was as intelligible as if it had been
explained
in words, and he even foresaw many that were
about to take place. Before noon, the Foam had got fairly
abeam, and Mr. Leach, pointing out the circumstance,
observed
,
that if her wish was to overhaul them, she ought
then to tack; it being a rule among seamen, that the
pursuing
vessel should turn to windward as often as she found
herself nearest to her chase. But the experience of
Captain
Truck taught him better; the tide was setting into the
Channel on the flood, and the wind enabled both ships to
take the current on their lee-bows, a power that forced them
up to windward; whereas, by tacking, the Foam would
receive the force of the stream on her weather broadside,
or so nearly so, as to sweep her farther astern than her
difference in speed could easily repair.
She has the heels of us, and she weathers on us, as it
is, grumbled the master; and that might satisfy a man
less modest. I have led the gentleman such a tramp already
that he will be in none of the best humours when he comes
alongside, and we may make up our minds on seeing
Portsmouth
again before we see New-York, unless a slant of
wind, or the night, serve us a good turn. I trust, Leach,
you have not been destroying your prospects in life by
looking too wistfully at a tobacco-field?
Not I, sir; and if you will give me leave to say it,
Captain Truck, I do not think a plug has been landed from
the ship, which did not go ashore in a
bona-fide
tobacco-box
,
that might appear in any court in England. The
people will swear, to a man, that this is true.
Ay, ay! and the Barons of the Exchequer would be
the greatest fools in England not to believe them. If there
has been no defrauding the revenue, why does a cruiser
follow this ship, a regular packet, to sea?
This affair of the steerage passenger, Davis, sir, is
probably the cause. The man may be heavily in debt, or
possibly a defaulter; for these rogues, when they break
down, often fall lower than the 'twixt decks of a ship like
this.
This will do to put the quarter-deck and cabin in good
humour at sailing, and give them something to open an
acquaintance
with; but it is sawdust to none but your new
beginners. I have known that Seal this many a year, and
the rogue never yet had a case that touched the
quarter-deck
.
It is as the man and his wife say, and I'll not give
them up, out here in blue water, for as much foam as lies
on Jersey beach after an easterly blow. It will not be any
of the family of Davis that will satisfy yonder wind-eater;
but he will lay his hand on the whole family of the
Montauk
,
leaving them the agreeable alternative of going back
to Portsmouth in his pleasant society, or getting out here in
mid-channel, and wading ashore as best they can. D
me! if I believe, Leach, that Vattel will bear the fellow out
in it, even if there has been a whole hogshed of the leaves
trundled into his island without a permit!
To this Mr. Leach had no encouraging answer to make,
for, like most of his class, he held practical force in much
greater respect than the abstractions of books. He deemed
it prudent, therefore, to be silent, though greatly doubting
the efficacy of a quotation from any authority on board,
when fairly put in opposition to a written order from the
admiral at Portsmouth, or even to a signal sent down from
the Admiralty at London.
The day wore away, making a gradual change in the
relative positions of the two ships, though so slowly, as to
give Captain Truck strong hopes of being able to dodge
his pursuer in the coming night, which promised to be dark
and squally. To return to Portsmouth was his full
intention
,
but not until he had first delivered his freight and
passengers
in New-York; for, like all men bound up body and
soul in the performance of an especial duty, he looked on
a frustration of his immediate object as a much greater
calamity than even a double amount of more remote evil.
Besides, he felt a strong reliance on the liberality of the
English authorities in the end, and had little doubt of being
able to extricate himself and his ship from any penalties to
which the indiscretion or cupidity of his subordinates might
have rendered him liable.
Just as the sun dipped into the watery track of the
Montauk
,
most of the cabin passengers again appeared on deck,
to take a look at the situation of the two vessels, and to
form their own conjectures as to the probable result of the
adventure. By this time the Foam had tacked twice, once
to weather upon the wake of her chase, and again to
resume
her line of pursuit. The packet was too good a ship
to be easily overtaken, and the cruiser was now nearly
hull-down
astern, but evidently coming up at a rate that would
bring her alongside before morning. The wind blew in
squalls, a circumstance that always aids a vessel of war,
as the greater number of her hands enables them to make
and shorten sail with ease and rapidity.
This unsettled weather is as much as a mile an hour
against us, observed Captain Truck, who was far from
pleased at the fact of his being outsailed by anything that
floated; and, if truth must be said, I think that fellow has
somewhere about half a knot the best of it, in the way of
foot, on a bowline and with this breeze. But he has no
cargo in, and they trim their boats like steel-yards. Give
us more wind, or a freer, and I would leave him to digest
his orders, as a shark digests a marling-spike, or a
ring-bolt
,
notwithstanding all his advantages; for little good
would it then do him to be trying to run into the wind's
eye, like a steam-tug. As it is, we must submit. We are
certainly in a category, and be dd to it!
It was one of those wild-looking sunsets that are so
frequent
in the autumn, in which appearances are worse,
perhaps, than the reality. The ships were now so near the
Chops of the Channel that no land was visible, and the
entire horizon presented that chill and wintry aspect that
belongs to gloomy and driving clouds, to which streaks of
dull light serve more to give an appearance of infinite space
than any of the relief of brightness. It was a dreary
night-fall to a landsman's eye; though they who better
understood
the signs of the heavens, as they are exhibited on
the ocean, saw little more than the promise of obscurity,
and the usual hazards of darkness in a much-frequented sea.
This will be a dirty night, observed John Effingham,
and we may have occasion to bring in some of the
flaunting
vanity of the ship, ere another morning returns.
The vessel appears to be in good hands, returned Mr.
Effingham: I have watched them narrowly; for, I know
not why, I have felt more anxiety on the occasion of this
passage than on any of the nine I have already made.
As he spoke, the tender father unconsciously bent his eyes
on Eve, who leaned affectionately on his arm, steadying
her light form against the pitching of the vessel. She
understood
his feelings better than he did himself, possibly,
since, accustomed to his fondest care from childhood, she
well knew that he seldom thought of others, or even of
himself, while her own wants or safety appealed to his
unwearying
love.
Father, she said, smiling in his wistful face, we
have seen more troubled waters than these, far, and in a
much frailer vessel. Do you not remember the
Wallenstadt
and its miserable skiff? where I have heard you say
there was really danger, though we escaped from it all with
a little fright.
Perfectly well do I recollect it, love, nor have I
forgotten
our brave companion, and his good service, at that
critical moment. But for his stout arm and timely succour
we might not, as you say, have been quit for the fright.
Although Mr. Effingham looked only at his daughter,
while speaking, Mr. Sharp, who listened with interest, saw
the quick, retreating, glance of Eve at Paul Blunt, and felt
something like a chill in his blood as he perceived that her
own cheeks seemed to reflect the glow which appeared on
that of the young man. He alone observed this secret
evidence
of common interest in some event in which both had
evidently been actors, those around them being too much
occupied in the arrangements of the ship, and too little
suspicious
,
to heed the trifling circumstance. Captain Truck
had ordered all hands called, to make sail, to the surprise
of even the crew. The vessel, at the moment, was
staggering
along under as much canvas as she could apparently
bear, and the mates looked aloft with inquiring eyes, as if
to ask what more could be done.
The master soon removed all doubts. With a rapidity
that is not common in merchant ships, but which is usual
enough in the packets, the lower studding-sails, and two
top-mast-studding-sails
were prepared, and made ready for
hoisting. As soon as the words all ready were uttered,
the helm was put up, the sails were set, and the Montauk
was running with a free wind towards the narrow passage
between the Scilly Islands and the Land's End. Captain
Truck was an expert channel pilot, from long practice, and
keeping the run of the tides in his head, he had loosely
calculated
that his vessel had so much offing as, with a free
wind, and the great progress she had made in the last
twenty-four hours, would enable him to lay through the
pass.
'Tis a ticklish hole to run into in a dirty night, with a
staggering breeze, he said, rubbing his hands as if the
hazard increased his satisfaction, and we will now see if
this Foam has mettle enough to follow.
The chap has a quick eye and good glasses, even
though he should want nerve for the Scilly rocks, cried
the mate, who was looking out from the mizzen rigging.
There go his stun'-sails already, and a plenty of them!
Sure enough the cruiser threw out her studding-sails, had
them full and drawing in five minutes, and altered her
course so as to follow the Montauk. There was now no
longer any doubt concerning her object; for it was hardly
possible two vessels should adopt so bold a step as this, just
at dark, and on such a night, unless the movements of one
were regulated by the movements of the other.
In the mean time, anxious faces began to appear on the
quarter-deck, and Mr. Dodge was soon seen moving
Vol. I.  8
stealthily about among the passengers, whispering here,
cornering there, and seemingly much occupied in
canvassing
opinions on the subject of the propriety of the step that
the master had just taken; though, if the truth must be
told, he rather stimulated opposition than found others
prepared
to meet his wishes. When he thought, however, he
had collected a sufficient number of suffrages to venture on
an experiment, that nothing but an inherent aversion to
shipwreck and a watery grave could embolden him to
make, he politely invited the captain to a private conference
in the state-room occupied by himself and Sir George
Templemore
.
Changing the
venue
, as the lawyers term it, to
his own little apartment,no master of a packet willingly
consenting to transact business in any other placeCaptain
Truck, who was out of cigars at the moment, very
willingly
assented.
When the two were seated, and the door of the room was
closed, Mr. Dodge carefully snuffed the candle, looked about
him to make sure there was no eave's-dropper in a room
eight feet by seven, and then commenced his subject, with
what he conceived to be a commendable delicacy and
discretion
.
Captain Truck, he said, in the sort of low confidential
tone that denotes equally concern and mystery, I think
by this time you must have set me down as one of your
warm and true friends and supporters. I came out in your
ship, and, please God we escape the perils of the sea, it is
my hope and intention to return home in her.
If not, friend Dodge, returned the master, observing
that the other paused to note the effect of his peroration, and
using a familiarity in his address that the acquaintance of
the former passage had taught him was not misapplied; if
not, friend Dodge, you have made a capital mistake in
getting
on board of her, as it is by no means probable an
occasion
will offer to get out of her, until we fall in with a
news-boat, or a pilot-boat, at least somewhere in the
latitude
and longitude of Sandy Hook. You smoke, I believe,
sir?
I ask no better, returned Steadfast, declining the offer;
I have told every one on the Continent,Mr. Dodge
had been to Paris, Geneva, along the Rhine, and through
Belgium and Holland, and in his eyes, this was the
Continest
,that
no better ship or captain sails the ocean; and
you know captain, I have a way with me, when I please,
that causes what I say to be remembered. Why, my dear
sir, I had an article extolling the whole line in the most
appropriate
terms, and this ship in particular, put into the
journal at Rotterdam. It was so well done, that not a soul
suspected it came from a personal friend of yours.
The captain was rolling the small end of a cigar in his
mouth to prepare it for smoking, the regulations of the ship
forbidding any further indulgence below; but when he
received
this assurance, he withdrew the tobacco with the
sort of mystifying simplicity that gets to be a second nature
with a regular votary of Neptune, and answered with a
coolness of manner that was in ridiculous contrast to the
affected astonishment of the words:
The devil you did!Was it in good Dutch?
I do not understand much of the language, said Mr.
Dodge, hesitatingly; for all he knew, in truth, was
yaw
and
nein
, and neither of these particularly well;but it looked to
be uncommonly well expressed. I could do no more than
pay a man to translate it. But to return to this affair of
running in among the Scilly Islands such a night as this.
Return, my good fellow! this is the first syllable you
have said about the matter!
Concern on your account has caused me to forget
myself
.
To be frank with you, Captain Truck, and if I
wer'n't your very best friend I should be silent, there is
considerable excitement getting up about this matter.
Excitement! what is that like?a sort of moral
head-sea
,
do you mean?
Precisely: and I must tell you the truth, though I had
rather a thousand times not; but this change in the ship's
course is monstrous unpopular!
That is bad news, with a vengeance, Mr. Dodge; I
shall rely on you, as an old friend, to get up an
opposition
.
My dear captain, I have done all I could in that way
already; but I never met with people so bent on a thing as
most of the passengers. The Effinghams are very decided,
though so purse-proud and grand; Sir George Templemore
declares it is quite extraordinary, and even the French lady
is furious. To be as sincere as the crisis demands, public
opinion is setting so strong against you, that I expect an
explosion.
Well, so long as the tide sets in my favour, I must
endeavour to bear it. Stemming a current, in or out of
water, is up-hill work; but with a good bottom, clean
copper
,
and plenty of wind, it may be done.
It would not surprise me were the gentlemen to appeal
to the general sentiment against you when we arrive, and
make a handle of it against your line!
It may be so indeed; but what can be done? If we
return, the Englishman will certainly catch us, and, in that
case, my own opinion would be dead against me!
Well, well, captain; I thought as a friend I would
speak my mind. If this thing should really get into the
papers in America, it would spread like fire in the prairies.
You know what the papers are, I trust, Captain Truck?
I rather think I do, Mr. Dodge, with many thanks for
your hints, and I believe I know what the Scilly Islands
are, too. The elections will be nearly or quite over by the
time we get in, and, thank God, they'll not be apt to make
a party question of it, this fall at least. In the mean time
rely on my keeping a good look-out for the shoals of
popularity
,
and the quicksands of excitement. You smoke
sometimes, I know, and I can recommend this cigar as fit
to regale the nose of that chap of Strasbourgyou read
your Bible, I know, Mr. Dodge, and need not be told whom
I mean. The steward will be happy to give you a light on
deck, sir.
In this manner, Captain Truck, with the
sang froid
of
an old tar, and the tact of a packet-master, got rid of his
troublesome visiter, who departed, half suspecting that he
had been quizzed, but still ruminating on the expediency of
getting up a committee, or at least a public meeting in the
cabin, to follow up the blow. By the aid of the latter,
could he but persuade Mr. Effingham to take the chair, and
Sir George Templemore to act as secretary, he thought he
might escape a sleepless night, and, what was of quite as
much importance, make a figure in a paragraph on
reaching
home.
Mr. Dodge, whose Christian name, thanks to a pious
ancestry
,
was Steadfast, partook of the qualities that his two
appellations not inaptly expressed. There was a singular
profession of steadiness of purpose, and of high principle
about him, all of which vanished in Dodge at the close. A
great stickler for the rights of the people, he never
considered
that this people was composed of many integral parts,
but he viewed all things as gravitating towards the great
aggregation. Majorities were his hobbies, and though
singularly
timid as an individual, or when in the minority, put
him on the strongest side and he was ready to face the
devil. In short, Mr. Dodge was a people's man, because
his strongest desire, his ambition and his pride, as he
often expressed it, was to be a man of the people. In his
particular neighbourhood, at home, sentiment ran in veins,
like gold in the mines, or in streaks of public opinion; and
though there might be three or four of these public
sentiments
,
so long as each had its party, no one was afraid to
avow it; but as for maintaining a notion that was not thus
upheld, there was a savour of aristocracy about it that
would damn even a mathematical proposition, though
regularly
solved and proved. So much and so long had Mr.
Dodge respired a moral atmosphere of this
community-character
,
and gregarious propensity, that he had, in many
things, lost all sense of his individuality; as much so, in
fact, as if he breathed with a pair of county lungs, ate with
a common mouth, drank from the town-pump, and slept in
the open air.
Such a man was not very likely to make an impression
on Captain Truck, one accustomed to rely on himself alone,
in the face of warring elements, and who knew that a ship
could not safely have more than a single will, and that the
will of her master.
The accidents of life could scarcely form extremes of
character more remote than that of Steadfast Dodge and
that of John Truck. The first never did anything beyond
acts of the most ordinary kind, without first weighing its
probable effect in the neighbourhood; its popularity or
unpopularity
;
how it might tally with the different public
opinions that were whiffling through the county; in what
manner it would influence the next election, and whether it
8 *
would be likely to elevate him or depress him in the public
mind. No Asiatic slave stood more in terror of a
vindictive
master than Mr. Dodge stood in fear and trembling
before
the reproofs, comments, censures, frowns, cavillings and
remarks of every man in his county, who happened to
belong
to the political party that just at that moment was in
power. As to the minority, he was as brave as a lion,
could snap his fingers at them, and was foremost in deriding
and scoffing at all they said and did. This, however, was
in connexion with politics only; for, the instant party-drill
ceased to be of value, Steadfast's valour oozed out of his
composition, and in all other things he dutifully consulted
every public opinion of the neighbourhood. This estimable
man had his weak points as well as another, and what is
more, he was quite sensible of them, as was proved by a
most jealous watchfulness of his besetting sins, in the way
of exposure if not of indulgence. In a word, Steadfast
Dodge was a man that wished to meddle with and
control
all things, without possessing precisely the spirit that
was necessary to leave him master of himself; he had a
rabid desire for the good opinion of every thing human,
without always taking the means necessary to preserve his
own; was a stout declaimer for the rights of the
community
,
while forgetting that the community itself is but a
means set up for the accomplishment of a given end; and
felt an inward and profound respect for everything that was
beyond his reach, which manifested itself, not in manly
efforts to attain the forbidden fruit, but rather in a spirit of
opposition and detraction, that only betrayed, through its
jealousy, the existence of the feeling, which jealousy,
however
,
he affected to conceal under an intense regard for
popular rights, since he was apt to aver it was quite
intolerable
that any man should possess anything, even to
qualities
,
in which his neighbours might not properly participate.
All these, moreover, and many similar traits, Mr. Dodge
encouraged in the spirit of liberty!
On the other hand, John Truck sailed his own ship; was
civil to his passengers from habit as well as policy; knew
that every vessel must have a captain; believed mankind to
be little better than asses; took his own observations, and
cared not a straw for those of his mates; was never more
bent on following his own views than when all hands
grumbled
and opposed him; was daring by nature, decided from
use and long self-reliance, and was every way a man fitted
to steer his bark through the trackless ways of life, as well
as those of the ocean. It was fortunate for one in his
particular
position, that nature had made the possessor of so
much self-will and temporary authority, cool and sarcastic
rather than hot-headed and violent; and for this
circumstance
Mr. Dodge in particular had frequent occasions for
felicitation.
CHAPTER VII.
But then we are in order, when we are
Most out of order.
Jack Cade
.
Disappointed
in his private appeal to the captain's dread
of popular disapprobation, Mr. Dodge returned to his secret
work on deck; for like a true freeman of the exclusive
school, this person never presumed to work openly, unless
sustained by a clear majority; canvassing all around him,
and striving hard to create a public opinion, as he termed
it, on his side of the question, by persuading his hearers
that every one was of his particular way of thinking
already
;
a method of exciting a feeling much practised by
partisans of his school. In the interval, Captain Truck
was working up his day's reckoning by himself, in his own
state-room, thinking little, and caring less, about any thing
but the results of his figures, which soon convinced him,
that by standing a few hours longer on his present course,
he should plump his ship ashore somewhere between
Falmouth and the Lizard.
This discovery annoyed the worthy master so much the
more, on account of the suggestions of his late visiter; for
nothing could be less to his taste than to have the
appearance
of altering his determination under a menace. Still
something must be done before midnight, for he plainly
perceived
that thirty or forty miles, at the farthest, would
fetch up the Montauk on her present course. The
passengers
had left the deck to escape the night air, and he
heard the Effinghams inviting Mr. Sharp and Mr. Blunt
into the ladies' cabin, which had been taken expressly for
their party, while the others were calling upon the stewards
for the usual allowance of hot drinks, at the dining-table
without. The talking and noise disturbed him; his own
state-room became too confined, and he went on deck to
come to his decision, in view of the angry-looking skies
and the watery waste, over which he was called to prevail.
Here we shall leave him, pacing the quarter-deck, in moody
silence alone, too much disturbed to smoke even, while the
mate of the watch sat in the mizzen-rigging, like a monkey,
keeping a look-out to windward and ahead. In the mean
time, we will return to the cabin of the Effinghams.
The Montauk was one of the noblest of those
surpassingly
beautiful and yacht-like ships that now ply between
the two hemispheres in such numbers, and which in luxury
and the fitting conveniences seem to vie with each other for
the mastery. The cabins were lined with satin-wood and
bird's-eye maple; small marble columns separated the
glittering panels of polished wood, and rich carpets covered
the floors. The main cabin had the great table, as a
fixture
,
in the centre, but that of Eve, somewhat shorter, but
of equal width, was free from all encumbrance of the sort.
It had its sofas, cushions, mirrors, stools, tables, and an
upright piano. The doors of the state-rooms, and other
conveniences, opened on its sides and ends. In short, it
presented, at that hour, the resemblance of a tasteful
boudoir
,
rather than that of an apartment in a cramped and
vulgar ship.
Here, then, all who properly belonged to the place were
assembled, with Mr. Sharp and Mr. Blunt as guests, when
a tap at the door announced another visiter. It was Mr.
Dodge, begging to be admitted on a matter of business.
Eve smiled, as she bowed assent to old Nanny, who acted
as her groom of the chambers, and hastily expressed a
belief
that her guest must have come with a proposal to form
a Dorcas society.
Although Mr. Dodge was as bold as Csar in expressing
his contempt of anything but popular sway, he never came
into the presence of the quiet and well-bred without a
feeling
of distrust and uneasiness, that had its rise in the
simple
circumstance of his not being used to their company.
Indeed, there is nothing more appalling, in general, to the
vulgar and pretending, than the simplicity and natural ease
of the refined. Their own notions of elegance lie so much
on the surface, that they seem at first to suspect an ambush,
and it is probable that, finding so much repose where,
agreeably to their preconceived opinions, all ought to be
fuss and pretension, they imagine themselves to be regarded
as intruders.
Mr. Effingham gave their visiter a polite reception, and
one that was marked with a little more than the usual
formality
,
by way of letting it be understood that the apartment
was private; a precaution that he knew was very necessary
in associating with tempers like those of Steadfast. All this
was thrown away on Mr. Dodge, notwithstanding every
other person present admired the tact with which the host
kept his guest at a distance, by extreme attention, for the
latter fancied so much ceremony was but a homage to his
claims. It had the effect to put him on his own good
behaviour
,
however, and of suspending the brusque manner in
which he had intended to broach his subject. As every
body waited in calm silence, as if expecting an explanation
of the cause of his visit, Mr. Dodge soon felt himself
constrained
to say something, though it might not be quite as
clearly as he could wish.
We have had a considerable pleasant time, Miss
Effingham
,
since we sailed from Portsmouth, he observed
familiarly
.
Eve bowed her assent, determined not to take to herself
a visit that did violence to all her habits and notions of
propriety
.
But Mr. Dodge was too obtuse to feel the hint
conveyed
in mere reserve of manner.
It would have been more agreeable, I allow, had not
this man-of-war taken it into her head to follow us in this
unprecedented manner. Mr. Dodge was as fond of his
dictionary as the steward, though he belonged to the
political
,
while Saunders merely adorned the polite school of
talkers. Sir George calls it a most `uncomfortable
procedure
.'
You know Sir George Templemore, without
doubt, Miss Effingham?
I am aware there is a person of that name on board,
sir, returned Eve, who recoiled from this familiarity with
the sensitiveness with which a well-educated female
distinguishes
between one who appreciates her character and one
who does not; but have never had the honour of his
acquaintance
.
Mr. Dodge thought all this extraordinary, for he had
witnessed Captain Truck's introduction, and did not
understand
how people who had sailed twenty-four hours in the
same ship, and had been fairly introduced, should not be
intimate. As for himself, he fancied he was, what he
termed, well acquainted with the Effinghams, from
having
talked of them a great deal ignorantly, and not a little
maliciously; a liberty he felt himself fully entitled to take,
from the circumstance of residing in the same county,
although
he had never spoken to one of the family, until
accident
placed him in their company on board the same
vessel.
Sir George is a gentleman of great accomplishments,
Miss Effingham, I assure you; a man of unqualified merit.
We have the same state-room, for I like company, and
prefer
chatting a little in my berth to being always asleep. He
is a baronet, I suppose you know,not that I care
anything
for titles, all men being equal in truth, though
though
Unequal in reality, sir, you probably meant to add,
observed John Effingham, who was lolling on Eve's
workstand
,
his eagle-shaped face fairly curling with the
contempt
he felt, and which he hardly cared to conceal.
Surely not, sir! exclaimed the terrified Steadfast,
looking furtively about, lest some active enemy might be
at hand to quote this unhappy remark to his prejudice.
Surely not! men are every way equal, and no one can
pretend to be better than another. No, no,it is nothing
to me that Sir George is a baronet; though one would
prefer
having a gentleman in the same state-room to having a
coarse fellow. Sir George thinks, sir, that the ship is
running
into great danger by steering for the land in so dark
a night, and in such
dirty
weather. He
has
many
out-of-the-way
expressions, Sir George, I must admit, for one of
his rank; he calls the weather
dirty
, and the proceedings
uncomfortable;
modes of expression, gentlemen, to which
I give an unqualified disapprobation.
Probably Sir George would attach more importance to
a
qualified
disapprobation, retorted John Effingham.
Quite likely, returned Mr. Dodge innocently, though the
two other visiters, Eve and Mademoiselle Viefville, permitted
slight muscular movements about the lips to be seen: Sir
George is quite an original in his way. We have few
originals
in our part of the country, you know, Mr. John
Effingham; for to say the truth, it is rather unpopular to
differ from the neighbourhood, in this or any other respect.
Yes, sir, the people will rule, and ought to rule. Still, I
think Sir George may get along well enough as a stranger,
for it is not quite as unpopular in a stranger to be original,
as in a native. I think you will agree with me, sir, in
believing
it excessively presuming in an American to pretend
to be different from his fellow-citizens.
No one, sir, could entertain such presumption, I am
persuaded, in your case.
No, sir, I do not speak from personal motives; but on
the great general principles, that are to be maintained for
the good of mankind. I do not know that any man has a
right to be peculiar in a free country. It is aristocratic,
and has an air of thinking one man is better than another.
I am sure Mr. Effingham cannot approve of it?
Perhaps not. Freedom has many arbitrary laws that
it will not do to violate.
Certainly, sir, or where would be its supremacy? If
the people cannot control and look down peculiarity, or
anything
they dislike, one might as well live in despotism at
once.
As I have resided much abroad, of late years, Mr.
Dodge, inquired Eve, who was fearful her kinsman would
give some cut that would prove to be past bearing, as she
saw his eye was menacing, and who felt a disposition to be
amused at the other's philosophy, that overcame the
attraction
of repulsion she had at first experienced towards him
will you favour me with some of those great principles
of liberty of which I hear so much, but which, I fear, have
been overlooked by my European instructers?
Mademoiselle Viefville looked grave; Messrs. Sharp and
Blunt delighted; Mr. Dodge, himself, mystified.
I should feel myself little able to instruct Miss
Effingham
on such a subject, the latter modestly replied, as no
doubt she has seen too much misery in the nations she has
visited, not to appreciate justly all the advantages of that
happy country which has the honour of claiming her for
one of its fair daughters.
Eve was terrified at her own temerity, for she was far
from anticipating so high a flight of eloquence in return for
her own simple request, but it was too late to retreat.
None of the many illustrious and god-like men that
our own beloved land has produced can pretend to more
zeal in its behalf than myself, but I fear my abilities to do
it justice will fall far short of the subject, he continued.
Liberty, as you know, Miss Effingham, as you well know,
gentlemen, is a boon that merits our unqualified gratitude,
and which calls for our daily and hourly thanks to the
gallant
spirits who, in the days that tried men's souls, were
foremost in the tented field, and in the councils of the nation.
John Effingham turned a glance at Eve, that seemed to
tell her how unequal she was to the task she had
undertaken
,
and which promised a rescue, with her consent; a
condition that the young lady most gladly complied with in
the same silent but expressive manner.
Of all this my young kinswoman is properly sensible,
Mr. Dodge, he said by way of diversion; but she, and I
confess myself, have some little perplexity on the subject
of what this liberty is, about which so much has been said
and written in our time. Permit me to inquire, if you
understand
by it a perfect independence of thought, action,
and rights?
Equal laws, equal rights, equality in all respects, and
pure, abstract, unqualified liberty, beyond all question, sir.
What, a power in the strong man to beat the little man,
and to take away his dinner?
By no means, sir; Heaven forbid that I should
maintain
any such doctrine! It means entire liberty: no kings,
no aristocrats, no exclusive privileges; but one man as good
as another!
Do you understand, then, that one man is as good as
another, under our system, Mr. Dodge?
Unqualifiedly so, sir; I am amazed that such a question
should be put by a gentleman of your information, in an
age like this!
If one man is as good as another, said Mr. Blunt, who
perceived that John Effingham was biting his lips, a sign
that something more biting would follow,will you do
me the favour to inform me, why the country puts itself to
the trouble and expense of the annual elections?
Elections, sir! In what manner could free institutions
flourish or be maintained, without constantly appealing to
the people, the only true sources of power?
To this I make no objections, Mr. Dodge, returned the
young man, smiling; but why an election; if one man
is as good as another, a lottery would be cheaper, easier,
and sooner settled. Why an election, or even a lottery at
all? why not choose the President as the Persians chose
their king, by the neighing of a horse?
This would be indeed an extraordinary mode of
proceeding
for an intelligent and virtuous people, Mr. Blunt;
and I must take the liberty of saying that I suspect you of
pleasantry. If you wish an answer, I will say, at once,
by such a process we might get a knave, or a fool, or a
traitor.
How, Mr. Dodge! I did not expect this character of
the country from you! Are the Americans, then, all fools,
or knaves, or traitors?
If you intend to travel much in our country, sir, I would
advise great caution in throwing out such an insinuation,
for it would be apt to meet with a very general and
unqualified
disapprobation. Americans are enlightened and free,
and as far from deserving these epithets as any people on
earth.
And yet the fact follows from your own theory. If one
man is as good as another, and any one of them is a fool,
or a knave, or a traitor,all are knaves, or fools, or
traitors
!
The insinuation is not mine, but it follows, I think,
inevitably, as a consequence of your own proposition.
Vol. I.  9
In the pause that succeeded, Mr. Sharp said in a low
voice to Eve, He is an Englishman, after all!
Mr. Dodge does not mean that one man is as good as
another in that particular sense, Mr. Effingham kindly
interposed, in his quality of host; his views are less
general
,
I fancy, than his words would give us, at first, reason
to suppose.
Very true, Mr. Effingham, very true, sir; one man is
not as good as another in that particular sense, or in the
sense of elections, but in all other senses. Yes, sir,
turning
towards Mr. Blunt again, as one reviews the attack on
an antagonist, who has given a fall, after taking breath;
in all other senses, one man is unqualifiedly as good as
another. One man has the same rights as another.
The slave as the freeman?
The slaves are exceptions sir. But in the free states,
except in the case of elections, one man is as good as
another
in all things. That is our meaning, and any other
principle would be unqualifiedly unpopular.
Can one man make a shoe as well as another?
Of rights, sir,I stick to the rights, you will
remember
.
Has the minor the same rights as the man of full age;
the apprentice as the master; the vagabond as the resident;
the man who cannot pay as the man who can?
No, sir, not in that sense either. You do not
understand
me, sir, I fear. All that I mean is, that in particular
things, one man is as good as another in America. This
is American doctrine, though it may not happen to be
English, and I flatter myself it will stand the test of the
strictest investigation.
And you will allow me to inquire where this is not the
case, in particular things. If you mean to say that there
are fewer privileges accorded to the accidents of birth, or to
fortune and station in America, than is usual in other
countries
,
we shall agree; but I think it will hardly do to say
there are none!
Privileges accorded to birth in America, sir! The idea
would be odious to her people!
Does not the child inherit the property of the father?
Most assuredly; but this can hardly be termed a
privilege
.
That may depend a good deal on taste. I should
account
it a greater privilege than to inherit a title without the
fortune.
I perceive, gentlemen, that we do not perfectly
understand
each other, and I must postpone the discussion to a
more favourable opportunity; for I confess great uneasiness
at this decision of the captain's, about steering in among
the rocks of Sylla. (Mr. Dodge was not as clear-headed
as common, in consequence of the controversy that had just
occurred.) I challenge you to renew the subject another
time, gentlemen. I only happened in (another peculiarity
of diction in this gentleman) to make a first call, for I
suppose there is no exclusion in an American ship?
None whatever, sir, Mr. John Effingham coldly
answered
.
All the state-rooms are in common, and I
propose
to seize an early occasion to return this compliment, by
making myself at home in the apartment which has the
honour to lodge Mr. Dodge and Sir George Templemore.
Here Mr. Dodge beat a retreat, without touching at all
on his real errand. Instead of even following up the
matter
with the other passengers, he got into a corner, with
one or two congenial spirits, who had taken great offence
that the Effinghams should presume to retire into their
cabin, and particularly that they should have the extreme
aristocratical audacity to shut the door, where he continued
pouring into the greedy ears of his companions his own
history of the recent dialogue, in which, according to his
own account of the matter, he had completely gotten the
better of that young upstart, Blunt, a man of whom he
knew positively nothing, divers anecdotes of the Effingham
family, that came of the lowest and most idle gossip of
rustic
malignancy, and his own vague and confused notions
of the rights of persons and of things. Very different was
the conversation that ensued in the ladies' cabin, after the
welcome disappearance of the uninvited guest. Not a
remark
of any sort was made on his intrusion, or on his folly;
even John Effingham, little addicted in common to
forbearance
,
being too proud to waste his breath on so low game,
and too well taught to open upon a man the moment his
back was turned. But the subject was continued, and in a
manner better suited to the education, intelligence, and
views of the several speakers.
Eve said but little, though she ventured to ask a question
now and then; Mr. Sharp and Mr. Blunt being the
principal
supporters of the discourse, with an occasional quiet,
discreet remark from the young lady's father, and a
sarcasm
,
now and then, from John Effingham. Mr. Blunt,
though advancing his opinions with diffidence, and with a
proper deference for the greater experience of the two elder
gentlemen, soon made his superiority apparent, the subject
proving to be one on which he had evidently thought a
great deal, and that too with a discrimination and originality
that are far from common.
He pointed out the errors that are usually made on the
subject of the institutions of the American Union, by
confounding
the effects of the general government with those
of the separate states; and he clearly demonstrated that
the Confederation itself had, in reality, no distinctive
character
of its own, even for or against liberty. It was a
confederation, and got its character from the characters of
its several parts, which of themselves were independent in
all things, on the important point of distinctive principles,
with the exception of the vague general provision that they
must be republics; a provision that meant anything, or
nothing, so far as true liberty was concerned, as each state
might decide for itself.
The character of the American government is to be
sought in the characters of the state governments, he
concluded
,
which vary with their respective policies. It is in
this way that communities that hold one half of their
numbers
in domestic bondage are found tied up in the same
political
fasces
with other communities of the most
democratic
institutions. The general government assures neither
liberty of speech, liberty of conscience, action, nor of
anything
else, except as against itself; a provision that is quite
unnecessary, as it is purely a government of delegated
powers, and has no authority to act at all on those
particular
interests.
This is very different from the general impression in
Europe, observed Mr. Sharp; and as I perceive I have
the good fortune to be thrown into the society of an
American
,
if not an
American lawyer
, able to enlighten my
ignorance on these interesting topics, I hope to be permitted,
during some of the idle moments, of which we are likely to
have many, to profit by it.
The other coloured, bowed to the compliment, but
appeared
to hesitate before he answered.
'T is not absolutely necessary to be an American by
birth, he said, as I have already had occasion to observe,
in order to understand the institutions of the country, and
I might possibly mislead you were you to fancy that a
native
was your instructer. I have often been in the country,
however, if not born in it, and few young men, on this side
of the Atlantic, have had their attention pointed, with so
much earnestness, to all that affects it as myself.
I was in hopes we had the honour of including you
among our countrymen, observed John Effingham, with
evident disappointment. So many young men come
abroad disposed to quarrel with foreign excellences, of
which they know nothing, or to concede so many of our
own, in the true spirit of serviles, that I was flattering
myself
I had at last found an exception.
Eve also felt regret, though she hardly avowed to herself
the reason.
He is then, an Englishman, after all! said Mr. Sharp,
in another aside.
Why not a Germanor a Swissor even a Russian?
His English is perfect; no continental could speak so
fluently, with such a choice of words, so totally without an
accent, without an effort. As Mademoiselle Viefville says,
he does not speak well enough for a foreigner.
Eve was silent, for she was thinking of the singular
manner in which a conversation so oddly commenced, had
brought about an explanation on a point that had often given
her many doubts. Twenty times had she decided in her
own mind that this young man, whom she could properly
call neither stranger nor acquaintance, was a countryman,
and as often had she been led to change her opinion. He
had now been explicit, she thought, and she felt compelled
to set him down as a European, though not disposed, still,
to believe he was an Englishman. For this latter notion,
9 *
she had reasons it might not have done to give to a native
of the island they had just left, as she knew to be the fact
with Mr. Sharp.
Music succeeded this conversation, Eve having taken the
precaution to have the piano tuned before quitting port, an
expedient we would recommend to all who have a regard
for the instrument that extends beyond its outside, or even
for their own ears. John Effingham executed brilliantly on
the violin; and, as it appeared on inquiry, the two younger
gentlemen performed respectably on the flute, flageolet, and
one or two other wind instruments. We shall leave them
doing great justice to Beethoven, Rossini, and Mayerbeer,
whose compositions Mr. Dodge did not fail to sneer at in
the outer cabin, as affected and altogether unworthy of
attention, and return on deck to the company of the anxious
master.
Captain Truck had continued to pace the deck moodily
and alone, during the whole evening, and he only seemed
to come to a recollection of himself when the relief passed
him on his way to the wheel, at eight bells. Inquiring the
hour, he got into the mizzen rigging, with a night-glass, and
swept the horizon in search of the Foam. Nothing could
be made out, the darkness having settled upon the water in
a way to circumscribe the visible horizon to very narrow
limits.
This may do, he muttered to himself, as he swung off
by a rope, and alighted again on the planks of the deck.
Mr. Leach was summoned, and an order was passed for
the relieved watch to remain on deck for duty.
When all was ready, the first mate went through the
ship, seeing that all the candles were extinguished, or that
the hoods were drawn over the sky-lights, in such a way
as to conceal any rays that might gleam upwards from the
cabin. At the same time attention was paid to the
binnaclelamp
.
This precaution observed, the people went to work
to reduce the sail, and in the course of twenty minutes they
had got in the studding-sails, and all the standing canvas
to the topsails, the fore-course, and a forward staysail.
The three topsails were then reefed, with sundry urgent
commands to the crew to be active, for, The Englishman
was coming up like a horse, all this time, no doubt.
This much effected, the hands returned on deck, as much
amazed at the several arrangements as if the order had
been to cut away the masts.
If we had a few guns, and were a little stronger-handed,
growled an old salt to the second-mate, as he hitched up
his trousers and rolled over his quid, I should think the
hard one, aft, had been stripping for a fight; but as it is,
we have nothing to carry on the war with, unless we throw
sea-biscuits into the enemy!
Stand by to
veer!
called out the captain from the
quarter-deck; or, as he pronounced it,
ware
.
The men sprang to the braces, and the bows of the ship
fell of gradually, as the yards yielded slowly to the drag.
In a minute the Montauk was rolling dead before it, and her
broadside came sweeping up to the wind with the ship's
head to the eastward. This new direction in the course
had the double effect of hauling off the land, and of
diverging
at more than right angles from the line of sailing of the
Foam, if that ship still continued in pursuit. The seamen
nodded their heads at each other in approbation, for all now
as well understood the meaning of the change as if it had
been explained to them verbally.
The revolution on deck produced as sudden a revolution
below. The ship was no longer running easily on an even
keel, but was pitching violently into a head-beating sea, and
the wind, which a few minutes before, was scarcely felt to
blow, was now whistling its hundred strains among the
cordage. Some sought their berths, among whom were
Mr. Sharp and Mr. Dodge; some hurried up the stairs to
learn the reason, and all broke up their avocations for the
night.
Captain Truck had the usual number of questions to
answer
,
which he did in the following succinct and graphic
manner, a reply that we hope will prove as satisfactory to
the reader, as it was made to be, perforce, satisfactory to
the curious on board.
Had we stood on an hour longer, gentlemen, we should
have been lost on the coast of Cornwall! he said, pithily:
had we stopped where we were, the sloop-of-war would
have been down upon us in twenty minutes: by changing
the course, in the way you have seen, he may get to
leeward
of us; if he find it out, he may change his own
course, in the dark, being as likely to go wrong as to go
right; or he may stand in, and set up the ribs of his
majesty's
ship Foam to dry among the rocks of the Lizard,
where I hope all her people will get safely ashore, dry shod.
After waiting the result anxiously for an hour, the
passengers
retired to their rooms one by one; but Captain
Truck did not quit the deck until the middle watch was set.
Paul Blunt heard him enter his state-room, which was next
to his own, and putting out his head, he inquired the news
above. The worthy master had discovered something about
this young man which created a respect for his nautical
information
,
for he never misapplied a term, and he invariably
answered all his questions promptly, and with respect.
Dirtier, and dirtier, he said, in defiance of Mr. Dodge's
opinion of the phrase, pulling off his pee-jacket, and laying
aside his sow-wester; a cap-full of wind, with just enough
drizzle to take the comfort out of a man, and lacker him
down like a boot.
The ship has gone about?
Like a dancing-master with two toes. We have got
her head to the southward and westward again; another
reef in the topsails, (which word Mr. Truck pronounced
tawsails
, with great unction,) England well under our lee,
and the Atlantic ocean right before us. Six hours on this
course, and we make a fair wind of it.
And the sloop?
Well, Mr. Blunt, I can give no direct account of her.
She has dropped in along-shore, I suspect, where she is
clawing off, like a boy climbing a hillock of ice on his
hands and knees; or is flying about among the other
foam
,
somewhere in the latitude of the Lizard. An easy pillow
to you, Mr. Blunt, and no tacking till the nap's up.
And the poor wretches in the Foam?
Why, the Lord have mercy on their souls!
CHAPTER IX.
The moon was now
Rising full orbed, but broken by a cloud.
The wind was hushed, and the sea mirror-like.
Italy
.
Most
of the passengers appeared on deck soon after
Saunders was again heard rattling among his glasses. The
day was sufficiently advanced to allow a distinct view of
all that was passing, and the wind had shifted. The change
had not occurred more than ten minutes, and as most of the
inmates of the cabin poured up the cabin-stairs nearly in a
body, Mr. Leach had just got through with the necessary
operation of bracing the yards about, for the breeze, which
was coming stiff, now blew from the northeast. No land
was visible, and the mate was just giving his opinion that
they were up with Scilly, as Captain Truck appeared in
the group.
One glance aloft, and another at the heavens, sufficed to
let the experienced master into all the secrets of his present
situation. His next step was to jump into the rigging, and
to take a look at the sea, in the direction of the Lizard.
There, to his extreme disappointment, appeared a ship with
everything set that would draw, and with a studding-sail
flapping, before it could be drawn down, which he knew in
an instant to be the Foam. At this spectacle Mr. Truck
compressed his lips, and made an inward imprecation, that
it would ill comport with our notions of propriety to repeat.
Turn the hands up and shake out the reefs, sir, he
said coolly to his mate, for it was a standing rule of the
captain's to seem calmest when he was in the greatest rage.
Turn them up, sir, and show every rag that will draw,
from the truck to the lower studding-sail boom, and be dd
to them!
On this hint Mr. Leach bestirred himself, and the men
were quickly on the yards, casting loose gaskets and
reef-points
.
Sail opened after sail, and as the steerage
passengers
,
who could show a force of thirty or forty men, aided
with their strength, the Montauk was soon running dead
before the wind, under every thing that would draw, and
with studding-sails on both sides. The mates looked
surprised
,
the seamen cast inquiring glances aft, but Mr. Truck
lighted a cigar.
Gentlemen, said the captain, after a few philosophical
whiffs, to go to America with yonder fellow on my
weather
beam is quite out of the question: he would be up with
me, and in possession, before ten o'clock, and my only play
is to bring the wind right over the taffrail, where, luckily,
we have got it. I think we can bother him at this sport,
for your sharp bottoms are not as good as your
kettle-bottoms
in ploughing a full furrow. As for bearing her
canvas
,
the Montauk will stand it as long as any ship in King
William's navy, before the gale. And on one thing you
may rely; I'll carry you all into Lisbon, before that
tobacco-hating
rover shall carry you back to Portsmouth.
This is a category to which I will stick.
This characteristic explanation served to let the
passengers
understand the real state of the case. No one
remonstrated
,
for all preferred a race to being taken; and even
the Englishmen on board began again to take sides with
the vessel they were in, and this the more readily, as
Captain
Truck freely admitted that their cruiser was too much
for him on every tack but the one he was about to try.
Mr. Sharp hoped that they might now escape, and as for
Sir George Templemore, he generously repeated his offer
to pay, out of his own pocket, all the port-charges in any
French, Spanish, or Portuguese harbour, the master would
enter, rather than see such an outrage done a foreign vessel
in a time of profound peace.
The expedient of Captain Truck proved his judgment,
and his knowledge of his profession. Within an hour it
was apparent that, if there was any essential difference in
the sailing of the two ships under the present circumstances,
it was slightly in favour of the Montauk. The Foam now
set her ensign for the first time, a signal that she wished to
speak the ship in sight. At this Captain Truck chuckled,
for he pronounced it a sign that she was conscious she
could not get them within range of her guns.
Show him the gridiron, cried the captain, briskly; it
will not do to be beaten in civility by a man who has beaten
us already on so many other tacks; but keep all fast as a
church-door on a week-day.
This latter comparison was probably owing to the
circumstance
of the master's having come from a part of the
country where all the religion is compressed into the
twenty-four
hours that commence on a Saturday-night at sunset,
and end at sunset the next day: at least, this was his own
explanation of the matter. The effect of success was
always to make Mr. Truck loquacious, and he now began
to tell many excellent anecdotes, of which he had stores, all
of events that had happened to him in person, or of which
he had been an eye-witness; and on which his hearers, as
Sancho said, might so certainly depend as true, that, if they
chose, they might safely swear they had seen them
themselves
.
Speaking of churches and doors, Sir George, he said,
between the puffs of the cigar, were you ever in Rhode
Island?
Never, as this is my first visit to America, captain.
True; well, you will be likely to go there, if you go to
Boston, as it is the best way; unless you would prefer to
run over Nantucket shoals, and a hundred miles of ditto,
as Mr. Dodge calls it.
Ditter
, captain, if you please
ditter:
it is the
continental
word for round-about.
The dl it is! it is worth knowing, however. And
what may be the French for pee-jacket?
You mistake me, sir,
ditter
, a circuit, or the longer
way.
That is the road we are now travelling, by George!
I say, Leach, do you happen to know that we are making
a ditter to America?
You were speaking of a church, Captain Truck,
politely
interposed Sir George, who had become rather
intimate
with his fellow-occupant of the state-room.
I was travelling through that state, a few years since,
on my way from Providence to New London, at a time
when a new road had just been opened. It was on a
Sunday
,
and the stagea four-horse power, you must know
had never yet run through on the Lord's-day. Well, we
might be, as it were, off here at right angles to our course,
and there was a short turn in the road, as one would say,
out yonder. As we hove in sight of the turn, I saw a
chap at the mast-head of a tree; down he slid, and away
he went right before it, towards a meeting-house two or
three cables length down the road. We followed at a smart
jog, and just before we got the church abeam, out poured
the whole congregation, horse and foot, parson and idlers,
sinners and hypocrites, to see the four-horse power go past.
Now this is what I call keeping the church-door open on a
Sunday.
We might have hesitated about recording this anecdote
of the captain's, had we not received an account of the
same occurrence from a quarter that left no doubt that his
version of the affair was substantially correct. This and
a few similar adventures, some of which he invented, and all
of which he swore were literal, enabled the worthy master
to keep the quarter-deck in good humour, while the ship
was running at the rate of ten knots the hour in a line so
far diverging from her true course. But the relief to
landsmen
is so great, in general, in meeting with a fair wind at
sea, that few are disposed to quarrel with its consequences.
A bright day, a steady ship, the pleasure of motion as they
raced with the combing seas, and the interest of the chase,
set every one at ease; and even Steadfast Dodge was less
devoured with envy, a jealousy of his own deservings, and
the desire of management, than usual. Not an introduction
occurred, and yet the little world of the ship got to be
better
acquainted with each other in the course of that day,
than would have happened in months of the usual collision
on land.
The Montauk continued to gain on her pursuer until the
sun set, when Captain Truck began once more to cast about
him for the chances of the night. He knew that the ship
was running into the mouth of the Bay of Biscay, or at
least was fast approaching it, and he bethought him of the
means of getting to the westward. The night promised to
be anything but dark, for though a good many wild-looking
clouds were by this time scudding athwart the heavens, the
moon diffused a sort of twilight gleam in the air. Waiting
patiently, however, until the middle-watch was again called,
he reduced sail, and hauled the ship off to a south-west
course, hoping by this slight change insensibly to gain an
offing before the Foam was aware of it; a scheme that he
thought more likely to be successful, as by dint of sheer
driving throughout the day, he had actually caused the
courses of that vessel to dip before the night shut in.
Even the most vigilant become weary of watching, and
Captain Truck was unpleasantly disturbed next morning by
an alarm that the Foam was just out of gun-shot, coming
up with them fast. On gaining the deck, he found the fact
indisputable. Favoured by the change in the course, the
cruiser had been gradually gaining on the Montauk ever
since the first watch was relieved, and had indeed lessened
the distance between the respective ships by two-thirds.
No remedy remained but to try the old expedient of getting
the wind over the taffrail once more, and of showing all the
canvas that could be spread. As like causes are known to
produce like effects, the expedient brought about the old
results
.
The packet had the best of it, and the sloop-of-war
slowly fell astern. Mr. Truck now declared he would make
a regular business of it, and accordingly he drove his
ship in that direction throughout the day, the following
night, and until near noon of the day which succeeded,
varying his course slightly to suit the wind, which he
studiously
kept so near aft as to allow the studding-sails to
draw on both sides. At meridian, on the fourth day out,
the captain got a good observation, and ascertained that the
ship was in the latitude of Oporto, with an offing of less
than a degree. At this time the top-gallant sails of the
Foam might be discovered from the deck, resembling a boat
clinging to the watery horizon. As he had fully made up
his mind to run into port in preference to being overhauled,
the master had kept so near the land, with an intention of
profiting by his position, in the event of any change
favouring
his pursuers; but he now believed that at sunset he
should be safe in finally shaping his course for America.
There must be double-fortified eyes aboard that fellow
to see what we are about at this distance, when the night is
Vol. I.10
once shut in, he said to Mr. Leach, who seconded all his
orders with obedient zeal, and we will watch our moment
to slip out fairly into the great prairie, and then we shall
discover who best knows the trail! You'll be for trotting
off to the prairies, Sir George, as soon as we get in, and
for trying your hand at the buffaloes, like all the rest of
them. Ten years since, if an Englishman came to look at
us, he was afraid of being scalped in Broadway, and now
he is never satisfied unless he is astraddle of the Rocky
Mountains in the first fortnight. I take over lots of
cockney-hunters
every summer, who just get a shot at a grizzly
bear or two, or at an antelope, and come back in time for
the opening of Drury Lane.
Should we not be more certain of accomplishing your
plans, by seeking refuge in Lisbon for a day or two? I
confess now I should like to see Lisbon, and as for the
port-charges
,
I would rather pay them twice, than that this poor
man should be torn from his wife. On this point I hope,
Captain Truck, I have made myself sufficiently explicit.
Captain Truck shook the baronet heartily by the hand,
as he always did when this offer was renewed, declaring
that his feelings did him honour.
Never fear for Davis, he said. Old Grab shall not
have him this tack, nor the Foam neither. I'll throw him
overboard before such a disgrace befall us or him. Well,
this leech has driven us from the old road, and nothing now
remains but to make the southern passage, unless the wind
prevail at south.
The Montauk, in truth, had not much varied from a
course that was once greatly in favour with the London
ships, Lisbon and New York being nearly in the same
parallel of latitude, and the currents, if properly improved,
often favouring the run. It is true, the Montauk had kept
closer in with the continent by a long distance than was
usual, even for the passage he had named; but the peculiar
circumstances of the chase had left no alternative, as the
master explained to his listeners.
It was a coasting voyage, or a tow back to
Portsmouth
,
Sir George, he said, and of the two, I know
you like the Montauk too well to wish to be quit of her so
soon.
To this the baronet gave a willing assent, protesting that
his feelings had got so much enlisted on the side of the
vessel
he was in, that he would cheerfully forfeit a thousand
pounds rather than be overtaken. The master assured him
that was just what he liked, and swore that he was the sort
of passenger he most delighted in.
When a man puts his foot on the deck of a ship, Sir
George, he should look upon her as his home, his church,
his wife and children, his uncles and aunts, and all the
other lumber ashore. This is the sentiment to make
seamen
.
Now, I entertain a greater regard for the shortest
ropeyarn aboard this ship, than for the topsail-sheets or best
bower of any other vessel. It is like a man's loving his
own finger, or toe, before another person's. I have heard
it said that one should love his neighbour as well as
himself
;
but for my part I love my ship better than my
neighbour's
,
or my neighbour himself; and I fancy, if the truth
were known, my neighbour pays me back in the same coin!
For my part, I like a thing because it is mine.
A little before dark the head of the Montauk was inclined
towards Lisbon, as if her intention was to run in, but the
moment the dark spot that pointed out the position of the
Foam was lost in the haze of the horizon, Captain Truck
gave the order to
ware
, and sail was made to the
west-south-west
.
Most of the passengers felt an intense curiosity to know
the state of things on the following morning, and all the
men among them were dressed and on deck just as the day
began to break. The wind had been fresh and steady all
night, and as the ship had been kept with her yards a little
checked, and topmast studding-sails set, the officers reported
her to be at least a hundred miles to the westward of the
spot where she veered. The reader will imagine the
disappointment
the latter experienced, then, when they beheld
the Foam a little on their weather-quarter, edging away for
them as assiduously as she had been hauling up for them
the night they sailed from Portsmouth, distant little more
than a league!
This is indeed extraordinary perseverance, said Paul
Blunt to Eve, at whose side he was standing at the moment
the fact was ascertained, and I think our captain might
do well to heave-to and ascertain its cause.
I hope not, cried his companion with vivacity. I
confess to an
esprit de corps
, and a gallant determination
to `see it out,' as Mr. Leach styles his own resolution.
One does not like to be followed about the ocean in this
manner, unless it be for the interest it gives the voyage.
After all, how much better is this than dull solitude, and
what a zest it gives to the monotony of the ocean!
Do you then find the ocean a scene of monotony?
Such it has oftener appeared to me than anything else,
and I give it a fair trial, having never
le mal de mer
. But
I acquit it of this sin now; for the interest of a chase, in
reasonably good weather, is quite equal to that of a
horse-race
,
which is a thing I delight in. Even Mr. John
Effingham
can look radiant under its excitement.
And when this is the case, he is singularly handsome;
a nobler outline of face is seldom seen than that of Mr.
John Effingham.
He has a noble outline of soul, if he did but know it
himself, returned Eve, warmly: I love no one as much
as he, with the exception of my father, and as Mademoiselle
Viefville would say,
pour cause
.
The young man could have listened all day, but Eve
smiled, bowed graciously, though with a glistening eye, and
hastily left the deck, conscious of having betrayed some
of her most cherished feelings to one who had no claim to
share them.
Captain Truck, while vexed to his heart's core, or, as he
expressed it himself, struck aback, like an old lady shot
off a hand-sled in sliding down hill, was prompt in
applying
the old remedy to the evil. The Montauk was again
put before the wind, sail was made, and the fortunes of the
chase were once more cast on the play of the ship.
The commander of the Foam certainly deprecated this
change, for it was hardly made before he set his ensign, and
fired a gun. But of these signals no other notice was taken
than to show a flag in return, when the captain and his
mates proceeded to get the bearings of the sloop-of-war.
Ten minutes showed they were gaining; twenty did better;
and in an hour she was well on the quarter.
Another day of strife succeeded, or rather of pure
sailing
,
for not a rope was started on board the Montauk, the
wind still standing fresh and steady. The sloop made
many signals, all indicating a desire to speak the Montauk,
but Captain Truck declared himself too experienced a
navigator
to be caught by bunting, and in too great a hurry to
stop and chat by the way.
Vattel had laid down no law for such a piece of
complaisance
,
in a time of profound peace. I am not to be
caught by that category.
The result may be anticipated from what has been already
related. The two ships kept before the wind until the Foam
was again far astern, and the observations of Captain Truck
told him, he was as far south as the Azores. In one of
these islands he was determined to take refuge, provided he
was not favoured by accident, for going farther south was
out of the question, unless absolutely driven to it.
Calculating
his distance, on the evening of the sixth day out, he
found that he might reach an anchorage at Pico, before the
sloop-of-war could close with him, even allowing the
necessity
of hauling up again by the wind.
But Providence had ordered differently. Towards
midnight
,
the breeze almost failed and became baffling, and
when the day dawned the officer of the watch reported that
it was ahead. The pursuing ship, though still in sight, was
luckily so far astern and to leeward as to prevent any
danger
from a visit by boats, and there was leisure to make the
preparations that might become necessary on the springing
up of a new breeze. Of the speedy occurrence of such a
change there was now every symptom, the heavens lighting
up at the northwest, a quarter from which the genius of the
storms mostly delights in making a display of his power.
10*
CHAPTER X.
I come with mightier things;
Who calls me silent? I have many tones
The dark sky thrills with low mysterious moans,
Borne on my sweeping winds.
Mrs. Hemans
.
The
awaking of the winds on the ocean is frequently
attended with signs and portents as sublime as any the fancy
can conceive. On the present occasion, the breeze that had
prevailed so steadily for a week was succeeded by light
baffling
puffs, as if, conscious of the mighty powers of the air
that were assembling in their strength, these inferior blasts
were hurrying to and fro for a refuge. The clouds, too,
were whirling about in uncertain eddies, many of the
heaviest
and darkest descending so low along the horizon, that
they had an appearance of settling on the waters in quest
of repose. But the waters themselves were unnaturally
agitated. The billows, no longer following each other in
long regular waves, were careering upwards, like fiery
coursers suddenly checked in their mad career. The usual
order of the eternally unquiet ocean was lost in a species
of chaotic tossings of the element, the seas heaving
themselves
upward, without order, and frequently without visible
cause. This was the reaction of the currents, and of the
influence of breezes still older than the last. Not the least
fearful symptom of the hour was the terrific calmness of
the air amid such a scene of menacing wildness. Even the
ship came into the picture to aid the impression of intense
expectation; for with her canvas reduced, she, too, seemed
to have lost that instinct which had so lately guided her
along the trackless waste, and was wallowing, nearly
helpless, among the confused waters. Still she was a
beautiful
and a grand object, perhaps more so at that moment
than at any other; for her vast and naked spars, her
well-supported
masts, and all the ingenious and complicated
hamper of the machine, gave her a resemblance to some
sinewy and gigantic gladiator, pacing the arena, in waiting
for the conflict that was at hand.
This is an extraordinary scene, said Eve, who clung
to her father's arm, as she gazed around her equally in
admiration
and in awe; a dreadful exhibition of the
sublimity
of nature!
Although accustomed to the sea, returned Mr. Blunt,
I have witnessed these ominous changes but twice before,
and I think this the grandest of them all.
Were the others followed by tempests? inquired the
anxious parent.
One brought a tremendous gale, while the other passed
away like a misfortune of which we get a near view, but
are permitted to escape the effects.
I do not know that I wish such to be entirely our present
fortune, rejoined Eve, for there is so much sublimity in
this view of the ocean unaroused, that I feel desirous of
seeing it when aroused.
We are not in the hurricane latitudes, or hurricane
months, resumed the young man, and it is not probable
that there is anything more in reserve for us than a hearty
gale of wind, which may, at least, help us to get rid of
yonder troublesome follower.
Even that I do not wish, provided he will let us continue
the race on our proper route. A chase across the Atlantic
would be something to enjoy at the moment, gentlemen, and
something to talk of in after life.
I wonder if such a thing be possible! exclaimed Mr.
Sharp; it would indeed be an incident to recount to
another generation!
There is little probability of our witnessing such an
exploit, Mr. Blunt remarked, for gales of wind on the
ocean have the same separating influence on consorts of
the sea, that domestic gales have on consorts of the land.
Nothing is more difficult than to keep ships and fleets in
sight of each other in very heavy weather, unless, indeed,
those of the best qualities are disposed to humour those of
the worst.
I know not which may be called the best, or which the
worst, in this instance, for our tormentor appears to be as
much better than ourselves in some particulars, as we are
better than he in others. If the humouring is to come from
our honest captain, it will be some such humouring as the
spoiled child gets from a capricious parent in moments of
anger.
Mr. Truck passed the group at that instant, and heard
his name coupled with the word honest, in the mouth of
Eve, though he lost the rest of the sentence.
Thank you for the compliment, my dear young lady,
he said; and I wish I could persuade Captain Somebody,
of his Britannic Majesty's ship Foam, to be of the same
way of thinking. It is all because he will not fancy me
honest in the article of tobacco, that he has got the Montauk
down here, on the Spanish coast, where the man who built
her would not know her; so unnatural and unseemly is it
to catch a London liner so far out of her track. I shall
have to use double care to get the good craft home again.
And why this particular difficulty, captain? Eve, who
was amused with Mr. Truck's modes of speech, pleasantly
inquired. Is it not equally easy to go from one part of
the ocean, as from another?
Equally easy! Bless you, my dear young lady, you
never made a more capital mistake in your life. Do you
imagine it is as easy to go from London to New York, now,
as to go from New York to London?
I am so ignorant as to have made this ridiculous
mistake
,
if mistake it be; nor do I now see why it should be
otherwise.
Simply because it is up-hill, ma'am. As for our
position
here to the eastward of the Azores, the difficulty is
soon explained. By dint of coaxing I had got the good old
ship so as to know every inch of the road on the northern
passage, and now I shall be obliged to wheedle her along
on a new route, like a shy horse getting through a new
stable-door. One might as well think of driving a pig
from his sty, as to get a ship out of her track.
We trust to you to do all this and much more at need.
But to what will these grand omens lead? Shall we have a
gale, or is so much magnificent menacing to be taken as an
empty threat of Nature's?
That we shall know in the course of the day, Miss
Effingham, though Nature is no bully, and seldom threatens
in vain. There is nothing more curious to study, or which
needs a nicer eye to detect, than your winds.
Of the latter I am fully persuaded, captain, for they
are called the `viewless winds,' you will remember, and the
greatest authority we possess, speaks of them as being quite
beyond the knowledge of man: `That we may hear the
sound of the wind, but cannot tell whence it cometh, or
whither it goeth.'
I do not remember the writer you mean, my dear young
lady, returned Mr. Truck, quite innocently; but he was
a sensible fellow, for I believe Vattel has never yet dared
to grapple with the winds. There are people who fancy
the weather is foretold in the almanack; but, according to
my opinion, it is safer to trust a rheumatis' of two or three
years' standing. A good, well-established, old-fashioned
rheumatis'I say nothing of your new-fangled diseases,
like the cholera, and varioloid, and animal magnitudes
but a good old-fashioned rheumatis', such as people used to
have when I was a boy, is as certain a barometer as that
which is at this moment hanging up in the coach-house
here, within two fathoms of the very spot where we are
standing. I once had a rheumatis' that I set much store
by, for it would let me know when to look out for easterly
weather, quite as infallibly as any instrument I ever sailed
with. I never told you the story of the old Connecticut
horse-jockey, and the typhoon, I believe; and as we are
doing nothing but waiting for the weather to make up its
mind
The weather to make up its mind! exclaimed Eve,
looking around her in awe at the sublime and terrific
grandeur
of the ocean, of the heavens, and of the pent and
moody air; is there an uncertainty in this?
Lord bless you! my dear young lady, the weather is
often as uncertain, and as undecided, and as hard to please,
too, as an old girl who gets sudden offers on the same day,
from a widower with ten children, an attorney with one leg,
and the parson of the parish. Uncertain, indded! Why I
have known the weather in this grandiloquent condition for
a whole day. Mr. Dodge, there, will tell you it is making
up its mind which way it ought to blow, to be popular; so,
as we have nothing better to do, Mr. Effingham, I will tell
you the story about my neighbour, the horse-jockey.
Hauling
yards when there is no wind, is like playing on a
Jew'sharp
,
at a concert of trombones.
Mr. Effingham made a complaisant sign of assent, and
pressed the arm of the excited Eve for patience.
You must know, gentlemen, the captain commenced,
looking round to collect as many listeners as possible,for
he excessively disliked lecturing to small audiences, when
he had anything to say that he thought particularly clever,
you must know that we had formerly many craft that
went between the river and the islands
The river? interrupted the amused Mr. Sharp.
Certain; the Connecticut, I mean; we all call it the
river down our waybetween the river and the West Indies,
with horses, cattle, and other knick-knacks of that
description
.
Among others was old Joe Bunk, who had followed
the trade in a high-decked brig for some twenty-three years,
he and the brig having grown old in company, like man
and wife. About forty years since, our river ladies began
to be tired of their bohea, and as there was a good deal said
in favour of souchong in those days, an excitement was
got up on the subject, as Mr. Dodge calls it, and it was
determined
to make an experiment in the new quality, before
they dipped fairly into the trade. Well, what do you
suppose
was done in the premises, as Vattel says, my dear
young lady?
Eve's eyes were still on the grand and portentous aspect
of the heavens, but she civilly answered,
No doubt they sent to a shop and purchased a sample.
Not they; they knew too much for that, since any
rogue of a grocer might cheat them. When the excitement
had got a little headway on it, they formed a tea society,
with the parson's wife for presidentess, and her oldest
daughter
for secretary. In this way they went to work, until the
men got into the fever too, and a project was set a-foot to
send a craft to China for a sample of what they wanted.
China! exclaimed Eve, this time looking the captain
fairly in the face.
China, certain; it lies off hereaway, you know, round
on the other side of the earth. Well, whom should they
choose to go on the errand but old Joe Bunk. The old man
had been so often to the islands and back, without knowing
anything of navigation, they thought he was just their man,
as there was no such thing as losing him.
One would think he was the very man to get lost,
observed
Mr. Effingham, while the captain fitted a fresh cigar;
for smoke he would, and did, in any company, that was out
of the cabin, although he always professed a readiness to
cease, if any person disliked the fragrance of tobacco.
Not he, sir; he was just as well off in the Indian Ocean
as he would be here, for he knew nothing about either.
Well, Joe fitted up the brig; the Seven Dollies was her
name; for you must know we had seven ladies in the town,
who were cally Dolly, and they each of them used to send
a colt, or a steer, or some other delicate article to the islands
by Joe, whenever he went; so he fitted up the Seven
Dollies
,
hoisted in his dollars, and made sail. The last that
was seen or heard of the old man for eight months, was off
Montauk, where he was fallen in with, two days out,
steering
south-easterly, by compass.
I should think, observed John Effingham, who began
to arouse himself as the story proceeded, that Mrs. Bunk
must have been very uneasy all this time?
Not she; she stuck to the bohea in hopes the souchong
would arrive before the restoration of the Jews. Arrive it
did, sure enough, at the end of eight months, and a capital
adventure it proved for all concerned. Old Joe got a great
name in the river for the exploit, though how he got to
China no one could say, or how he got back again; or, for
a long time, how he got the huge heavy silver tea-pot, he
brought home with him.
A silver tea-pot?
Exactly that article. At last the truth came to be
known; for it is not an easy matter to hide anything of
that nature down our way; it is aristocratic, as Mr. Dodge
says, to keep a secret. At first they tried Joe with all sorts
of questions, but he gave them `guess' for `guess.' Then
people began to talk, and finally it was fairly whispered
that the old man had stolen the tea-pot. This brought him
before the meeting.Law was out of the question, you will
understand, as there was no evidence; but the meeting
don't stick much at particulars, provided people talk a good
deal.
And the result? asked John Effingham, I suppose
the parish took the tea-pot and left Joe the grounds.
You are as far out of the way as we are here, down on
the coast of Spain! The truth is just this. The Seven
Dollies was lying among the rest of them, at anchor, below
Canton, with the weather as fine as young girls love to see
it in May, when Joe began to get down his yards, to house
his masts, and to send out all his spare anchors. He even
went so far as to get two hawsers fastened to a junk that
had grounded a little a-head of him. This made a talk
among the captains of the vessles, and some came on board
to ask the reason. Joe told them he was getting ready for
the typhoon; but when they inquired his reasons for
believing
there was to be a typhoon at all, Joe looked solemn,
shook his head, and said he had reasons enough, but they
were his own. Had he been explicit, he would have been
laughed at, but the sight of an old grey-headed man, who
had been at sea forty years, getting ready in this serious
manner, set the others at work too; for ships follow each
other's movements, like sheep running through a breach in
the fence. Well, that night the typhoon came in earnest,
and it blew so hard, that Joe Bunk said he could see the
houses in the moon, all the air having out of the
atmosphere
.
But what has this to do with the teapot, Captain
Truck?
It is the life and soul of it. The captains in port were
so delighted with Joe's foreknowledge, that they clubbed,
and presented him this pot as a testimony of their gratitude
and esteem. He'd got to be popular among them, Mr.
Dodge, and that was the way they proved it.
But, pray, how did he know the storm was
approaching
?
asked Eve, whose curiosity had been awakened in
spite of herself. It could not have been that his `
fore-knowledge'
was supernatural.
That no one can say, for Joe was presbyterian-built, as
we say, kettle-bottomed, and stowed well. The truth was
not discovered until ten years afterwards, when the old
fellow
got to be a regular cripple, what between rheumatis',
old age, and steaming. One day he had an attack of the
first complaint, and in one of its most severe paroxysms,
when nature is apt to wince, he roared three times, `a
typhoon! a typhoon! a typhoon! and the murder was out.
Sure enough, the next day we had a regular north-easter;
but old Joe got no sign of popularity that time. And now,
when you get to America, gentlemen and ladies, you will
be able to say you have heard the story of Joe Bunk and
his tea-pot.
Thereupon Captain Truck took two or three hearty whiffs
of the cigar, turned his face upwards, and permitted the
smoke to issue forth in a continued stream until it was
exhausted
,
but still keeping his head raised in the
inconvenient
position it had taken. The eye of the master, fastened
in this manner on something aloft, was certain to draw
other eyes in the same direction, and in a few seconds all
around him were gazing in the same way, though none but
himself could tell why.
Turn up the watch below. Mr. Leach, Captain Truck
at length called out, and Eve observed that he threw away
the cigar, although a fresh one; a proof, as she fancied,
that he was preparing for duty.
The people were soon at their places, and an effort was
made to get the ship's head round to the southward.
Although the frightful stillness of the atmosphere rendered
the manuvre difficult, it succeeded in the end, by profiting
by the passing and fitful currents, that resembled so many
sighings of the air. The men were then sent on the yards,
to furl all the canvas, with the exception of the three
topsails
and the fore-course, most of it having been merely
hauled up to await the result. All those who had ever been
at sea before, saw in these preparations proof that Captain
Truck expected the change would be sudden and severe:
still, as he betrayed no uneasiness, they hoped his measures
were merely those of prudence. Mr. Effingham could not
refrain from inquiring, however, if there existed any
immediate
motives for the preparations that were so actively,
though not hurriedly, making.
This is no affair for the rheumatis', returned the
facetious
master, for, look you here, my worthy sir, and you,
my dear young lady,this was a sort of parental
familiarity
Vol. I. 11
the honest Jack fancied he had a right to take with all
his unmarried female passengers, in virtue of his office,
and of his being a bachelor drawing hard upon sixty;
look you here, my dear young lady, and you, too,
ma'amselle
,
for you can understand the clouds, I take it, if they
are not French clouds; do you not see the manner in which
those black-looking rascals are putting their heads together?
They are plotting something quite in their own way, I'll
warrant you.
The clouds are huddling, and rolling over each other,
certainly, returned Eve, who had been struck with the wild
beauty of their evolutions, and a noble, though fearful
picture
they present; but I do not understand the particular
meaning of it, if there be any hidden omen in their airy
flights.
No rheumatis' about you, young lady, said the
captain
,
jocularly; too young, and handsome, and too
modern
,
too, I dare say, for that old-fashioned complaint. But
on one category you may rely, and that is, that nothing in
nature conspires without an object.
But I do not think vapour whirling in a current of air
is a conspiracy, answered Eve, laughing, though it may
be a category.
Perhaps not,who knows, however; for it is as easy
to suppose that objects understand each other, as that horses
and dogs understand each other. We know nothing about
it, and, therefore, it behooves us to say nothing. If
mankind
conversed only of the things they understood, half the
words might be struck out of the dictionaries. But, as I
was remarking, those clouds, you can see, are getting
together
,
and are making ready for a start, since here they
will not be able to stay much longer.
And what will compel them to disappear?
Do me the favour to turn your eyes here, to the
nor'-west
.
You see an opening there that looks like a
crouching
lion; is it not so?
There is certainly a bright clear streak of sky along
the margin of the ocean, that has quite lately made its
appearance
;
does it prove that the wind will blow from that
quarter?
Quite as much, my dear young lady, as when you open
your window it proves that you mean to put your head out
of it.
An act a well-bred young woman very seldom
performs
,
observed Mademoiselle Viefville; and never in a
town.
No? Well, in our town on the river, the women's
heads are half the time out of the windows. But I do not
pretend, ma'amselle, to be expert in proprieties of this sort,
though I can venture to say that I am somewhat of a judge
of what the winds would be about when they open
their
shutters. This opening to the nor'-west, then, is a sure
sign of something coming out of the window, well-bred or
not.
But, added Eve, the clouds above us, and those
farther
south, appear to be hurrying towards your bright
opening
,
captain, instead of from it.
Quite in nature, gentlemen; quite in nature, ladies.
When a man has fully made up his mind to retreat, he
blusters the most; and one step forward often promises two
backward. You often see the stormy petterel sailing at a
ship as if he meant to come aboard, but he takes good care
to put his helm down before he is fairly in the rigging. So
it is with clouds, and all other things in nature. Vattel
says you may make a show of fight when your necessities
require it, but that a neutral cannot fire a gun, unless
against pirates. Now, these clouds are putting the best face
on the matter, but in a few minutes you will see them
wheeling as St. Paul did before them.
St. Paul, Captain Truck!
Yes, my dear young lady; to the right about.
Eve frowned, for she disliked some of these nautical
images, though it was impossible not to smile in secret at
the queer associations that so often led the well-meaning
master's discursive discourse. His mind was a strange
jumble of an early religious education,religious as to
externals and professions, at least,with subsequent loose
observation and much worldly experience, and he drew on
his stock of information, according to his own account of
the matter, as Saunders, the steward, cut the butter from
the firkins, or as it came first.
His prediction concerning the clouds proved to be true,
for half an hour did not pass before they were seen
scampering
out of the way of the nor'-wester, to use the
captain's
figure, like sheep giving play to the dogs. The
horizon brightened with a rapidity almost supernatural, and,
in a surprisingly short space of time, the whole of that
frowning vault that had been shadowed by murky and
menacing
vapour, sporting its gambols in ominous wildness,
was cleared of everything like a cloud, with the exception
of a few white, rich, fleecy piles, that were grouped in the
north, like a battery discharging its artillery on some
devoted
field.
The ship betrayed the arrival of the wind by a cracking
of the spars, as they settled into their places, and then the
huge hull began to push aside the waters, and to come
under control. The first shock was far from severe, though,
as the captain determined to bring his vessel up as near his
course as the direction of the breeze would permit, he soon
found he had as much canvas spread as she could bear.
Twenty minutes brought him to a single reef, and half an
hour to a second.
By this time attention was drawn to the Foam. The old
superiority of that cruiser was now apparent again, and
calculations were made concerning the possibility of
avoiding
her, if they continued to stand on much longer on the
present course. The captain had hoped the Montauk would
have the advantage from her greater bulk, when the two
vessels should be brought down to close-reefed topsails, as
he foresaw would be the case; but he was soon compelled
to abandon even that hope. Further to the southward he
was resolved he would not go, as it would be leading him
too far astray, and, at last, he came to the determination to
stand towards the islands, which were as near as might be
in his track, and to anchor in a neutral road-stead, if too
hard pressed.
He cannot get up with us before midnight, Leach, he
concluded the conference held with the mate by saying;
and by that time the gale will be at its height, if we are
to have a gale, and then the gentleman will not be desirous
of lowering his boats. In the mean time, we shall be
driving
in towards the Azores, and it will be nothing out of the
course of nature, should I find an occasion to play him a
trick. As for offering up the Montauk a sacrifice on the
altar of tobacco, as old Deacon Hourglass used to say in
his prayers, it is a category to be averted by any
catastrophe
short of condemnation.
CHAPTER XI.
I. that shower dewy light
Through slumbering leaves, bring storms!the tempest birth
Of memory, thought, remorse.Be holy, Earth!
I am the solemn Night!
Mrs. Hemans
.
In
this instance, it is not our task to record any of the
phenomena of the ocean, but a regular, though fierce gale
of wind. One of the first signs of its severity was the
disappearance
of the passengers from the deck, one shutting
himself in his room after another, until none remained
visible
but John Effingham and Paul Blunt. Both these
gentlemen
,
as it appeared, had made so many passages, and
had got to be so familiar with ships, that sea-sickness and
alarms were equally impotent as respects their constitutions
and temperaments.
The poor steerage-passengers were no exception, but they
stole for refuge into their dens, heartily repentant, for the
time being, at having braved the dangers and discomforts
of the sea. The gentle wife of Davis would now willingly
have returned to meet the resentment of her uncle; and as
for the bridegroom himself, as Mr. Leach, who passed
through this scene of abominations to see that all was
right, described him,Mr. Grab would not wring him
for a dish-cloth, if he could see him in his present pickle.
Captain Truck chuckled a good deal at this account, for
he had much the same sympathy for ordinary cases of
sea-sickness
,
as a kitten feels in the agony of the first mouse it
has caught, and which it is sovereign pleasure to play
with, instead of eating.
It serves him right, Mr. Leach, for getting married;
11 *
and mind you don't fall into the same abuse of your
opportunities
,
he said, with an air of self-satisfaction, while
comparing three or four cigars in the palm of his hand,
doubtful which of the fragrant plump rolls to put into his
mouth. Getting married, Mr. Blunt, commonly makes a
man a fit subject for nausea, and nothing is easier than to
set the stomach-pump in motion in one of your
bride-grooms
;
is not this true as the gospel, Mr. John
Effingham
?
Mr. John Effingham made no reply,but the young man
who at the moment was admiring his fine form, and the
noble outline of his features, was singularly struck with the
bitterness, not to say anguish, of the smile with which he
bowed a cold assent. All this was lost on Captain Truck,
who proceeded
con amore
.
One of the first things that I ask concerning my
passengers
is, is he married? when the answer is `no,' I set
him down as a good companion in a gale like this, or
as one who can smoke, or crack a joke when a topsail is
flying out of a bolt-rope,a companion for a category.
Now, if either of you gentlemen had a wife, she would have
you under hatches to-day, lest you should slip through a
scupperhole,or be washed overboard with the spray,or
have your eye-brows blown away in such a gale, and then
I should lose the honour of your company. Comfort is too
precious to be thrown away in matrimony. A man may
gain foreknowledge by a wife, but he loses free agency.
As for you, Mr. John Effingham, you must have coiled
away about half a century of life, and there is not much
to fear on your account; but Mr. Blunt is still young
enough to be in danger of a mishap. I wish Neptune
would come aboard of us, hereaway, and swear you to be
true and constant to yourself, young gentleman.
Paul laughed, coloured slightly, and then rallying, he
replied in the same voice,
At the risk of losing your good opinion, captain, and
even in the face of this gale, I shall avow myself an
advocate
of matrimony.
If you will answer me one question, my dear sir, I
will tell you whether the case is or is not hopeless.
In order to assent to this, you will of course see the
necessity of letting me know what the question is.
Have you made up your mind who the young woman
shall be? If that point is settled, I can only recommend
to you some of Joe Bunk's souchong, and advise you to
submit, for there is no resisting one's fate. The reason
your Turks yield so easily to predestination and fate, is the
number of their wives. Many a book is written to show
the cause of their submitting their necks so easily to the
sword and the bow-string. I've been in Turkey,
gentlemen
,
and know something of their ways. The reason of
their submitting so quietly to be beheaded is, that they are
always ready to hang themselves. How is the fact, sir?
have you settled upon the young lady in your own mind or
not?
Although there was nothing in all this but the permitted
trifling of boon companions on ship-board, Paul Blunt
received
it with an awkwardness one would hardly have
expected
in a young man of his knowledge of the world. He
reddened, laughed, made an effort to throw the captain to
a greater distance by reserve, and in the end fairly gave up
the matter by walking to another part of the deck.
Luckily
,
the attention of the honest master was drawn to the
ship, at that instant, and Paul flattered himself he was
unperceived
;
but the shadow of a figure at his elbow startled
him, and turning quickly, he found Mr. John Effingham at
his side.
Her mother was an angel, said the latter huskily. I
too love her; but it is as a father.
Sir!Mr. Effingham!These are sudden and
unexpected
remarks, and such as I am not prepared for.
Do you think one as jealous of that fair creature as I,
could have overlooked your passion?She is loved by
both
of you, and she merits the warmest affection of a
thousand
.
Persevere, for while I have no voice, and, I fear,
little influence on her decision, some strange sympathy
causes me to wish you success. My own man told me that
you have met before, and with her father's knowledge, and
this is all I ask, for my kinsman is discreet. He probably
knows you, though I do not.
The face of Paul glowed like fire, and he almost gasped
for breath. Pitying his distress, Effingham smiled kindly,
and was about to quit him, when he felt his hand
convulsively
grasped by those of the young man.
Do not quit me, Mr. Effingham, I entreat you, he said
rapidly; it is so unusual for me to hear words of
confidence
,
or even of kindness, that they are most precious to
me! I have permitted myself to be disturbed by the
random
remarks of that well-meaning, but unreflecting man;
but in a moment I shall be more composedmore manly
less unworthy of your attention and pity.
Pity is a word I should never have thought of applying
to the person, character, attainments, or, as I hoped,
fortunes
of Mr. Blunt; and I sincerely trust that you will
acquit
me of impertinence. I have felt an interest in you,
young man, that I have long ceased to feel in most of my
species, and I trust this will be some apology for the liberty
I have taken. Perhaps the suspicion that you were anxious
to stand well in the good opinion of my little cousin was at
the bottom of it all.
Indeed you have not misconceived my anxiety, sir; for
who is there that could be indifferent to the good opinion of
one so simple and yet so cultivated; with a mind in which
nature and knowledge seem to struggle for the possession.
One, Mr. Effingham, so little like the cold sophistication
and heartlessness of Europe on the one hand, and the
unformed
girlishness of America, on the other; one, in short,
so every way what the fondest father or the most sensitive
brother could wish.
John Effingham smiled, for to smile at any weakness was
with him a habit; but his eye glistened. After a moment
of doubt, he turned to his young companion, and with a
delicacy of expression and a dignity of manner that none
could excel him in, when he chose, he put a question that
for several days had been uppermost in his thoughts, though
no fitting occasion had ever before offered, on which he
thought he might venture.
This frank confidence emboldens meone who ought
to be ashamed to boast of his greater experience, when
every day shows him to how little profit it has been turned,
to presume to render our acquaintance less formal, by
alluding
to interests more personal than strangers have a right
to touch on. You speak of the two parts of the world just
mentioned, in a way to show me you are equally acquainted
with both.
I have often crossed the ocean, and, for so young a
man, have seen a full share of their societies. Perhaps it
increases my interest in your lovely kinswoman, that, like
myself, she properly belongs to neither.
Be cautious how you whisper that in her ear, my
youthful
friend; for Eve Effingham fancies herself as much
American in character as in birth. Single-minded and
totally without management,devoted to her duties,
religious
without cant,a warm friend of liberal institutions,
without the slightest approach to the impracticable, in heart
and soul a woman, you will find it hard to persuade her,
that with all her practice in the world, and all her
extensive
attainments, she is more than a humble copy of her
own great
beau idal
.
Paul smiled, and his eyes met those of John Effingham
the expression of both satisfied the parties that they
thought alike in more things than in their common
admiration
of the subject of their discourse.
I feel I have not been as explicit as I ought to be with
you, Mr. Effingham, the young man resumed, after a
pause; but on a more fitting occasion, I shall presume on
your kindness to be less reserved. My lot has thrown me
on the world, almost without friends, quite without relatives,
so far as intercourse with them is concerned; and I have
known little of the language or the acts of the affections.
John Effingham pressed his hand, and from that time he
cautiously abstained from any allusion to his personal
concerns
;
for a suspicion crossed his mind that the subject was
painful to the young man. He knew that thousands of
well-educated and frequently of affluent people, of both
sexes, were to be found in Europe, to whom, from the
circumstance
of having been born out of wedlock, through
divorces, or other family misfortunes, their private histories
were painful, and he at once inferred that some such event,
quite probably the first, lay at the bottom of Paul Blunt's
peculiar situation. Notwithstanding his warm attachment
to Eve, he had too much confidence in her own as well as
in her father's judgment, to suppose an acquaintance of any
intimacy would be lightly permitted; and as to the mere
prejudices connected with such subjects, he was quite free
from them. Perhaps his masculine independence of
character
caused him, on all such points, to lean to the side of
the
ultra
in liberality.
In this short dialogue, with the exception of the slight
though unequivocal allusion of John Effingham, both had
avoided any farther allusions to Mr. Sharp, or to his
supposed
attachment to Eve. Both were confident of its
existence
,
and this perhaps was one reason why neither felt any
necessity to advert to it: for it was a delicate subject, and
one, under the circumstances, that they would mutually
wish to forget in their cooler moments. The conversation
then took a more general character, and for several hours
that day, while the rest of the passengers were kept below
by the state of the weather, these two were together,
laying
,
what perhaps it was now too late to term, the
foundation
of a generous and sincere friendship. Hitherto Paul
had regarded John Effingham with distrust and awe, but
he found him a man so different from what report and his
own fancy had pictured, that the reaction in his feelings
served to heighten them, and to aid in increasing his respect.
On the other hand, the young man exhibited so much
modest good sense, a fund of information so much beyond
his years, such integrity and justice of sentiment, that when
they separated for the night, the old bachelor was full of
regret that nature had not made him the parent of such a
son.
All this time the business of the ship had gone on. The
wind increased steadily, until, as the sun went down, Captain
Truck announced it, in the cabin, to be a regular-built
gale of wind. Sail after sail had been reduced or furled,
until the Montauk was lying-to under her fore-sail, a
close-reefed
main-top-sail, a fore-top-mast stay-sail, and a mizzen
stay-sail. Doubts were even entertained whether the second
of these sails would not have to be handed soon, and the
fore-sail itself reefed.
The ship's head was to the south-southwest, her drift
considerable, and her way of course barely sufficient to
cause her to feel her helm. The Foam had gained on her
several miles during the time sail could be carried; but she,
also, had been obliged to heave-to, at the same increase of
the sea and wind as that which had forced Mr. Truck to
lash his wheel down. This state of things made a
considerable
change in the relative positions of the two vessels
again; the next morning showing the sloop-of-war hull
down, and well on the weather-beam of the packet. Her
sharper mould and more weatherly qualities had done her
this service, as became a ship intended for war and the chase.
At all this, however, Captain Truck laughed. He could
not be boarded in such weather, and it was matter of
indifference
where his pursuer might be, so long as he had
time to escape, when the gale ceased. On the whole, he
was rather glad than otherwise of the present state of things,
for it offered a chance to slip away to leeward as soon as
the weather would permit, if, indeed, his tormentor did not
altogether disappear in the northern board, or to windward.
The hopes and fears of the worthy master, however,
were poured principally into the ears of his two mates; for
few of the passengers were visible until the afternoon of the
second day of the gale; then, indeed, a general relief to
their physical suffering occurred, though it was accompanied
by apprehensions that scarcely permitted the change to be
enjoyed. About noon, on that day, the wind came with
such power, and the seas poured down against the bows of
the ship with a violence so tremendous, that it got to be
questionable whether she could any longer remain with
safety in her present condition. Several times in the course
of the morning, the waves had forced her bows off, and
before the ship could recover her position, the succeeding
billow would break against her broadside, and throw a flood
of water on her decks. This is a danger peculiar to
lying-to
in a gale; for if the vessel get into the trough of the sea,
and is met in that situation by a wave of unusual magnitude,
she runs the double risk of being thrown on her beam-ends,
and of having her decks cleared of everything, by the
cataract of water that washes athwart them. Landsmen
entertain little notion of the power of the waters, when
driven before a tempest, and are often surprised, in reading
of naval catastrophes, at the description of the injuries done.
But experience shows that boats, hurricane-houses, guns,
anchors of enormous weight, bulwarks and planks, are even
swept off into the ocean, in this manner, or are ripped up
from their fastenings.
The process of lying-to has a double advantage, so long
as it can be maintained, since it offers the strongest portion
of the vessel to the shock of the seas, and has the merit of
keeping her as near as possible to the desired direction.
But it is a middle course, being often adopted as an
expedient
of safety when a ship cannot scud; and then, again,
it is abandoned for scudding when the gale is so
intensely
severe that it becomes in itself dangerous. In nothing
are the high qualities of ships so thoroughly tried as in
their manner of behaving, as it is termed, in these moments
of difficulty; nor is the seamanship of the accomplished
officer so triumphantly established in any other part of his
professional knowledge, as when he has had an opportunity
of showing that he knows how to dispose of the vast weight
his vessel is to carry, so as to enable her mould to exhibit
its perfection, and on occasion to turn both to the best
account
.
Nothing will seem easier to a landsman than for a vessel
to run before the wind, let the force of the gale be what it
may. But his ignorance overlooks most of the difficulties,
nor shall we anticipate their dangers, but let them take their
places in the regular thread of the narrative.
Long before noon, or the hour mentioned, Captain Truck
foresaw that, in consequence of the seas that were
constantly
coming on board of her, he should be compelled to
put his ship before the wind. He delayed the manuvre
to the last moment, however, for what he deemed to be
sufficient
reasons. The longer he kept the ship lying-to, the
less he deviated from his proper course to New York, and
the greater was the probability of his escaping, stealthily
and without observation from the Foam, since the latter, by
maintaining her position better, allowed the Montauk to
drift gradually to leeward, and, of course, to a greater
distance
.
But the crisis would no longer admit of delay. All hands
were called; the maintop-sail was hauled up, not without
much difficulty, and then Captain Truck reluctantly gave
the order to haul down the mizzen-staysail, to put the helm
hard up, and to help the ship round with the yards. This
is at all times a critical change, as has just been mentioned,
for the vessel is exposed to the ravages of any sea, larger
than common, that may happen to strike her as she lies,
nearly motionless, with her broadside exposed to its force.
To accomplish it, therefore, Captain Truck went up a few
ratlines in the fore-rigging, (he was too nice a calculator to
offer even a surface as small as his own body to the wind,
in the after shrouds,) whence he looked out to windward
for a lull, and a moment when the ocean had fewer billows
than common of the larger and more dangerous kind. At
the desired instant he signed with his hand, and the wheel
was shifted from hard-down to hard-up.
This is always a breathless moment in a ship, for as none
can foresee the result, it resembles the entrance of a hostile
battery. A dozen men may be swept away in an instant,
or the ship herself hove over on her side. John Effingham
and Paul, who of all the passengers were alone on deck,
understood the hazards, and they watched the slightest
change with the interest of men who had so much at stake.
At first, the movement of the ship was sluggish, and such
as ill-suited the eagerness of the crew. Then her pitching
ceased, and she settled into the enormous trough bodily, or
the whole fabric sunk, as it were, never to rise again. So
low did she fall, that the fore-sail gave a tremendous flap;
one that shook the hull and spars from stem to stern. As
she rose on the next surge, happily its foaming crest slid
beneath her, and the tall masts rolled heavily to windward.
Recovering her equilibrium, the ship started through the
brine, and as the succeeding roller came on, she was
urging
ahead fast. Still, the sea struck her abeam, forcing
her bodily to leeward, and heaving the lower yard-arms
into the ocean. Tons of water fell on her decks, with the
dull sound of the clod on the coffin. At this grand moment,
old Jack Truck, who was standing in the rigging, dripping
with the spray, that had washed over him, with a naked
head, and his grey hair glistening, shouted like a Stentor,
Haul in your fore-braces, boys! away with the yard, like
a fiddlestick! Every nerve was strained; the unwilling
yards, pressed upon by an almost irresistible column of air,
yielded slowly, and as the sail met the gale more
perpendicularly
,
or at right angles to its surface, it dragged the
Vol. I.12
vast hull through the sea with a power equal to that of a
steam-engine. Ere another sea could follow, the Montauk
was glancing through the ocean at a furious rate, and
though offering her quarter to the billows, their force was
now so much diminished by her own velocity, as to deprive
them of their principal danger.
The motion of the ship immediately became easy, though
her situation was still far from being without risk. No
longer compelled to buffet the waves, but sliding along in
their company, the motion ceased to disturb the systems
of the passengers, and ten minutes had not elapsed before
most of them were again on deck, seeking the relief of the
open air. Among the others was Eve, leaning on the arm
of her father.
It was a terrific scene, though one might now
contemplate
it without personal inconvenience. The gentlemen
gathered around the beautiful and appalled spectatress of
this grand sight, anxious to know the effect it might
produce
on one of her delicate frame and habits. She
expressed
herself as awed, but not alarmed; for the habits
of dependence usually leave females less affected by fear,
in such cases, than those who, by their sex, are supposed
to be responsible.
Mademoiselle Viefville has promised to follow me, she
said, and as I have a national claim to be a sailor, you
are not to expect hysterics or even ecstasies from me; but
reserve yourselves, gentlemen, for the
Parisienne
.
The
Parisienne
, sure enough, soon came out of the
hurricane-house
,
with elevated hands, and eyes eloquent of
admiration, wonder and fear. Her first exclamations were
those of terror, and then turning a wistful look on Eve, she
burst into tears.
Ah, ceci est dcisif!
she exclaimed.
When we part, we shall be separated for life.
Then we will not part at all, my dear mademoiselle;
you have only to remain in America, to escape all future
inconveniences of the ocean. But forget the danger, and
admire the sublimity of this terrific panorama.
Well might Eve thus term the scene. The hazards now
to be avoided were those of the ship's broaching-to, and of
being pooped. Nothing may seem easier, as has been
said, than to sail before the wind, the words having
passed into a proverb; but there are times when even a
favouring gale becomes prolific of dangers, that we shall
now briefly explain.
The velocity of the water, urged as it is before a
tempest
,
is often as great as that of the ship, and at such
moments
the rudder is useless, its whole power being derived
from its action as a moving body against the element in
comparative repose. When ship and water move together,
at an equal rate, in the same direction, of course this power
of the helm is neutralized, and then the hull is driven much
at the mercy of the winds and waves. Nor is this all; the
rapidity of the billows often exceeds that of a ship, and
then the action of the rudder becomes momentarily reversed,
producing an effect exactly opposite to that which is desired.
It is true, this last difficulty is never of more than a few
moments' continuance, else indeed would the condition of
the mariner be hopeless; but it is of constant occurrence,
and so irregular as to defy calculations and defeat caution.
In the present instance, the Montauk would seem to fly
through the water, so swift was her progress; and then, as
a furious surge overtook her in the chase, she settled heavily
into the element, like a wounded animal, that, despairing
of escape, sinks helplessly in the grass, resigned to fate.
At such times the crests of the waves swept past her, like
vapour in the atmosphere, and one unpractised would be
apt to think the ship stationary, though in truth whirling
along in company with a frightful momentum.
It is scarcely necessary to say, that the process of
scudding
requires the nicest attention to the helm, in order that
the hull may be brought speedily back to the right
direction
,
when thrown aside by the power of the billows; for,
besides losing her way in the caldron of wateran
imminent
danger of itselfif left exposed to the attack of the
succeeding wave, her decks, at least, would be swept, even
should she escape a still more serious calamity.
Pooping is a hazard of another nature, and is also
peculiar
to the process of scudding. It merely means the ship's
being overtaken by the waters while running from them,
when the crest of a sea, broken by the resistance, is thrown
inboard, over the taffrail or quarter. The term is derived
from the name of that particular portion of the ship. In
order to avoid this risk, sail is carried on the vessel as long
as possible, it being deemed one of the greatest securities
of scudding, to force the hull through the water at the
greatest attainable rate. In consequence of these
complicated
risks, ships that sail the fastest and steer the easiest,
scud the best. There is, however, a species of velocity that
becomes of itself a source of new danger; thus,
exceedingly
sharp vessels have been known to force themselves
so far into the watery mounds in their front, and to receive
so much of the element on decks, as never to rise again.
This is a fate to which those who attempt to sail the
American
clipper, without understanding its properties, are
peculiarly
liable. On account of this risk, however, there was
now no cause of apprehension, the full-bowed,
kettle-bottomed
Montauk being exempt from the danger; though
Captain Truck intimated his doubts whether the corvette
would like to brave the course he had himself adopted.
In this opinion, the fact would seem to sustain the master
of the packet; for when the night shut in, the spars of the
Foam were faintly discernible, drawn like spiders' webs on
the bright streak of the evening sky. In a few more
minutes
,
even this tracery, which resembled that of a
magiclantern
,
vanished from the eyes of those aloft; for it had
not been seen by any on deck for more than an hour.
The magnificent horrors of the scene increased with the
darkness. Eve and her companions stood supported by the
hurricane-house, watching it for hours, the
supernatural-looking
light, emitted by the foaming sea, rendering the
spectacle one of attractive terror. Even the consciousness
of the hazards heightened the pleasure; for there was a
solemn and grand enjoyment mingled with it all, and the
first watch had been set an hour, before the party had
resolution
enough to tear themselves from the sublime sight of
a raging sea.
CHAPTER XII.
Touch
. Wast ever in court, shepherd?
Cor
. No, truly.
Touch
. Then thou art damn'd.
Cor
. Nay, I hope
Touch
. Truly, thou art damn'd, like an ill-roasted egg, all on one side.
As You Like it
.
No one thought of seeking his berth when all the
passengers
were below. Some conversed in broken, half
intelligible
dialogues, a few tried unavailingly to read, and
more sat looking at each other in silent misgivings, as the
gale howled through the cordage and spars, or among the
angles and bulwarks of the ship. Eve was seated on a
sofa in her own apartment, leaning on the breast of her
father, gazing silently through the open doors into the
forward
cabin; for all idea of retiring within oneself, unless
it might be to secret prayer, was banished from the mind.
Even Mr. Dodge had forgotten the gnawings of envy, his
philanthropical and exclusive democracy, and, what was
perhaps more convincing still of his passing views of this
sublunary world, his profound deference for rank, as
betrayed
in his strong desire to cultivate an intimacy with Sir
George Templemore. As for the baronet himself, he sat
by the cabin-table with his face buried in his hands, and
once he had been heard to express a regret that he had
ever embarked.
Saunders broke the moody stillness of this characteristic
party, with preparations for a supper. He took but one
end of the table for his cloth, and a single cover showed
that Captain Truck was about to dine, a thing he had not
yet done that day. The attentive steward had an eye to
his commander's tastes; for it is not often one sees a better
garnished board than was spread on this occasion, so far at
least as quantity was concerned. Besides the usual solids
of ham, corned-beef, and roasted shoat, there were carcasses
of ducks, pickled oystersa delicacy almost peculiar to
12 *
Americaand all the minor condiments of olives, anchovies,
dates, figs, almonds, raisins, cold potatoes, and puddings,
displayed in a single course, and arranged on the table
solely with regard to the reach of Captain Truck's arm.
Although Saunders was not quite without taste, he too well
knew the propensities of his superior to neglect any of these
important essentials, and great care was had, in particular,
so to dispose of everything as to render the whole so many
radii diverging from a common centre, which centre was
the stationary arm-chair that the master of the packet loved
to fill in his hours of ease.
You will make many voyages, Mr. Toast,the
steward
affectedly gave his subordinate, or as he was sometimes
facetiously called, the steward's mate, reason to understand,
when they had retired to the pantry to await the captain's
appearancebefore you accumulate all the niceties of a
gentleman's dinner. Every
plat
, (Saunders had been in
the Havre line, where he had caught a few words of this
nature,) every
plat
should be within reach of the
convive's
arm, and particularly if it happen to be Captain Truck, who
has a great awersion to delays at his diet. As for the
entremets
, they may be scattered miscellaneously with the
salt and the mustard, so that they can come with facility in
their proper places.
I don't know what an
entremet
is, returned the
subordinate
,
and I exceedingly desire, sir, to receive my orders
in such English as a gentleman can diwine.
An
entremet
, Mr. Toast, is a mouthful thrown in
promiscuously
between the reliefs of the solids. Now,
suppose
a gentleman begins on pig; when he has eaten enough
of this, he likes a little brandy and water, or a glass of
porter, before he cuts into the beef; and while I'm mixing
the first, or starting the cork, he refreshes himself with an
entremet
, such as a wing of a duck, or perhaps a plate of
pickled oysters. You must know that there is great odds
in passengers; one set eating and jollifying, from the hour
we sail till the hour we get in, while another takes the ocean
as it might be sentimentally.
Sentimentally, sir! I s'pose those be they as uses the
basins uncommon?
That depends on the weather. I've known a party
not eat as much as would set one handsome table in a week,
and then, when they conwalesced, it was intimidating how
they dewoured. It makes a great difference, too, whether
the passengers acquiesce well together or not, for agreeable
feelings give a fine appetite. Lovers make cheap
passengers
always.
That is extr'or'nary, for I thought such as they was
always hard to please, with every thing but one another.
You never were more mistaken. I've seen a lover
who couldn't tell a sweet potato from an onion, or a
canvas-back
from an old wife. But of all mortals in the way of
passengers, the bag-man or go-between is my greatest
animosity
.
These fellows will sit up all night, if the captain
consents, and lie abed next day, and do nothing but drink
in their berths. Now, this time we have a compliable set,
and on the whole, it is quite a condescension and pleasure
to wait on them.
Well, I think, Mr. Saunders, they isn't alike as much
as they might be nother.
Not more so than wenison and pig. Perfectly correct,
sir; for this cabin is a lobskous as regards deportment and
character. I set all the Effinghams down as tip-tops, or,
A No. 1, as Mr. Leach calls the ship; and then Mr. Sharp
and Mr. Blunt are quite the gentlemen. Nothing is easier,
Mr. Toast, than to tell a gentleman; and as you have set
up a new profession,in which I hope, for the credit of the
colour, you will be prosperous,it is well worth your while
to know how this is done, especially as you need never
expect much from a passenger, that is not a true gentleman,
but trouble. There is Mr. John Effingham, in particular;
his man says he never anticipates change, and if a coat
confines his arm, he repudiates it on the spot.
Well, it must be a satisfaction to serve such a
companion
.
I think Mr. Dodge, sir, quite a feller.
Your taste, Toast, is getting to be observable, and by
cultivating it, you will soon be remarkable for a knowledge
of mankind. Mr. Dodge, as you werry justly insinuate, is
not werry refined, or particularly well suited to figure in
genteel society.
And yet he seems attached to it, Mr. Saunders, for he
has purposed to establish five or six societies since we
sailed.
Werry true, sir; but then every society is not genteel.
When we get back to New York, Toast, I must see and
get you into a better set than the one you occupied when
we sailed. You will not do yet for our circle, which is
altogether
conclusive; but you might be elevated. Mr. Dodge
has been electioneering with me, to see if we cannot inwent
a society among the steerage-passengers for the abstinence
of liquors, and another for the perpetration of the morals
and religious principles of our forefathers. As for the first,
Toast, I told him it was sufficiently indurable to be confined
in a hole like the steerage, without being percluded from the
consolation of a little drink; and as for the last, it appeared
to me that such a preposition inwolwed an attack on liberty
of conscience.
There you give'd him, sir, quite as good as he sent,
returned the steward's mate, chuckling, or perhaps
sniggering
would be a word better suited to his habits of
cachinnation
,
and I should have been glad to witness his
confusion
.
It seems to me, Mr. Saunders, that Mr. Dodge
loves to get up his societies in support of liberty and
religion
,
that he may predominate over both by his own
inwentions.
Saunders laid his long yellow finger on the broad flat
nose of his mate, with an air of approbation, as he replied,
Toast, you have hit his character as pat as I touch
your Roman. He is a man fit to make proselytes among
the wulgar and Irish,the Hibernian peasant and the
American negro are sworn enemiesbut quite unfit for
anything respectable or decent. Were it not for Sir George,
I would scarcely descend to clean his state-room.
What is your sentiments, Mr. Saunders, respecting Sir
George?
Why, Sir George is a titled gentleman, and of course
is not to be strictured too freely. He has complimented me
already with a sovereign, and apprised me of his intention
to be more particular when we get in.
I feel astonished such a gentleman should neglect to
insure a state-room to his own convenience.
Sir George has elucidated all that in a conversation we
had in his room, soon after our acquaintance commenced.
He is going to Canada on public business, and sailed at an
hour's interval. He was too late for a single room, and his
own man is to follow with most of his effects by the next
ship. Oh! Sir George may be safely put down as
respectable
and liberalized, though thrown into disparagement
perhaps
by forty circumstances.
Mr. Saunders, who had run his vocabulary hard in this
conversation, meant to say fortuitous; and Toast thought
that so many circumstances might well reduce a better man
to a dilemma. After a moment of thought, or what in his
orbicular shining features he fancied passed for thought, he
said,
I seem to diwine, Mr. Saunders, that the Effinghams
do not much intimate Sir George.
Saunders looked out of the pantry-door to reconnoitre,
and finding the sober quiet already described reigning, he
opened a drawer, and drew forth a London newspaper.
To treat you with the confidence of a gentleman in a
situation as respectable and responsible as the one you
occupy
,
Mr. Toast, he said, a little ewent has transpired in
my presence yesterday, that I thought sufficiently particular
to be designated by retaining this paper. Mr. Sharp and
Sir George happened to be in the cabin together, alone, and
the last, as it suggested to me, Toast, was desirous of
removing
some of the haughter of the first, for you may have
observed that there has been no conversation between any
of the Effinghams, or Mr. Blunt, or Mr. Sharp, and the
baronet; and so to break the ice of his haughter, as it might
be, Sir George says, `Really, Mr. Sharp, the papers have
got to be so personally particular, that one cannot run into
the country for a mouthful of fresh air that they don't
record it. Now, I thought not a soul knew of my departure
for America, and yet here you see they have mentioned it,
with more particulars than are agreeable.' On concluding,
Sir George gave Mr. Sharp this paper, and indicated this here
paragraph. Mr. Sharp perused it, laid down the paper, and
retorted coldly, `It is indeed quite surprising, sir; but
impudence
is a general fault of the age.' And then he left
the cabin solus. Sir George was so wexed, he went into
his state-room and forgot the paper, which fell to the
steward, you know, on a principle laid down in Wattel,
Toast.
Here the two worthies indulged in a smothered
merriment
of their own at the expense of their commander; for
though a dignified man in general, Mr. Saunders could
laugh on occasion, and according to his own opinion of
himself he danced particularly well.
Would you like to read the paragraph, Mr. Toast?
Quite unnecessary, sir; your account will be perfectly
legible and satisfactory.
By this touch of politeness, Mr. Toast, who knew as
much of the art of reading as a monkey commonly knows
of mathematics, got rid of the awkwardness of
acknowledging
the careless manner in which he had trifled with his
early opportunities. Luckily, Mr. Saunders, who had been
educated as a servant in a gentleman's family, was better
off, and as he was vain of all his advantages, he was
particularly
pleased to have an opportunity of exhibiting them.
Turning to the paragraph he read the following lines, in
that sort of didactic tone and elaborate style with which
gentlemen who commence the graces after thirty are a
little
apt to make bows:
We understand Sir George Templemore, Bart., the
member for Boodleigh, is about to visit our American
colonies
,
with a view to make himself intimately acquainted
with the merits of the unpleasant questions by which they
are just now agitated, and with the intention of entering
into the debates in the house on that interesting subject on
his return. We believe that Sir George will sail in the
packet of the first from Liverpool, and will return in time
to be in his seat after the Easter holidays. His people and
effects left town yesterday by the Liverpool coach. During
the baronet's absence, his country will be hunted by Sir
Gervaise de Brush, though the establishment at
Templemore
Hall will be kept up.
How came Sir George here, then? Mr. Toast very
naturally inquired.
Having been kept too late in London, he was obliged
to come this way or to be left. It is sometimes as close
work to get the passengers on board, Mr. Toast, as to get
the people. I have often admired how gentlemen and ladies
love procrastinating, when dishes that ought to be taken
hot, are getting to be quite insipid and uneatable.
Saunders! cried the hearty voice of Captain Truck,
who had taken possession of what he called his throne in
the cabin. All the steward's elegant diction and finish of
demeanour vanished at the well-known sound, and
thrusting
his head out of the pantry-door, he gave the prompt
ship-answer to a call,
Ay, ay, sir!
Come, none of your dictionary in the pantry there, but
show your physiognomy in my presence. What the devil
do you think Vattel would say to such a supper as this?
I think, sir, he would call it a werry good supper, for
a ship in a hard gale of wind. That's my honest opinion,
Captain Truck, and I never deceive any gentleman in a
matter of food. I think, Mr. Wattel would approve of that
there supper, sir.
Perhaps he might, for he has made blunders as well as
another man. Go, mix me a glass of just what I love,
when I've not had a drop all day. Gentlemen, will any of
you honour me, by sharing in a cut? This beef is not
indigestible
,
and here is a real Marylander, in the way of a
ham. No want of oakum to fill up the chinks with, either.
Most of the gentlemen were too full of the gale to wish
to eat; besides they had not fasted like Captain Truck
since morning. But Mr. Monday, the bagman, as John
Effingham had termed him, and who had been often enough
at sea to know something of its varieties, consented to take
a glass of brandy and water, as a corrective of the
Madeira
he had been swallowing. The appetite of Captain Truck
was little affected by the state of the weather, however; for
though too attentive to his duties to quit the deck until he
had ascertained how matters were going on, now that he
had fairly made up his mind to eat, he set about it with a
heartiness and simplicity that proved his total disregard of
appearances when his hunger was sharp. For some time
he was too much occupied to talk, making regular attacks
upon the different
plats
, as Mr. Saunders called them,
without much regard to the cookery or the material. The
only pauses were to drink, and this was always done with
a steadiness that never left a drop in the glass. Still Mr.
Truck was a temperate man; for he never consumed more
than his physical wants appeared to require, or his
physical
energies knew how to dispose of. At length, however,
he came to the steward's
entrements
, or he began to stuff
what he, himself, had called oakum, into the chinks of
his dinner.
Mr. Sharp had watched the whole process from the ladies'
cabin, as indeed had Eve, and thinking this a favourable
occasion to ascertain the state of things on deck, the former
came into the main-cabin, commissioned by the latter, to
make the inquiry.
The ladies are desirous of knowing where we are, and
what is the state of the gale, Captain Truck, said the
gentleman
,
when he had seated himself near the throne.
My dear young lady, called out the captain, by way
of cutting short the diplomacy of employing ambassadors
between them, I wish in my heart I could persuade you
and Mademoiselle V. A. V., (for so he called the governess,
in imitation of Eve's pronunciation of her name,) to try a
few of these pickled oysters; they are as delicate as
yourselves
,
and worthy to be set before a mermaid, if there
were any such thing.
I thank you for the compliment, Captain Truck, and
while I ask leave to decline it, I beg leave to refer you to
the plenipotentiary Mademoiselle Viefville (Eve would not
say herself) has intrusted with her wishes.
Thus you perceive, sir, interposed Mr. Sharp again,
you will have to treat with me, by all the principles laid
down by Vattel.
And treat you, too, my good sir. Let me persuade
you to try a slice of this anti-abolitionist, laying his knife
on the ham, which he still continued to regard himself with
a sort of melancholy interest. No? well, I hold
over-persuasion
as the next thing to neglect. I am satisfied, sir,
after all, as Saunders says, that Vattel himself, unless more
unreasonable at his grub than in matters of state, would be
a happier man after he had been at his table twenty minutes,
than before he sat down.
Mr. Sharp perceiving that it was idle to pursue his
inquiry
while the other was in one of his discursive humours,
determined to let things take their course, and fell into the
captain's own vein.
If Vattel would approve of the repast, few men ought
to repine at their fortune in being so well provided.
I flatter myself, sir, that I understand a supper,
espepecially
in a gale of wind, as well as Mr. Vattel, or any
other man could do.
And yet Vattel was one of the most celebrated cooks
of his day.
Captain Truck stared, looked his grave companion
steadily in the eye, for he was too much addicted to
mystifying
,
not to distrust others, and picked his teeth with
redoubled vigilance.
Vattel a cook! This is the first I ever heard of it.
There was a Vattel, in a former age, who stood at the
head of his art as a cook; this I can assure you, on my
honour: he may not have been your Vattel, however.
Sir, there never were two Vattels. This is
extraordinary
news to me, and I scarcely know how to receive it.
If you doubt my information, you may ask any of the
other passengers. Either of the Mr. Effinghams, or Mr.
Blunt, or Miss Effingham, or Mademoiselle Viefville will
confirm what I tell you, I think; especially the latter, for
he was her countryman.
Hereupon Captain Truck began to stuff in the oakum
again, for the calm countenance of Mr. Sharp produced an
effect; and as he was pondering on the consequences of his
oracle's turning out to be a cook, he thought it not amiss to
be eating, as it were, incidentally. After swallowing a
dozen olives, six or eight anchovies, as many pickled
oysters
,
and raisins and almonds, as the advertisements say
polont
, he suddenly struck his fist on the table, and
announced
his intention of putting the question to both the
ladies.
My dear young lady, he called out, will you do me
the honour to say whether you ever heard of a cook of the
name of Vattel?
Vol. I.13
Eve laughed, and her sweet tones were infectious amid
the dull howling of the gale, which was constantly heard in
the cabins, like a bass accompaniment, or the distant roar
of a cataract among the singing of birds.
Certainly, captain, she answered; Mr. Vattel was
not only a cook, but perhaps the most celebrated on record,
for sentiment at least, if not for skill.
I make no doubt the man did his work well, let him be
set about what he might; and, mademoiselle, he was a
countryman of yours, they tell me?
Assurement
, Monsieur Vattel has left more distinguished
souvenirs
than any other cook in France.
Captain Truck turned quickly to the elated and admiring
Saunders, who felt his own glory enhanced by this
important
discovery, and said in that short-hand way he had of
expressing himself to the chief of the pantry,
Do you hear that, sir; see and find out what they are,
and dress me a dish of these
souvenirs
as soon as we get
in. I dare say they are to be had at the Fulton market,
and mind while there to look out for some tongues and
sounds. I've not made half a supper to-night, for the want
of them. I dare say these
souvenirs
are capital eating, if
Monsieur Vattel thought so highly of them. Pray,
mademoiselle
,
is the gentleman dead?
Hlas, oui! How could he live with a sword run through
his body?
Ha! killed in a duel, I declare; died fighting for his
principles, if the truth were known! I shall have a double
respect for his opinion, for this is the touchstone of a man's
honesty. Mr. Sharp, let us take a glass of Geissenheimer
to his memory; we might honour a less worthy man.
As the captain poured out the liquor, a fall of several
tons of water on the deck shook the entire ship, and one of
the passengers in the hurricane-house, opening a door to
ascertain the cause, the sound of the hissing waters and of
the roaring winds came fresher and more distinct into the
cabin. Mr. Truck cast an eye at the tell-tale over his head
to ascertain the course of the ship, and paused just an
instant
,
and then tossed off his wine.
This hint reminds me of my mission, Mr. Sharp
rejoined
.
The ladies desire to know your opinion of the
state of the weather?
I owe them an answer, if it were only in gratitude for
the hint about Vattel. Who the devil would have supposed
the man ever was a cook! But these Frenchmen are not
like the rest of mankind, and half the nation are cooks, or
live by food, in some way or other.
And very good cooks, too, Monsieur le Capitaine, said
Mademoiselle Viefville. Monsieur Vattel did die for the
honour of his art. He fell on his own sword, because the
fish did not arrive in season for the dinner of the king.
Captain Truck looked more astonished than ever. Then
turning short round to the steward, he shook his head and
exclaimed,
Do you hear that, sir? How often would you have
died, if a sword had been run through you every time the
fish was forgotten, or was too late? Once, to a dead
certainty
,
about these very tongues and sounds.
But the weather? interrupted Mr. Sharp.
The weather, my dear sir; the weather, my dear
ladies
,
is very good weather, with the exception of winds and
waves, of which unfortunately there are, just now, more of
both than we want. The ship must scud, and as we go
like a race-horse, without stopping to take breath, we may
see the Canary Islands before the voyage is over. Of
danger
there is none in this ship, as long as we can keep clear
of the land, and in order that this may be done, I will just
step into my state-room, and find out exactly where we are.
On receiving this information, the passengers retired for
the night, Captain Truck setting about his task in good
earnest
.
The result of his calculations showed that they would
run westward of Madeira, which was all he cared about
immediately, intending always to haul up to his course on
the first good occasion.
CHAPTER XIII.
There are yet two things in my destiny
A world to roam o'er, and a home with thee.
Byron
.
Eve Effingham
slept little: although the motion of the
ship had been much more severe and uncomfortable while
contending with head-winds, on no other occasion were
there so many signs of a fierce contention of the elements
as in this gale. As she lay in her berth, her ear was
within
a foot of the roaring waters without, and her frame
trembled as she heard them gurgling so distinctly, that it
seemed as if they had already forced their way through the
seams of the planks, and were filling the ship. Sleep she
could not, for a long time, therefore, and during two hours
she remained with closed eyes an entranced and yet
startled
listener of the fearful strife that was raging over the
ocean. Night had no stillness, for the roar of the winds
and waters was incessant, though deadened by the
intervening
decks and sides; but now and then an open door
admitted, as it might be, the whole scene into the cabins.
At such moments every sound was fresh, and frightfully
grand,even the shout of the officer coming to the ear like
a warning cry from the deep.
At length Eve, wearied by her apprehensions even, fell
into a troubled sleep, in which her frightened faculties,
however
,
kept so much on the alert, that at no time was the
roar of the tempest entirely lost to her sense of hearing.
About midnight the glare of a candle crossed her eyes, and
she was broad awake in an instant. On rising in her berth
she found Nanny Sidley, who had so often and so long
watched over her infant and childish slumbers, standing at
her side, and gazing wistfully in her face.
'Tis a dread night, Miss Eve, half whispered the
appalled domestic. I have not been able to sleep for
thinking of you, and of what might happen on these wide
waters!
And why of me particularly, my good Nanny?
returned
Eve, smiling in the face of her old nurse as sweetly
as the infant smiles in its moments of tenderness and
recollection
.
Why so much of me, my excellent Ann?are
there not others too, worthy of your care? my beloved
father  your own good self  Mademoiselle Viefville
cousin Jackand the warm colour deepened on the
cheek of the beautiful girl, she scarcely knew why herself
and many others in the vessel, that one, kind as you,
might think of, I should hope, when your thoughts become
apprehensions, and your wishes prayers.
There are many precious souls in the ship, ma'am, out
of all question; and I'm sure no one wishes them all safe
on land again more than myself; but it seems to me, no one
among them all is so much loved as you.
Eve leaned forward playfully, and drawing her old nurse
towards her, kissed her cheek, while her own eyes glistened,
and then she laid her flushed cheek on that bosom which
had so frequently been its pillow before. After remaining
a minute in this affectionate attitude, she rose and inquired
if her nurse had been on deck.
I go every half-hour, Miss Eve; for I feel it as much
my duty to watch over you here, as when I had you all to
myself in the cradle. I do not think your father sleeps a
great deal to-night, and several of the gentlemen in the
other cabins remain dressed; they ask me how you spend
the time in this tempest, whenever I pass their state-room
doors.
Eve's colour deepened, and Ann Sidley thought she had
never seen her child more beautiful, as the bright luxuriant
golden hair, which had strayed from the confinement of the
cap, fell on the warm cheek, and rendered eyes that were
always full of feeling, softer and more brilliant even than
common.
They conceal their uneasiness for themselves under an
affected concern for me, my good Nanny, she said
hurriedly
;
and your own affection makes you an easy dupe
to the artifice.
13 *
It may be so, ma'am, for I know but little of the ways
of the world. It is fearful, is it not, Miss Eve, to think
that we are in a ship, so far from any land, whirling along
over the bottom as fast as a horse could plunge?
The danger is not exactly of that nature, perhaps,
Nanny.
There is a bottom to the ocean, is there not? I have
heard some maintain there is no bottom to the seaand
that would make the danger so much greater. I think, if
I felt certain that the bottom was not very deep, and there
was only a rock to be seen now and then, I should not find
it so very dreadful.
Eve laughed like a child, and the contrast between the
sweet simplicity of her looks, her manners, and her more
cultivated intellect, and the matronly appearance of the less
instructed Ann, made one of those pictures in which the
superiority of mind over all other things becomes most
apparent
.
Your notions of safety, my dear Nanny, she said,
are not precisely those of a seaman; for I believe there
is nothing of which they stand more in dread than of rocks
and the bottom.
I fear I'm but a poor sailor, ma'am, for in my judgment
we could have no greater consolation in such a tempest than
to see them all around us. Do you think, Miss Eve, that
the bottom of the ocean, if there is truly a bottom, is
whitened with the bones of ship-wrecked mariners, as
people
say?
I doubt not, my excellent Nanny, that the great deep
might give up many awful secrets; but you ought to think
less of these things, and more of that merciful Providence
which has protected us through so many dangers since we
have been wanderers. You are in much less danger now
than I have known you to be, and escape unharmed.
I! Miss Eve!Do you suppose that I fear for myself?
What matters it if a poor old woman like me die a few
years sooner or later, or where her frail old body is laid?
I have never been of so much account when living as to
make it of consequence where the little which will remain
to decay when dead moulders into dust. Do not, I implore
you, Miss Effingham, suppose me so selfish as to feel any
uneasiness to-night on my own account.
Is it then, as usual, all for me, my dear, my worthy old
nurse, that you feel this anxiety? Put your heart at ease,
for they who know best betray no alarm; and you may
observe that the captain sleeps as tranquilly this night as
on any other.
But he is a rude man, and accustomed to danger. He
has neither wife nor children, and I'll engage has never
given a thought to the horrors of having a form precious as
this floating in the caverns of the ocean, amidst ravenous
fish and sea-monsters.
Here her imagination overcame poor Nanny Sidley, and
she folded her arms about the beautiful person of Eve, and
sobbed violently. Her young mistress, accustomed to
similar
exhibitions of affection, soothed her with blandishments
and assurances that soon restored her self-command, when
the dialogue was resumed with a greater appearance of
tranquillity on the part of the nurse. They conversed a
few minutes on the subject of their reliance on God, Eve
returning fourfold, or with the advantages of a cultivated
intellect, many of those simple lessons of faith and humility
that she had received from her companion when a child;
the latter listening, as she always did, to these exhortations,
which sounded in her ears, like the echoes of all her own
better thoughts, with a love and reverence no other could
awaken. Eve passed her small white hand over the
wrinkled
cheek of Nanny in kind fondling, as it had been passed
a thousand times when a child, an act she well knew her
nurse delighted in, and continued,
And now, my good old Nanny, you will set your heart
at ease, I know; for though a little too apt to trouble
yourself
about one who does not deserve half your care, you
are much too sensible and too humble to feel distrust out of
reason. We will talk of something else a few minutes, and
then you will lie down and rest your weary body.
Weary! I should never feel weary in watching, when
I thought there was a cause for it.
Although Nanny made no allusion to herself, Eve
understood
in whose behalf this watchfulness was meant. She
drew the face of the old woman towards her, and left a kiss
on each cheek ere she continued:
These ships have other things to talk about, besides
their dangers, she said. Do you not find it odd, at least,
that a vessel of war should be sent to follow us about the
ocean in this extraordinary way?
Quite so, ma'am, and I did intend to speak to you about
it, some time when I saw you had nothing better to think
of. At first I fancied, but I believe it was a silly thought,
that some of the great English lords and admirals that used
to be so much about us at Paris, and Rome, and Vienna,
had sent this ship to see you safe to America, Miss Eve;
for I never supposed they would make so much fuss
concerning
a poor runaway couple, like these
steerage-passengers
.
Eve did not refrain from laughing again, at this conceit
of Nanny's, for her temperament was gay as childhood,
though well restrained by cultivation and manner, and
once more she patted the cheek of her nurse kindly.
Those great lords and admirals are not great enough
for that, dear Nanny, even had they the inclination to do
so silly a thing. But has no other reason suggested
itself
to you, among the many curious circumstances you
may have had occasion to observe in the ship?
Nanny looked at Eve, and turned her eyes aside, glanced
furtively at the young lady again, and at last felt compelled
to answer.
I endeavour, ma'am, to think well of everybody, though
strange thoughts will sometimes arise without our wishing
it. I suppose I know to what you allude; but I don't feel
quite certain it becomes me to speak.
With me at least, Nanny, you need have no reserves,
and I confess a desire to learn if we have thought alike
about some of our fellow-passengers. Speak freely, then;
for you can have no more apprehension in communicating
all your thoughts to me, than in communicating them to
your own child.
Not as much, ma'am, not half as much; for you are
both child and mistress to me, and I look quite as much to
receiving advice as to giving it. It is odd, Miss Eve, that
gentlemen should not pass under their proper names, and I
have had unpleasant feelings about it, though I did not think
it became me to be the first to speak, while your father was
with you, and mamerzelle, for so Nanny always styled
the governess, and Mr. John, all of whom love you
almost
as much as I do, and all of whom are so much better
judges of what is right. But now you encourage me to
speak my mind, Miss Eve, I will say I should like that no
one came near you who does not carry his heart in his open
hand, that the youngest child might know his character and
understand his motives.
Eve smiled as her nurse grew warm, but she blushed in
spite of an effort to seem indifferent.
This would be truly a vain wish, dear Nanny, in the
mixed company of a ship, she said. It is too much to
expect that strangers will throw aside all their reserves, on
first finding themselves in close communion. The
well-bred
and prudent will only stand more on their guard
under
such circumstances.
Strangers, ma'am!
I perceive that you recollect the face of one of our
shipmates
.
Why do you shake your head? The tell-tale
blood of Eve again mantled over her lovely countenance.
I suppose I ought to have said
two
of our shipmates,
though I had doubted whether you retained any recollection
of one of them.
No gentleman ever speaks to you twice, Miss Eve,
that I do not remember him.
Thank you, dearest Nanny, for this and a thousand
other proofs of your never-ceasing interest in my welfare;
but I had not believed you so vigilant as to take heed of
every face that happens to approach me.
Ah, Miss Eve! neither of these gentlemen would like
to be mentioned by you in this careless manner, I'm sure.
They both did a great deal more than `happen to approach
you;' for as to
Hist! dear Nanny; we are in a crowded place, and
you may be overheard. You will use no names, therefore,
as I believe we understand each other without going into
all these particulars. Now, my dear nurse, would I give
something to know which of these young men has made
the most favourable impression on your upright and
conscientious
mind?
Nay, Miss Eve, what is my judgment in comparison
with your own, and that of Mr. John Effingham, and
My cousin Jack! In the name of wonder, Nanny,
what has he to do with the matter?
Nothing, ma'am; only I can see he has his favourites
as well as another, and I'll venture to say Mr. Dodge is not
the greatest he has in this ship.
I think you might add Sir George Templemore, too,
returned Eve, laughing.
Ann Sidley looked hard at her young mistress, and
smiled before she answered; and then she continued the
discourse naturally, as if there had been no interruption.
Quite likely, ma'am; and Mr. Monday, and all the rest
of that set. But you see how soon he discovers a real
gentleman
;
for he is quite easy and friendly with Mr. Sharp
and Mr. Blunt, particularly the last.
Eve was silent, for she did not like the open introduction
of these names, though she scarce knew why herself.
My cousin is a man of the world, she resumed, on
perceiving that Nanny watched her countenance with
solicitude
,
as if fearful of having gone too far; and there is
nothing surprising in his discovering men of his own class.
We know both these persons to be not exactly what they
seem, though I think we know no harm of either, unless it
be the silly change of names. It would have been better
had they come on board, bearing their proper appellations;
to us, at least, it would have been more respectful, though
both affirm they were ignorant that my father had taken
passage in the Montauk,a circumstance that may very
well be true, as you know we got the cabin that was first
engaged by another party.
I should be sorry, ma'am, if either failed in respect.
It is not quite adulatory to make a young woman the
involuntary keeper of the secrets of two unreflecting young
men; that is all, my good Nanny. We cannot well betray
them, and we are consequently their confidants
par force
.
The most amusing part of the thing is, that they are
masters
of each other's secrets, in part at least, and feel a
delightful
awkwardness in a hundred instances. For my
own part I pity neither, but think each is fairly enough
punished
.
They will be fortunate if their servants do not
betray them before we reach New York.
No fear of that, ma'am, for they are discreet, cautious
men, and if disposed to blab, Mr. Dodge has given both
good opportunities already, as I believe he has put to them
as many questions as there are speeches in the catechism.
Mr. Dodge is a vulgar man.
So we all say, ma'am, in the servants' cabin, and
everybody
is so set against him there, that there is little chance
of his learning much. I hope, Miss Eve, mamerzelle does
not distrust either of the gentlemen?
Surely you cannot suspect Mademoiselle Viefville of
indiscretion, Nanny; a better spirit, or a better tone than
hers, does not exist.
No, ma'am, 't is not that: but I should like to have one
more secret with you, all to myself. I honour and respect
mamerzelle, who has done a thousand times more for you
than a poor ignorant woman like me could have done, with
all my zeal; but I do believe, Miss Eve, I love your shoe
tie better than she loves your pure and beautiful spirit.
Mademoiselle Viefville is an excellent woman, and I
believe is sincerely attached to me.
She would be a wretch else. I do not deny her
attachment
,
but I only say it is nothing, it ought to be nothing, it
can be nothing, it shall be nothing, compared to that of the
one who first held you in her arms, and who has always
held you in her heart. Mamerzelle can sleep such a night
as this, which I'm sure she could not do were she as much
concerned for you as I am.
Eve knew that jealousy of Mademoiselle Viefville was
Nanny's greatest weakness, and drawing the old woman to
her, she entwined her arms around her neck and complained
of drowsiness. Accustomed to watching, and really unable
to sleep, the nurse now passed a perfectly happy hour in
holding her child, who literally dropped asleep on her
bosom; after which Nanny slid into the berth beneath, in
her clothes, and finally lost the sense of her apprehensions
in perturbed slumbers.
A cry on deck awoke all in the cabins early on the
succeeding
morning. It was scarcely light, but a common
excitement
seized every passenger, and ten minutes had not
elapsed when Eve and her governess appeared in the
hurricane-house
,
the last of those who came from below. Few
questions had been asked, but all hurried on deck with their
apprehensions awakened by the gale, increased to the sense
of some positive and impending danger.
Nothing, however, was immediately apparent to justify
all this sudden clamour. The gale continued, if anything,
with increased power; the ocean was rolling over its
cataracts
of combing seas, with which the ship was still racing,
driven under the strain of a reefed forecourse, the only
canvas that was set. Even with this little sail the hull was
glancing through the raging seas, or rather in their
company
,
at a rate a little short of ten miles in the hour.
Captain Truck was in the mizzen-rigging, bare-headed,
every lock of hair he had blowing out like a pennant.
Occasionally
he signed to the man at the wheel which way to
put the helm; for instead of sleeping, as many had
supposed
,
he had been conning the ship for hours in the same
situation. As Eve appeared, he was directing the attention
of several of the gentlemen to some object astern, but a
very few moments put all on deck in possession of the facts.
About a cable's length, on one of the quarters of the
Montauk, was a ship careering before the gale like
themselves
,
though carrying more canvas, and consequently
driving faster through the water. The sudden appearance
of this vessel in the sombre light of the morning, when
objects were seen distinctly but without the glare of day;
the dark hull, relieved by a single narrow line of white
paint, dotted with ports; the glossy hammock-cloths, and
all those other coverings of dark glistening canvas which
give to a cruiser an air of finish and comfort, like that of a
travelling carriage; the symmetry of the spars, and the
gracefulness of all the lines, whether of the hull or hamper,
told all who knew anything of such subjects, that the
stranger was a vessel of war. To this information Captain
Truck added that it was their old pursuer the Foam.
She is corvette-built, said the master of the Montauk,
and is obliged to carry more canvas than we, in order to
keep out of the way of the seas; for, if one of these big
fellows should overtake her, and throw its crest into her
waist, she would become like a man who has taken too
much Saturday-night, and with whom a second dose might
settle the purser's books forever.
Such in fact was the history of the sudden appearance
of this ship. She had lain-to as long as possible, and on
being driven to scud, carried a close-reefed maintop-sail, a
show of canvas that urged her through the water about
two knots to the hour faster than the rate of the packet.
Necessarily following the same course, she overtook the
latter just as the day began to dawn. The cry had arisen
on her sudden discovery, and the moment had now arrived
when she was about to come up, quite abreast of her late
chase. The passage of the Foam, under such
circumstances
,
was a grand but thrilling thing. Her captain, too,
was seen in the mizzen-rigging of his ship, rocked by the
gigantic billows over which the fabric was careering. He
held a speaking-trumpet in his hand, as if still bent on his
duty, in the midst of that awful warring of the elements.
Captain Truck called for a trumpet in his turn, and fearful
of consequences he waved it to the other to keep more
aloof. The injunction was either misunderstood, the
man-of-war's
man was too much bent on his object, or the ocean
was too uncontrollable for such a purpose, the corvette
driving up on a sea quite abeam of the packet, and in
fearful
proximity. The Englishman applied the trumpet, and
words were heard amid the roaring of the winds. At that
time the white field of old Albion, with the St. George's
cross, rose over the bulwarks, and by the time it had
reached the gaff-end, the bunting was whipping in ribbons.
Show 'em the gridiron! growled Captain Truck
through his trumpet, with its mouth turned in board.
As everything was ready this order was instantly obeyed,
and the stripes of America were soon seen fluttering nearly
in separate pieces. The two ships now ran a short distance
in parallel lines, rolling from each other so heavily that the
bright copper of the corvette was seen nearly to her keel.
The Englishman, who seemed a portion of his ship, again
Vol. I.  14
tried his trumpet; the detached words of lie-by,
orders
,communicate,
were caught by one or two, but
the howling of the gale rendered all connexion in the
meaning
impossible. The Englishman ceased his efforts to make
himself heard, for the two ships were now rolling-to, and
it appeared as if their spars would interlock. There was
an instant when Mr. Leach had his hand on the main-brace
to let it go; but the Foam started away on a sea, like a
horse that feels the spur, and disobeying her helm, shot
forward, as if about to cross the Montauk's forefoot.
A breathless instant followed, for all on board the two
ships thought they must now inevitably come foul of each
other, and this the more so, because the Montauk took the
impulse of the sea just as it was lost to the Foam, and
seemed on the point of plunging directly into the stern of
the latter. Even the seamen clenched the ropes around
them convulsively, and the boldest held their breaths for a
time. The p-o-r-t, hard a port, and be dd to you!
of Captain Truck; and the S-t-a-r-b-o-a-r-d, starboard
hard! of the Englishman, were both distinctly audible to
all in the two ships; for this was a moment in which
seamen
can speak louder than the tempest. The affrighted
vessels seemed to recede together, and they shot asunder in
diverging lines, the Foam leading. All further attempts at
a communication were instantly useless; the corvette being
half a mile ahead in a quarter of an hour, rolling her
yard-arms
nearly to the water.
Captain Truck said little to his passengers concerning
this adventure; but when he had lighted a cigar, and was
discussing the matter with his chief-mate, he told the latter
there was just one minute when he would not have given
a ship's biscuit for both vessels, nor much more for their
cargoes. A man must have a small regard for human
souls, when he puts them, and their bodies too, in so much
jeopardy for a little tobacco.
Throughout the day it blew furiously, for the ship was
running into the gale, a phenomenon that we shall explain,
as most of our readers may not comprehend it. All gales
of wind commence to leeward; or, in other words, the wind
is first felt at some particular point, and later, as we recede
from that point, proceeding in the direction from which the
wind blows. It is always severest near the point where it
commences, appearing to diminish in violence as it recedes.
This, therefore, is an additional motive for mariners to
lie-to
,
instead of scudding, since the latter not only carries
them far from their true course, but it carries them also
nearer to the scene of the greatest fury of the elements.
CHAPTER XIV.
Good boatswain, have care.
Tempest
.
At
sunset, the speck presented by the reefed top-sail of
the corvette had sunk beneath the horizon, in the southern
board, and that ship was seen no longer. Several islands
had been passed, looking tranquil and smiling amid the fury
of the tempest; but it was impossible to haul up for any
one among them. The most that could be done was to
keep the ship dead before it, to prevent her broaching-to,
and to have a care that she kept clear of those rocks and
of that bottom, for which Nanny Sidley had so much pined.
Familiarity with the scene began to lessen the
apprehensions
of the passengers, and as scudding is an easy process
for those who are liable to sea-sickness, ere another night
shut in, the principal concern was connected with the course
the ship was compelled to steer. The wind had so far
hauled to the westward as to render it certain that the coast
of Africa would lie in their way, if obliged to scud many
hours longer; for Captain Truck's observations, actually
placed him to the southward and eastward of the Canary
Islands. This was a long distance out of his course, but
the rate of sailing rendered the fact sufficiently clear.
This, too, was the precise time when the Montauk felt
the weight of the tempest, or rather, when she experienced
the heaviest portion of that which it was her fate to feel.
Lucky was it for the good ship that she had not been in this
latitude a few hours earlier, when it had blown something
very like a hurricane. The responsibility and danger of
his situation now began seriously to disturb Captain Truck,
although he kept his apprehensions to himself, like a
prudent
officer. All his calculations were gone over again
with the utmost care, the rate of sailing was cautiously
estimated, and the result showed, that ten or fifteen hours
more would inevitably produce shipwreck of another sort,
unless the wind moderated.
Fortumately, the gale began to break about midnight.
The wind still blew tremendously, but it was less steadily,
and there were intervals of half-an-hour at a time when the
ship might have carried much more canvas, even on a
bow-line
:
of course her speed abated in proportion, and, after
the day had dawned, a long and anxious survey from aloft
showed no land to the eastward. When perfectly assured
of this important fact, Captain Truck rubbed his hands with
delight, ordered a coal for his cigar, and began to abuse
Saunders about the quality of the coffee during the blow.
Let there be something creditable, this morning, sir,
added the captain, after a sharp rebuke; and remember
we are down here in the neighbourhood of the country of
your forefathers, where a man ought, in reason, to be on
his good behaviour. If I hear any more of your washy
compounds, I'll put you ashore, and let you run naked a
summer or two with the monkeys and ouran-outangs.
I endeavour, on all proper occasions, to render myself
agreeable to you, Captain Truck, and to all those with
whom I have the happiness to sail, returned the steward;
but the coffee, sir, cannot be very good, sir, in such
weater
,
sir. I do diwine that the wind must blow away its
flavour
,
for I am ready to confess it has not been as odorous
as it usually is, when I have had the honour to prepare it.
As for Africa, sir, I flatter myself, Captain Truck, that you
esteem me too highly to believe I am suited to consort or
resort with the ill-formed and inedicated men who inhabit
that wild country. I misremember whether my ancestors
came from this part of the world or not; but if they did,
sir, my habits and profession entirely unqualify me for their
company, I hope. I know I am only a poor steward, sir,
but you'll please to recollect that your great Mr. Vattel was
nothing but a cook.
Dn the fellow, Leach; I believe it is this conceit that
has spoiled the coffee the last day or two! Do you
suppose
it can be true that a great writer like this man could
really be no better than a cook, or was that Englishman
roasting me, by way of showing how cooking is done
ashore? If it were not for the testimony of the ladies, I
might believe it; but they would not share in such an
indecent
trick. What are you lying-by for, sir? go to your
pantry
,
and remember that the gale is broken, and we shall all
sit down to table this morning, as keen-set as a party of
your brethren ashore here, who had a broiled baby for
breakfast.
Saunders, who
ex-officio
might be said to be trained in
similar lectures, went pouting to his work, taking care to
expend a proper part of his spleen on Mr. Toast, who, quite
as a matter of course, suffered in proportion as his superior
was made to feel, in his own person, the weight of Captain
Truck's authority. It is perhaps fortunate that nature
points out this easy and self-evident mode of relief, else
would the rude habits of a ship sometimes render the
relations
between him who orders and him whose duty it is to
obey, too nearly approaching to the intolerable.
The captain's squalls, however, were of short duration,
and on the present occasion he was soon in even a better
humour than common, as every minute gave the cheering
assurance, that the tempest was fast drawing to a close.
He had finished his third cigar, and was actually issuing
his orders to turn the reef out of the foresail, and to set the
main-top-sail close-reefed, when most of the passengers
appeared
on deck, for the first time that morning.
Here we are, gentlemen! cried Captain Truck, in the
way of salutation, nearer to Guinea than I could wish,
with every prospect, now, of soon working our way across
the Atlantic, and possibly of making a thirty or thirty-five
days' passage of it yet. We have this sea to quiet; and
then I hope to show you what the Montauk has in her,
besides
14 *
her passengers and cargo. I think we have now got
rid of the Foam, as well as of the gale. I did believe, at
one time, her people might be walking and wading on the
coast of Cornwall; but I now believe they are more likely
to try the sands of the great Desert of Sahara.
It is to be hoped they have escaped the latter calamity,
as fortunately as they escaped the first! observed Mr.
Effingham.
It may be so; but the wind has got round to nor'-west,
and has not been sighing these last twelve hours. Cape
Blanco is not a hundred leagues from us, and, at the rate
he was travelling, that gentleman with the
speaking-trumpet
may now be philosophizing over the fragments of his
ship, unless he had the good sense to haul off more to the
westward than he was steering when last seen. His ship
should have been christened the `Scud,' instead of the
`Foam.'
Every one expressed the hope that the ship, to which
their own situation was fairly enough to be ascribed, might
escape this calamity; and all faces regained their
cheerfulness
as they saw the canvas fall, in sign that their own
danger was past. So rapidly, indeed, did the gale now
abate, that the topsails were hardly hoisted before the order
was given to shake out another reef, and within an hour all
the heavier canvas that was proper to carry before the
wind was set, solely with a view to keep the ship steady.
The sea was still fearful, and Captain Truck found himself
obliged to keep off from his course, in order to avoid the
danger of having his decks swept.
The racing with the crest of the waves, however, was
quite done, for the seas soon cease to comb and break, after
the force of the wind is expended.
At no time is the motion of the vessel more unpleasant,
or, indeed, more dangerous, than in the interval that occurs
between the ceasing of a violent gale, and the springing up
of a new wind. The ship is unmanageable, and falling
into the troughs of the sea, the waves break in upon her
decks, often doing serious injury, while the spars and
rigging
are put to the severest trial by the sudden and violent
surges which they have to withstand. Of all this Captain
Truck was fully aware, and when he was summoned to
breakfast he gave many cautions to Mr. Leach before
quitting the deck.
I do not like the new shrouds we got up in London,
he said, for the rope has stretched in this gale in a way
to throw too much strain on the old rigging; so see all
ready for taking a fresh drag on them, as soon as the people
have breakfasted. Mind and keep her out of the trough,
sir, and watch every roller that you find comes tumbling
upon us.
After repeating these injunctions in different ways,
looking
to windward some time, and aloft five or six minutes,
Captain Truck finally went below, to pass judgment on
Mr. Saunders' coffee. Once in his throne, at the head of
the long table, the worthy master, after a proper attention
to his passengers, set about the duty of restoration, as the
steward affectedly called eating, with a zeal that never
failed him on such occasions. He had just swallowed a
cup of the coffee, about which he had lectured Saunders,
when a heavy flap of the sails announced the sudden failure
of the wind.
That is bad news, said Captain Truck, listening to the
fluttering blows of the canvas against the masts. I never
like to hear a ship shaking its wings while there is a heavy
sea on; but this is better than the Desert of Sahara, and
so, my dear young lady, let me recommend to you a cup
of this coffee, which is flavoured this morning by a dread
of ouran-outangs, as Mr. Saunders will have the honour
to inform you
A jerk of the whole ship was followed by a report like
that made by a musket. Captain Truck rose, and stood
leaning on one hand in a bent attitude, expectation and
distrust intensely portrayed in every feature. Another
helpless roll of the ship succeeded, and three or four
similar
reports were immediately heard, as if large ropes had
parted in quick succession. A rending of wood followed,
and then came a chaotic crash, in which the impending
heavens seemed to fall on the devoted ship. Most of the
passengers shut their eyes, and when they were opened
again, or a moment afterwards, Mr. Truck had vanished.
It is scarcely necessary to describe the confusion that
followed. Eve was frightened, but she behaved well, though
Mademoiselle Viefville trembled so much as to require the
assistance of Mr. Effingham.
We have lost our masts, John Effingham coolly
remarked
;
an accident that will not be likely to be very
dangerous, though by prolonging the passage a month or
two, it may have the merit of making this good company
more intimately acquainted with each other, a pleasure for
which we cannot express too much gratitude.
Eve implored his forbearance by a glance, for she saw
his eye was unconsciously directed towards Mr. Monday
and Mr. Dodge, for both of whom she knew her kinsman
entertained an incurable dislike. His words, however,
explained
the catastrophe, and most of the men hastened on
deck to assure themselves of the fact.
John Effingham was right. The new rigging which had
stretched so much during the gale, had permitted too much
of the strain, in the tremendous rolls of the ship, to fall
upon the other ropes. The shroud most exposed had
parted first; three or four more followed in succession, and
before there was time to secure anything, the remainder
had gone together, and the mainmast had broken at a place
where a defect was now seen in its heart. Falling over the
side, the latter had brought down with it the mizzen-mast
and all its hamper, and as much of the fore-mast as stood
above the top. In short, of all the complicated tracery of
ropes, the proud display of spars, and the broad folds of
canvas that had so lately overshadowed the deck of the
Montauk, the mutilated fore-mast, the fore-yard and sail,
and the fallen head-gear alone remained. All the rest
either cumbered the deck, or was beating against the side
of the ship, in the water.
The hard, red, weather-beaten face of Captain Truck
was expressive of mortification and concern, for a single
instant, when his eye glanced over the ruin we have just
described. His mind then seemed made up to the calamity,
and he ordered Toast to bring him a coal of fire, with
which he quietly lighted a cigar.
Here is a category, and be dd to it, Mr. Leach, he
said, after taking a single whiff. You are doing quite
right, sir; cut away the wreck and force the ship free of it,
or we shall have some of those sticks poking themselves
through the planks. I always thought the chandler in
London, into whose hands the agent has fallen, was a
rogue, and now I know it well enough to swear to it. Cut
away, carpenter, and get us rid of all this thumping as soon
as possible. A very capital vessel, Mr. Monday, or she
would have rolled the pumps out of her, and capsized the
galley.
No attempt being made to save anything, the wreck was
floating astern in five minutes, and the ship was fortunately
extricated from this new hazard. Mr. Truck, in spite of
his acquired coolness, looked piteously at all that gallant
hamper, in which he had so lately rejoiced, as yard-arm,
cross-trees, tressel-trees, and tops rose on the summits of
swells or settled in the troughs, like whales playing their
gambols. But habit is a seaman's philosophy, and in no
one feature is his character more respectable than in that
manliness which disinclines him to mourn over a misfortune
that is inevitable.
The Montauk now resembled a tree stripped of its
branches, or a courser crippled in his sinews; her glory
had, in a great degree, departed. The foremast alone
remained, and of this even the head was gone, a
circumstance
of which Captain Truck complained more than of
any other, as, to use his own expressions, it destroyed the
symmetry of the spar, which had proved itself to be a good
stick. What, however, was of more real importance, it
rendered it difficult, if not impossible, to get up a spare
topmast
forward. As both the main and mizzen-mast had
gone quite near the deck, this was almost the only tolerably
easy expedient that remained; and, within an hour of the
accident, Mr. Truck announced his intentions to stand as
far south as he could to strike the trades, and then to make
a fair wind of it across the Atlantic, unless, indeed, he
might be able to fetch into the Cape de Verde Islands,
where it would be possible, perhaps, to get something like
a new outfit.
All I now ask, my dear young lady, he said to Eve,
who ventured on deck to look at the desolation, as soon as
the wreck was cut adrift, all I now ask, my dear young
lady, is an end to westerly winds for two or three weeks,
and I will promise to place you all in America yet, in time
to eat your Christmas dinner. I do not think Sir George
will shoot many white bears among the Rocky Mountains
this year, but then there will be so many more left for
another
season. The ship is in a category, and he will be an
impudent scoundrel who denies it; but worse categories
than this have been reasoned out of countenance. All
head-sail
is not a convenient show of cloth to claw off a
lee-shore
with; but I still hope to escape the misfortune of
laying
eyes on the coast of Africa.
Are we far from it? asked Eve, who sufficiently
understood
the danger of being on an uninhabitable shore in
their present situation; one in which it was vain to seek for
a port. I would rather be in the neighbourhood of any
other land, I think, than that of Africa.
Especially Africa between the Canaries and Cape
Blanco, returned Captain Truck, with an expressive
shrug. More hospitable regions exist, certainly; for, if
accounts are to be credited, the honest people along-shore
never get a Christian that they do not mount him on a
camel, and trot him through the sands a thousand miles or
so, under a hot sun, with a sort of haggis for food, that
would go nigh to take away even a Scotchman's appetite.
And you do not tell us how far we are from this
frightful
land, Mons. le Capitaine? inquired Mademoiselle
Viefville
.
In ten minutes you shall know, ladies, for I am about
to observe for the longitude. It is a little late, but it may
yet be done.
And we may rely on the fidelity of your information?
On the honour of a sailor and a man.
The ladies were silent, while Mr. Truck proceeded to get
the sun and the time. As soon as he had run through his
calculations, he came to them with a face in which the
eye was roving, though it was still good-humoured and
smiling.
And the result? said Eve.
Is not quite as flattering as I could wish. We are
materially
within a degree of the coast; but, as the wind is
gone, or nearly so, we may hope to find a shift that will
shove us farther from the land. And now I have dealt
frankly with you, let me beg you will keep the secret, for
my people will be dreaming of Turks, instead of working,
if they knew the fact.
It required no great observation to discover that Captain
Truck was far from satisfied with the position of his ship.
Without any after-sail, and almost without the means of
making any, it was idle to think of hauling off from the
land, more especially against the heavy sea that was still
rolling in from the north-west; and his present object was
to make the Cape de Verdes, before reaching which he
would be certain to meet the trades, and where, of course,
there would be some chance of repairing damages. His
apprehensions
would have been much less were the ship a
degree further west, as the prevailing winds in this part of
the ocean are from the northward and eastward; but it was
no easy matter to force a ship that distance under a
fore-sail
,
the only regular sail that now remained in its place.
It is true, he had some of the usual expedients of seamen at
his command, and the people were immediately set about
them; but, in consequence of the principal spars having
gone so near the decks, it became exceedingly difficult to
rig jury-masts.
Something must be attempted, however, and the spare
spars were got out, and all the necessary preparations were
commenced, in order that they might be put into their
places and rigged, as well as circumstances would allow. As
soon as the sea went down, and the steadiness of the ship
would permit, Mr. Leach succeeded in getting up an
awkward
lower studding-sail, and a sort of a stay-sail forward,
and with these additions to their canvas, the ship was
brought to head south, with the wind light at the westward.
The sea was greatly diminished about noon; but a mile an
hour, for those who had so long a road before them, and
who were so near a coast that was known to be fearfully
inhospitable, was a cheerless progress, and the cry of
sail, ho! early in the afternoon, diffused a general joy
in the Montauk.
The stranger was made to the southward and eastward,
and was standing on a course that must bring her quite near
to their own track, as the Montauk then headed. The wind
was so light, however, that Captain Truck gave it as his
opinion they could not speak until night had set in.
Unless the coast has brought him up, yonder flaunting
gentleman, who seems to have had better luck with his light
canvas than ourselves, must be the Foam, he said.
Tobacco
,
or no tobacco, bride or bridegroom, the fellow has
us at last, and all the consolation that is left is, that we shall
be much obliged to him, now, if he will carry us to
Portsmouth
,
or into any other Christian haven. We have shown
him what a kettle-bottom can do before the wind, and now
let him give us a tow to windward like a generous
antagonist
.
That is what I call Vattel, my dear young lady.
If he do this, he will indeed prove himself a generous
adversary, said Eve, and we shall be certain to speak
well of his humanity, whatever we may think of his
obstinacy
.
Are you quite sure the ship in sight is the corvette?
asked Paul Blunt.
Who else can it be?Two vessels are quite sufficient
to be jammed down here on the coast of Africa, and we
know that the Englishman must be somewhere to leeward
of us; though, I will confess, I had believed him much
farther, if not plump up among the Mohammedans,
beginning
to reduce to a feather-weight, like Captain Riley, who
came out with just his skin and bones, after a journey across
the desert.
I do not think those top-gallant-sails have the symmetry
of the canvas of a ship-of-war.
Captain Truck looked steadily at the young man an
instant
,
as one regards a sound criticism, and then he turned
his eye towards the object of which they were speaking.
You are right, sir, he rejoined, after a moment of
examination
;
and I have had a lesson in my own trade
from one young enough to be my son. The stranger is
clearly no cruiser, and as there is no port in-shore of us
anywhere near this latitude, he is probably some trader who
has been driven down here, like ourselves.
And I'm very sure, captain, put in Sir George
Templemore
,
we ought to rejoice sincerely that, like ourselves,
he has escaped shipwreck. For my part, I pity the poor
wretches on board the Foam most sincerely, and could
almost
wish myself a Catholic, that one might yet offer up
sacrifices in their behalf.
You have shown yourself a Christian throughout all
that affair, Sir George, and I shall not forget your
handsome
offers to befriend the ship, rather than let us fall into
the jaws of the Philistines. We were in a category more
than once, with that nimble-footed racer in our wake, and
you were the man, Sir George, who manifested the most
hearty desire to get us out.
I ever feel an interest in the ship in which I embark,
returned the gratified baronet, who was not displeased at
hearing his liberality so openly commended; and I would
cheerfully have given a thousand pounds in preference to
being taken. I rather think, now, that is the true spirit for
a sportsman!
Or for an admiral, my good sir. To be frank with you,
Sir George, when I first had the honour of your
acquaintance
,
I did not think you had so much in you. There was
a sort of English attention to small wares, a species of
knee-buckleism about your
debutt
, as Mr. Dodge calls it,
that made me distrust your being the whole-souled and
one-idea'd
man I find you really are.
Oh! I
do
like my comforts, said Sir George, laughing.
That you do, and I am only surprised you don't smoke.
Now, Mr. Dodge, your room-mate, there, tells me you have
six-and-thirty pair of breeches!
I haveyes, indeed, I have. One would wish to go
abroad decently clad.
Well! if it should be our luck to travel in the deserts,
your wardrobe would rig out a whole harem.
I wish, captain, you would do me the favour to step into
our state-room, some morning; I have many curious things
I should like to show you. A set of razors, in particular,
and a dressing-caseand a pair of patent pistolsand
that life-preserver that you admire so much, Mr. Dodge.
Mr. Dodge has seen most of my curiosities, I believe, and
Vol. I.15
will tell you some of them are really worth a moment's
examination.
Yes, captain, I must say, observed Mr. Dodge,for
this conversation was held apart between the three, the
mate keeping an eye the while on the duty of the ship, for
habit had given Mr. Truck the faculty of driving his people
while he entertained his passengersYes, captain, I must
say I have met no gentleman who is better supplied with
necessaries, than
my
friend, Sir George. But English
gentlemen
are curious in such things, and I admit that I admire
their ingenuity.
Particularly in breeches, Mr. Dodge. Have you coats
to match, Sir George?
Certainly, sir. One would be a little absurd in his
shirt sleeves. I wish, captain, we could make Mr. Dodge
a little less of a republican. I find him a most agreeable
room-mate, but rather annoying on the subject of kings and
princes.
You stick up for the people, Mr. Dodge, or to the old
category?
On that subject, Sir George and I shall never agree,
for he is obstinately monarchial; but I tell him we shall
treat him none the worse for that, when he gets among us.
He has promised me a visit in our part of the country, and
I have pledged myself to his being unqualifiedly well
received; and I think I know the whole meaning of a
pledge.
I understand Mr. Dodge, pursued the baronet, that
he is the editor of a public journal, in which he entertains
his readers with an account of his adventures and
observations
during his travels. `The Active Inquirer,' is it not,
Mr. Dodge?
That is the name, Sir George. `The Active Inquirer'
is the present name, though when we supported Mr. Adams
it was called `The Active Enquirer,' with an E.
A distinction without a difference; I like that,
interrupted
Captain Truck. This is the second time I have
had the honour to sail with Mr. Dodge, and a more active
inquirer never put foot in a ship, though I did not know the
use he put his information to before. It is all in the way
of trade, I find.
Mr. Dodge claims to belong to a profession, captain,
and is quite above trade. He tells me many things have
occurred on board this ship, since we sailed, that will make
very eligible paragraphs.
The d he does!I should like particularly well,
Mr. Dodge, to know what you will find to say concerning
this category in which the Montauk is placed.
Oh! captain, no fear of me, when you are concerned.
You know I am a friend, and you have no cause to
apprehend
any thing; though I'll not answer for everybody else
on board; for there are passengers in this ship to whom I
have decided antipathies, and whose deportment meets with
my unqualified disapprobation.
And you intend to paragraph them?
Mr. Dodge was now swelling with the conceit of a vulgar
and inflated man, who not only fancies himself in possession
of a power that others dread, but who was so far blinded
to his own qualities as to think his opinion of importance
to those whom he felt, in the minutest fibre of his envious
and malignant system, to be in every essential his superiors.
He did not dare express all his rancour, while he was
unequal
to suppressing it entirely.
These Effinghams, and this Mr. Sharp, and that Mr.
Blunt, he muttered, think themselves everybody's betters;
but we shall see! America is not a country in which people
can shut themselves up in rooms, and fancy they are lords
and ladies.
Bless my soul! said Captain Truck, with his affected
simplicity of manner; how did you find this out, Mr.
Dodge? What a thing it is, Sir George, to be an active
inquirer
!
Oh! I know when a man is blown up with notions of
his own importance. As for Mr. John Effingham, he has
been so long abroad that he has forgotten that he is a going
home to a country of equal rights!
Very true, Mr. Dodge; a country in which a man
cannot
shut himself up in his room, whenever the notion seizes
him. This is the spirit, Sir George, to make a great nation,
and you see that the daughter is likely to prove worthy of
the old lady! But, my dear sir, are you quite sure that Mr.
John Effingham has absolutely so high a sentiment in his
own favour. It would be awkward business to make a
blunder in such a serious matter, and murder a paragraph
for nothing. You should remember the mistake of the
Irishman!
What was that? asked the baronet, who was
completely
mystified by the indomitable gravity of Captain
Truck, whose character might be said to be actually formed
by the long habit of treating the weaknesses of his
fellow-creatures
with cool contempt. We hear many good things
at our club; but I do not remember the mistake of the
Irishman?
He merely mistook the drumming in his own ear, for
some unaccountable noise that disturbed his companions.
Mr. Dodge felt uncomfortable; but there is no one in
whom a vulgar-minded man stands so much in awe as an
immovable quiz, who has no scruple in using his power.
He shook his head, therefore, in a menacing manner, and
affecting to have something to do he went below, leaving
the baronet and captain by themselves.
Mr. Dodge is a stubborn friend of liberty, said the
former, when his room-mate was out of hearing.
That is he, and you have his own word for it. He has
no notion of letting a man do as he has a mind to! We are
full of such active inquirers in America, and I don't care
how many you shoot before you begin upon the white bears,
Sir George.
But it would be more gracious in the Effinghams, you
must allow, captain, if they shut themselves up in their
cabin less, and admitted us to their society a little oftener.
I am quite of Mr. Dodge's way of thinking, that exclusion
is excessively odious.
There is a poor fellow in the steerage, Sir George, to
whom I have given a piece of canvas to repair a damage to
his mainsail, who would say the same thing, did he know
of your six-and-thirtys. Take a cigar, my dear sir, and
smoke away sorrow.
Thankee, captain: I never smoke. We never smoke
at our club, though some of us go, at times, to the divan to
try a chibouk.
We can't all have cabins to ourselves, or no one would
live forward. If the Effinghams like their own apartment,
I do honestly believe it is for a reason as simple as that it
is the best in the ship. I'll warrant you, if there were a
better, that they would be ready enough to change. I
suppose
when we get in, Mr. Dodge will honour you with an
article in `The Active Inquirer?'
To own the truth, he has intimated some such thing.
And why not? A very instructive paragraph might
be made about the six-and-thirty pair of breeches, and the
patent razors, and the dressing-case, to say nothing of the
Rocky Mountains, and the white bears.
Sir George now began to feel uncomfortable, and making
a few unmeaning remarks about the late accident, he
disappeared
.
Captain Truck, who never smiled except at the corner of
his left eye, turned away, and began rattling off his people, and
throwing in a hint or two to Saunders, with as much
indifference
as if he were a firm believer in the unfailing
orthodoxy
of a newspaper, and entertained a profound respect
for the editor of the `Active Inquirer,' in particular.
The prognostic of the master concerning the strange ship
proved true, for about nine at night she came within hail,
and backed her maintop-sail. This vessel proved to be an
American in ballast, bound from Gibraltar to New York;
a return store-ship from the squadron kept in the
Mediterranean
.
She had met the gale to the westward of Madeira,
and after holding on as long as possible, had also been
compelled
to scud. According to the report of her officers, the
Foam had run in much closer to the coast than herself, and
it was their opinion she was lost. Their own escape was
owing entirely to the wind's abating, for they had actually
been within sight of the land, though having received no
injury
,
they had been able to haul off in season.
Luckily, this ship was ballasted with fresh water, and
Captain Truck passed the night in negotiating a transfer of
his steerage passengers, under an apprehension that, in the
crippled state of his own vessel, his supplies might be
exhausted
before he could reach America. In the morning,
the offer of being put on board the store-ship was made to
15 *
those who chose to accept it, and all in the steerage, with
most from the cabin, profited by the occasion to exchange
a dismasted vessel for one that was, at least, full rigged.
Provisions were transferred accordingly, and by noon next
day the stranger made sail on a wind, the sea being
tolerably
smooth, and the breeze still ahead. In three hours
she was out of sight to the northward and westward, the
Montauk holding her own dull course to the southward,
with the double view of striking the trades, or of reaching
one of the Cape de Verdes.
CHAPTER XV.
Steph
.His forward voice now is to speak well of his friend; his
backward
voice is to utter foul speeches, and to detract.
Tempest
.
The
situation of the Montauk appeared more desolate
than ever, after the departure of so many of her passengers.
So long as her decks were thronged there was an air of life
about her, that served to lessen disquietude, but now that
she was left by all in the steerage, and by so many in the
cabins, those who remained began to entertain livelier
apprehensions
of the future. When the upper sails of the
store-ship sunk as a speck in the ocean, Mr. Effingham
regretted
that he, too, had not overcome his reluctance to a
crowded and inconvenient cabin, and gone on board her,
with his own party. Thirty years before he would have
thought himself fortunate in finding so good a ship, and
accommodations so comfortable; but habit and indulgence
change all our opinions, and he had now thought it next to
impossible to place Eve and Mademoiselle Viefville in a
situation that was so common to those who travelled by sea
at the commencement of the century.
Most of the cabin passengers, as has just been stated,
decided
differently, none remaining but the Effinghams and
their party, Mr. Sharp, Mr. Blunt, Sir George Templemore,
Mr. Dodge, and Mr. Monday. Mr. Effingham had been
influenced by the superior comforts of the packet, and his
hopes that a speedy arrival at the islands would enable the
ship to refit, in time to reach America almost as soon as the
dull-sailing vessel which had just left them. Mr. Sharp
and Mr. Blunt had both expressed a determination to share
his fortunes, which was indirectly saying that they would
share the fortunes of his daughter. John Effingham
remained
,
as a matter of course, though he had made a
proposition
to the stranger to tow them into port, an
arrangement
that failed in consequence of the two captains
disagreeing
as to the course proper to be steered, as well as to
a more serious obstacle in the way of compensation, the
stranger throwing out some pretty plain hints about salvage,
and Mr. Monday staying from an inveterate attachment to
the steward's stores, more of which, he rightly judged,
would now fall to his share than formerly.
Sir George Templemore had gone on board the
store-ship
,
and had given some very clear demonstrations of an
intention to transfer himself and the thirty-six pair of
breeches to that vessel; but on examining her comforts,
and particularly the confined place in which he should be
compelled to stow himself and his numerous curiosities, he
was unequal to the sacrifice. On the other hand, he knew
an entire state-room would now fall to his share, and this
self-indulged and feeble-minded young man preferred his
immediate comfort, and the gratification of his besetting
weakness, to his safety.
As for Mr. Dodge, he had the American mania of hurry,
and was one of the first to propose a general swarming, as
soon as it was known the stranger could receive them.
During the night, he had been actively employed in
fomenting
a party to resolve that prudence required the
Montauk
should be altogether abandoned, and even after this
scheme failed, he had dwelt eloquently in corners (Mr.
Dodge was too meek, and too purely democratic, ever to
speak aloud, unless under the shadow of public opinion,) on
the propriety of Captain Truck's yielding his own judgment
to that of the majority. He might as well have scolded
against the late gale, in the expectation of out-railing the
tempest, as to make such an attempt on the firm-set notions
of the old seaman concerning his duty; for no sooner was
the thing intimated to him than he growled a denial in a
tone that he was little accustomed to use to his passengers,
and one that effectually silenced remonstrance. When
these two plans had failed, Mr. Dodge endeavoured
strenuously
to show Sir George that his interests and safety were
on the side of a removal; but with all his eloquence, and
with the hold that incessant adulation had actually given
him on the mind of the other, he was unable to overcome
his love of ease, and chiefly the passion for the enjoyment
of the hundred articles of comfort and curiosity in which
the baronet so much delighted. The breeches might have
been packed in a trunk, it is true, and so might the razors,
and the dressing-case, and the pistols, and most of the other
things; but Sir George loved to look at them daily, and as
many as possible were constantly paraded before his eyes.
To the surprise of every one, Mr. Dodge, on finding it
impossible to prevail on Sir George Templemore to leave
the packet, suddenly announced his own intention to remain
also. Few stopped to inquire into his motives in the hurry
of such a moment. To his room-mate he affirmed that the
strong friendship he had formed for him, could alone induce
him to relinquish the hope of reaching home previously to
the autumn elections.
Nor did Mr. Dodge greatly colour the truth in making
this statement. He was an American demagogue precisely
in obedience to those feelings and inclinations which would
have made him a courtier anywhere else. It is true, he had
travelled, or thought he had travelled, in a
diligence
with
a countess or two, but from these he had been obliged to
separate early on account of the force of things; while
here he had got a
bon-fide
English baronet all to himself,
in a confined state-room, and his imagination revelled in
the glory and gratification of such an acquaintance. What
were the proud and distant Effinghams to Sir George
Templemore
!
He even ascribed their reserve with the baronet
to envy, a passion of whose existence he had very lively
perceptions, and he found a secret charm in being shut up
in so small an apartment with a man who could excite envy
in an Effingham. Rather than abandon his aristocratical
prize, therefore, whom he intended to exhibit to all his
democratic
friends in his own neighbourhood, Mr. Dodge
determined
to abandon his beloved hurry, looking for his
reward in the future pleasure of talking of Sir George
Templemore and his curiosities, and of his sayings and his
jokes, in the circle at home. Odd, moreover, as it may
seem, Mr. Dodge had an itching desire to remain with the
Effinghams; for while he was permitting jealousy and a
consciousness of inferiority to beget hatred, he was willing
at any moment to make peace, provided it could be done
by a frank admission into their intimacy. As to the
innocent
family that was rendered of so much account to the
happiness of Mr. Dodge, it seldom thought of that
individual
at all, little dreaming of its own importance in his
estimation, and merely acted in obedience to its own
cultivated
tastes and high principles in disliking his company.
It fancied itself, in this particular, the master of its own
acts, and this so much the more, that with the reserve of
good-breeding its members seldom indulged in censorious
personal remarks, and never in gossip.
As a consequence of these contradictory feelings of Mr.
Dodge, and of the fastidiousness of Sir George
Templemore
,
the interest her two admirers took in Eve, the
devotion
of Mr. Monday to sherry and champaigne, and the
decision of Mr. Effingham, these persons therefore remained
the sole occupants of the cabins of the Montauk. Of the
oi polloi
who had left them, we have hitherto said nothing,
because this separation was to remove them entirely from
the interest of our incidents.
If we were to say that Captain Truck did not feel
melancholy
as the store-ship sunk beneath the horizon, we should
represent that stout-hearted mariner as more stoical than
he actually was. In the course of a long and adventurous
professional life, he had encountered calamities before, but
he had never before been compelled to call in assistance to
deliver his passengers at the stipulated port, since he had
commanded a packet. He felt the necessity, in the present
instance, as a sort of stain upon his character as a seaman,
though in fact the accident which had occurred was chiefly
to be attributed to a concealed defect in the mainmast. The
honest master sighed often, smoked nearly double the usual
number of cigars in the course of the afternoon, and when
the sun went down gloriously in the distant west, he stood
gazing at the sky in melancholy silence, as long as any of
the magnificent glory that accompanies the decline of day
lingered among the vapours of the horizon. He then
summoned
Saunders to the quarter-deck, where the following
dialogue took place between them:
This is a devil of a category to be in, Master Steward!
Well, he might be better, sir. I only wish the good
butter may endure until we get in.
If it fail, I shall go nigh to see you clapt into the State's
prison, or at least into that Gothic cottage on Blackwell's
Island.
There is an end to all things, Captain Truck, if you
please, sir, even to butter. I presume, sir, Mr. Vattel, if
he know anything of cookery, will admit that.
Harkee, Saunders, if you ever insinuate again that
Vattel belonged to the coppers, in my presence, I'll take
the liberty to land you on the coast here, where you may
amuse yourself in stewing young monkeys for your own
dinner. I saw you aboard the other ship, sir, overhauling
her arrangements; what sort of a time will the gentlemen
be likely to have in her?
Atrocious, sir! I give you my honour, as a real
gentleman
,
sir. Why, would you believe it, Captain Truck, the
steward is a downright nigger, and he wears ear-rings, and
a red flannel shirt, without the least edication. As for the
cook, sir, he would'nt pass an examination for Jemmy Ducks
aboard here, and there is but one camboose, and one set of
coppers.
Well, the steerage-passengers, in that case, will fare as
well as the cabin.
Yes, sir, and the cabin as bad as the steerage; and for
my part, I abomernate liberty and equality.
You should converse with Mr. Dodge on that subject,
Master Saunders, and let the hardest fend off in the
argument
.
May I inquire, sir, if you happen to remember the
day of the week?
Beyond controversy, sir; to-morrow will be Sunday,
Captain Truck, and I think it a thousand pities we have
not an opportunity to solicit the prayers and praises of the
church, sir, in our behalf, sir.
If to-morrow will be Sunday, to-day must be Saturday,
Mr. Saunders, unless this last gale has deranged the
calendar
.
Quite naturally, sir, and werry justly remarked. Every
body admits there is no better navigator than Captain
Truck, sir.
This may be true, my honest fellow, returned the
captain moodily, after making three or four heavy puffs at
the cigar; but I am sadly out of my road down here in
the country of your amiable family, just now. If this be
Saturday, there will be a Saturday night before long, and
look to it, that we have our `sweethearts and wives.'
Though I have neither myself, I feel the necessity of
something
cheerful, to raise my thoughts to the future.
Depend on my discretion, sir, and I rejoice to hear you
say it; for I think, sir, a ship is never so respectable and
genteel as when she celebrates all the anniwersaries. You
will be quite a select and agreeable party to-night, sir.
With this remark Mr. Saunders withdrew, to confer with
Toast on the subject, and Captain Truck proceeded to give
his orders for the night to Mr. Leach. The proud ship did
indeed present a sight to make a seaman melancholy; for
to the only regular sail that stood, the foresail, by this time
was added a lower studding-sail, imperfectly rigged, and
which would not resist a fresh puff, while a very inartificial
jury-topmast supported a topgallant-sail, that could only be
carried in a free wind. Aft, preparations were making of
a more permanent nature, it is true. The upper part of the
mainmast had been cut away, as low as the steerage-deck,
where an arrangement had been made to step a spare
topmast
.
The spar itself was lying on the deck rigged, and a
pair of sheers were in readiness to be hoisted, in order to
sway it up; but night approaching, the men had been broken
off, to rig the yards, bend the sails, and to fit the other spars
it was intended to use, postponing the last act, that of
sending
all up, until morning.
We are likely to have a quiet night of it, said the
captain
,
glancing his eyes round at the heavens; and at eight
o'clock to-morrow let all hands be called, when we will
turn-to with a will, and make a brig of the old hussey.
This topmast will do to bear the strain of the spare
main-yard
,
unless there come another gale, and by reefing the
new mainsail we shall be able to make something out of it.
The topgallant-mast will fit of course above, and we may
make out, by keeping a little free, to carry the sail: at need,
we may possibly coax the contrivance into carrying a
studding-sail
also. We have sticks for no more, though we'll
endeavour to get up something aft, out of the spare spars
obtained from the store-ship. You may knock off at four
bells, Mr. Leach, and let the poor fellows have their
Saturday's
night in peace. It is a misfortune enough to be
dismasted
,
without having one's grog stopped.
The mate of course obeyed, and the evening shut in
beautifully
and placid, with all the glory of a mild night, in a
latitude as low as that they were in. They who have never
seen the ocean under such circumstances, know little of its
charms in its moments of rest. The term of sleeping is
well applied to its impressive stillness, for the long sluggish
swells on which the ship rose and fell, hardly disturbed its
surface. The moon did not rise until midnight, and Eve,
accompanied by Mademoiselle Viefville and most of her
male companions, walked the deck by the bright starlight,
until fatigued with pacing their narrow bounds.
The song and the laugh rose frequently from the
forecastle
,
where the crew were occupied with their
Saturday-night
;
and occasionally a rude sentiment in the way of a
toast was heard. But weariness soon got the better of
merriment
forward, and the hard-worked mariners, who had
the watch below, soon went down to their berths, leaving
those whose duty it was to remain to doze away the long
hours in such places as they could find on deck.
A white squall, said Captain Truck, looking up at the
uncouth sails that hardly impelled the vessel a mile in the
hour through the water, would soon furl all our canvas
for us, and we are in the very place for such an interlude.
And what would then become of us? asked
Mademoiselle
Viefville quickly.
You had better ask what would become of that apology
for a topsail, mam'selle, and yonder stun'sail, which looks
like an American in London without straps to his pantaloons.
The canvas would play kite, and we should be left to renew
our inventions. A ship could scarcely be in better plight
than we are at this moment, to meet with one of these
African
flurries.
In which case, captain, observed Mr. Monday, who
stood by the skylight watching the preparations below, we
can go to our Saturday-night without fear; for I see the
steward has everything ready, and the punch looks very
inviting, to say nothing of the champaigne.
Gentlemen, we will not forget our duty, returned the
captain; we are but a small family, and so much the
greater need that we should prove a jolly one. Mr.
Effingham
,
I hope we are to have the honour of your company
at `sweethearts and wives.'
Mr. Effingham had no wife, and the invitation coming
under such peculiar circumstances, produced a pang that
Eve, who felt his arm tremble, well understood. She mildly
intimated her intention to go below however; the whole
party followed, and lucky it was for the captain's
entertainment
that she quitted the deck, as few would otherwise have
been present at it. By pressing the passengers to favour
him with their company, he succeeded in the course of a
few minutes in getting all the gentlemen seated at the
cabin-table
,
with a glass of delicious punch before each man.
Mr. Saunders may not be a conjuror or a
mathematician
,
gentlemen, cried Captain Truck, as he ladled out
the beverage; but he understands the philosophy of sweet
and sour, strong and weak; and I will venture to praise his
liquor without tasting it. Well, gentlemen, there are
better-rigged
ships on the ocean than this of ours; but there are
few with more comfortable cabins, or stouter hulls, or better
company. Please God we can get a few sticks aloft again,
now that we are quit of our troublesome shadow, I think I
may flatter myself with a reasonable hope of landing you,
that do me the honour to stand by me, in New York, in less
time than a common drogger would make the passage, with
all his legs and arms. Let our first toast be, if you please
Vol. I.  16
`A happy end to that which has had a disastrous
beginning
.'
Captain Truck's hard face twitched a little while he was
making this address, and as he swallowed the punch, his
eyes glistened in spite of himself. Mr. Dodge, Sir George,
and Mr. Monday repeated the sentiment sonorously, word
for word, while the other gentlemen bowed, and drank it in
silence.
The commencement of a regular scene of merriment is
usually dull and formal, and it was some time before Captain
Truck could bring any of his companions up to the point
where he wished to see them; for though a perfectly sober
man, he loved a social glass, and particularly at those times
and seasons which conformed to the practice of his calling.
Although Eve and her governess had declined taking their
seats at the table, they consented to place themselves where
they might be seen, and where they might share occasionally
in the conversation.
Here have I been drinking sweethearts and wives of a
Saturday-night, my dear young lady, these forty years and
more, said Captain Truck, after the party had sipped their
liquor for a minute or two, without ever falling into luck's
latitude, or furnishing myself with either; but, though so
negligent of my own interests and happiness, I make it an
invariable rule to advise all my young friends to get spliced
before they are thirty. Many is the man who has come
aboard my ship a determined bachelor in his notions, who
has left it at the end of the passage ready to marry the first
pretty young woman he fell in with.
As Eve had too much of the self-respect of a lady, and
of the true dignity of her sex, to permit jokes concerning
matrimony, or a treatise on love, to make a part of her
conversation, and all the gentlemen of her party understood
her character too well, to say nothing of their own habits,
to second this attempt of the captain's, after a vapid remark
or two from the others, this rally of the honest mariner
produced
no
suites
.
Are we not unusually low, Captain Truck, inquired
Paul Blunt, with a view to change the discourse, not to
have fallen in with the trades? I have commonly met with
those winds on this coast as high as twenty-six or
twenty-seven
,
and I believe you observed to-day, in twenty-four.
Captain Truck looked hard at the speaker, and when he
had done, he nodded his head in approbation.
You have travelled this road before, Mr. Blunt, I
perceive
.
I have suspected you of being a brother chip, from
the moment I saw you first put your foot on the side-cleets
in getting out of the boat. You did not come aboard
parrot-toed
,
like a country-girl waltzing; but set the ball of
the foot firmly on the wood, and swung off the length of
your arms, like a man who knows how to humour the
muscles
.
Your present remark, too, shows you understand
where a ship ought to be, in order to be in her right place.
As for the trades, they are a little uncertain, like a lady's
mind when she has more than one good offer; for I've
known them to blow as high as thirty, and then again, to
fail a vessel as low as twenty-three, or even lower. It is
my private opinion, gentlemen, and I gladly take this oppor
tunity to make it public, that we are on the edge of the
trades, or in those light baffling winds which prevail along
their margin, as eddies play near the track of strong steady
currents in the ocean. If we can force the ship fairly out
of this trimming regionthat is the word, I believe, Mr.
Dodgewe shall do well enough; for a north-east, or an
east wind, would soon send us up with the islands, even
under the rags we carry. We are very near the coast,
certainlymuch nearer than I could wish; but when we
do get the good breeze, it will be all the better for us, as it
will find us well to windward.
But these trades, Captain Truck? asked Eve: if they
always blow in the same direction, how is it possible that
the late gale should drive a ship into the quarter of the
ocean where they prevail?
Always, means sometimes, my dear young lady.
Although
light winds prevail near the edge of the trades, gales,
and tremendous fellows too, sometimes blow there also, as
we have just seen. I think we shall now have settled
weather
,
and that our chance of a safe arrival, more
particularly
in some southern American port, is almost certain,
though our chance for a speedy arrival be not quite as good.
I hope before twenty-four hours are passed, to see our decks
white with sand.
Is that a phenomenon seen here? asked the father.
Often, Mr. Effingham, when ships are close in with
Africa, and are fairly in the steady winds. To say the
truth, the country abreast of us, some twenty or thirty
miles distant, is not the most inviting; and though it may
not be easy to say where the garden of Eden is, it is not
hazardous to say it is not there.
If we are so very near the coast, why do we not see
it?
Perhaps we might from aloft, if we had any aloft just
now. We are to the southward of the mountains, however,
and off a part of the country where the Great Desert makes
from the coast. And now, gentlemen, I perceive Mr.
Monday
finds all this sand arid, and I ask permission to give
you, one and all, `Sweethearts and wives.'
Most of the company drank the usual toast with spirit,
though both the Effinghams scarce wetted their lips. Eve
stole a timid glance at her father, and her own eyes were
filled with tears as she withdrew them; for she knew that
every allusion of this nature revived in him mournful
recollections
.
As for her cousin Jack, he was so confirmed
a bachelor that she thought nothing of his want of
sympathy
with such a sentiment.
You must have a care for your heart, in America, Sir
George Templemore, cried Mr. Dodge, whose tongue
loosened with the liquor he drank. Our ladies are
celebrated
for their beauty, and are immensely popular, I can
assure you.
Sir George looked pleased, and it is quite probable
his thoughts ran on the one particular vestment of the
six-and-thirty
,
in which he ought to make his first appearance
in such a society.
I allow the American ladies to be handsome, said Mr.
Monday; but I think no Englishman need be in any
particular
danger of his heart from such a cause, after having
been accustomed to the beauty of his own island. Captain
Truck, I have the honour to drink your health.
Fairly said, cried the captain, bowing to the
compliment
;
and I ascribe my own hard fortune to the fact that
I have been kept sailing between two countries so much
favoured
in this particular, that I have never been able to
make up my mind which to prefer. I have wished a
thousand
times there was but one handsome woman in the
world, when a man would have nothing to do but fall in
love with her; and make up his mind to get married at
once, or to hang himself.
That is a cruel wish to us men, returned Sir George,
as we should be certain to quarrel for the beauty.
In such a case, resumed Mr. Monday, we common
men would have to give way to the claims of the nobility
and gentry, and satisfy ourselves with plainer companions;
though an Englishman loves his independence, and might
rebel. I have the honour to drink your health and
happiness
,
Sir George.
I protest against your principle, Mr. Monday, said
Mr. Dodge, which is an invasion on human rights. Perfect
freedom of action is to be maintained in this matter as in
all others. I acknowledge that the English ladies are
extremely
beautiful, but I shall always maintain the
supremacy
of the American fair.
We will drink their healths, sir. I am far from denying
their beauty, Mr. Dodge, but I think you must admit that
they fade earlier than our British ladies. God bless them
both, however, and I empty this glass to the two entire
nations
,
with all my heart and soul.
Perfectly polite, Mr. Monday; but as to the fading of
the ladies, I am not certain that I can yield an unqualified
approbation to your sentiment.
Nay, sir, your climate, you will allow, is none of the
best, and it wears out constitutions almost as fast as your
states make them.
I hope there is no real danger to be apprehended from
the climate, said Sir George: I particularly detest bad
climates; and for that reason have always made it a rule
never to go into Lincolnshire.
In that case, Sir George, you had better have stayed
at home. In the way of climate, a man seldom betters
himself by leaving old England. Now this is the tenth
16 *
time I've been in America, allowing that I ever reach there,
and although I entertain a profound respect for the country,
I find myself growing older every time I quit it. Mr.
Effingham, I do myself the favour to drink to your health
and happiness.
You live too well when amongst us, Mr. Monday,
said the captain; there are too many soft crabs, hard
clams, and canvas-backs; too much old Madeira, and
generous
Sherry, for a man of your well-known taste to
resist
them. Sit less time at table, and go oftener to church
this trip, and let us hear your report of the consequences a
twelvemonth hence.
You quite mistake my habits, Captain Truck, I give
you my honour. Although a judicious eater, I seldom take
anything that is compounded, being a plain roast and boiled
man; a true old-fashioned Englishman in this respect,
satisfying
my appetite with solid beef and mutton, and turkeys
and pork, and puddings and potatoes, and turnips and
carrots
,
and similar simple food; and then I
never
drink.
Ladies, I ask the honour to be permitted to wish you a
happy
return to your native countries.I ascribe all the
difficulty
,
sir, to the climate, which will not permit a man to
digest properly.
Well, Mr. Monday, I subscribe to most of your
opinions
,
and I believe few men cross the ocean together that
are more harmonious in sentiment, in general, than has
proved to be the case between you and Sir George, and
myself
,
observed Mr. Dodge, glancing obliquely and
pointedly
at the rest of the party, as if he thought they were in
a decided minority; but in this instance, I feel
constrained
to record my vote in the negative. I believe America
has as good a climate, and as good general digestion as
commonly falls to the lot of mortals: more than this I do
not claim for the country, and less than this I should be
reluctant
to maintain. I have travelled a little, gentlemen,
not as much, perhaps, as the Messrs. Effinghams; but then
a man can see no more than is to be seen, and I do affirm,
Captain Truck, that in my poor judgment, which I know is
good for nothing
Why do you use it, then? abruptly asked the
straightforward
captain; why not rely on a better?
We must use such as we have, or go without, sir; and
I suspect, in my very poor judgment, which is probably
poorer than that of most others on board, that America is a
very good sort of a country. At all events, after having
seen something of other countries, and governments, and
people, I am of opinion that America, as a country, is quite
good enough for me.
You never said truer words, Mr. Dodge, and I beg you
will join Mr. Monday and myself in a fresh glass of punch,
just to help on the digestion. You have seen more of
human
nature than your modesty allows you to proclaim, and
I dare say this company would be gratified if you would
overcome all scruples, and let us know your private
opinions
of the different people you have visited. Tell us
something
of that
dittur
you made on the Rhine.
Mr. Dodge intends to publish, it is to be hoped!
observed
Mr. Sharp; and it may not be fair to anticipate
his matter.
I beg, gentlemen, you will have no scruples on that
score, for my work will be rather philosophical and
general
,
than of the particular nature of private anecdotes.
Saunders, hand me the manuscript journal you will find on
the shelf of our state-room, next to Sir George's patent
tooth-pick case. This is the book; and now, gentlemen
and ladies, I beg you to remember that these are merely
the ideas as they arose, and not my more mature
reflections
.
Take a little punch, sir, interrupted the captain, again,
whose hard nor'-west face was set in the most demure
attention
.
There is nothing like punch to clear the voice,
Mr. Dodge; the acid removes the huskiness, the sugar
softens the tones, the water mellows the tongue, and the
Jamaica
braces the muscles. With a plenty of punch, a man
soon gets to be anotherI forget the name of that great
orator of antiquity,it wasn't Vattel, however.
You mean Demosthenes, sir; and, gentlemen, I beg
you to remark that this orator was a republican: but there
can be no question that liberty is favourable to the
encouragement
of all the higher qualities. Would you prefer a
few notes on Paris, ladies, or shall I commence with some
extracts about the Rhine?
Oh! de grace, Monsieur
, be so very kind as not to
overlook
Paris!
said Mademoiselle Viefville.
Mr. Dodge bowed graciously, and turning over the leaves
of his private journal, he alighted in the heart of the great
city named. After some preliminary hemming, he
commenced
reading in a grave didactic tone, that sufficiently
showed the value he had attached to his own observations.
`
Dejjuned
at ten, as usual, an hour, that I find
exceedingly
unreasonable and improper, and one that would meet
with general disapprobation in America. I do not wonder
that a people gets to be immoral and depraved in their
practices
,
who keep such improper hours. The mind acquires
habits of impurity, and all the sensibilities become blunted,
by taking the meals out of the natural seasons. I impute
much of the corruption of France to the periods of the day
in which the food is taken'
Voil une drole d'ide!
ejaculated Mademoiselle
Viefville
.
`In which food is taken, repeated Mr. Dodge, who
fancied the involuntary exclamation was in approbation of
the justice of his sentiments. `Indeed the custom of taking
wine at this meal, together with the immorality of the hour,
must be chief reasons why the French ladies are so much
in the practice of drinking to excess.'
Mais, monsieur!
You perceive, mademoiselle calls in question the
accuracy
of your facts, observed Mr. Blunt, who, in common
with all the listeners, Sir George and Mr. Monday excepted,
began to enjoy a scene which at first had promised nothing
but
ennui
and disgust.
I have it on the best authority, I give you my honour,
or I would not introduce so grave a charge in a work of
this contemplated importance. I obtained my information
from an English gentleman who has resided twelve years
in Paris; and he informs me that a very large portion of
the women of fashion in that capital, let them belong to
what country they will, are dissipated.
A la bonne heure, monsieur!mais
, to drink, it is very
different.
Not so much so, mademoiselle, as you imagine,
rejoined John Effingham. Mr. Dodge is a purist in
language
as well as in morals, and he uses terms differently
from us less-instructed prattlers. By dissipated, he
understands
a drunkard.
Comment!
Certainly; Mr. John Effingham, I presume, will at
least give us the credit in America in speaking our language
better than any other known people. `After dejjunying,
took a
phyacre
and rode to the palace, to see the king and
royal family leave for Nully.'
Pour o?
Pour Neuilly, mademoiselle
, Eve quietly answered.
`For Nully. His majesty went on horseback,
preceding
his illustrious family and all the rest of the noble
party, dressed in a red coat, laced with white on the seams,
wearing blue breeches and a cocked hat.'
Ciel!
`I made the king a suitable republican reverence as he
passed, which he answered with a gracious smile, and a
benignant glance of his royal eye. The Hon. Louis
Philippe
Orleans, the present sovereign of the French, is a
gentleman of portly and commanding appearance, and in
his state attire, which he wore on this occasion, looks `every
inch a king.' He rides with grace and dignity, and sets an
example of decorum and gravity to his subjects, by the
solemnity of his air, that it is to be hoped will produce a
beneficial and benign influence during this reign, on the
manners of the nation. His dignity was altogether worthy
of the schoolmaster of Haddonfield.'
Par exemple!
Yes, main'selle in the way of example, it is that I mean.
Although a pure democrat, and every way opposed to
exclusion
,
I was particularly struck with the royalty of his
majesty's
demeanour, and the great simplicity of his whole
deportment. I stood in the crowd next to a very
accomplished
countess, who spoke English, and she did me the
honour to invite me to pay her a visit at her hotel, in the
vicinity of the Bourse.
Mon Dieumon Dieumon Dieu!
After promising my fair companion to be punctual, I
walked as far as Notter Dam
I wish Mr. Dodge would be a little more distinct in his
names, said Mademoiselle Viefville, who had begun to take
an interest in the subject, that even valueless opinions excite
in us concerning things that touch the affections.
Mr. Dodge is a little profane, mademoiselle, observed
the captain; but his journal probably was not intended
for the ladies, and you must overlook it. Well, sir, you
went to that naughty place
To Notter Dam, Captain Truck, if you please, and I
flatter myself that is pretty good French.
I think, ladies and gentlemen, we have a right to insist
on a translation; for plain roast and boiled men, like Mr.
Monday and myself, are sometimes weeping when we ought
to laugh, so long as the discourse is in anything but
old-fashioned
English. Help yourself, Mr. Monday, and
remember
,
you
never
drink.
Notter Dam
, I believe, mam'selle, means our Mother;
the Church of our Mother.Notter, or Noster, our,Dam,
Mother: Notter Dam. `Here I was painfully impressed
with the irreligion of the structure, and the general absence
of piety in the architecture. Idolatry abounded, and so did
holy water. How often have I occasion to bless Providence
for having made me one of the descendants of those pious
ancestors who cast their fortunes in the wilderness in
preference
to giving up their hold on faith and charity! The
building is much inferior in comfort and true taste to the
commoner American churches, and met with my
unqualified
disapprobation.'
Est il possible que cela soit vrai, ma chre!
Je l'espre, bien, mademoiselle
.
You may
despair bien
, cousin Eve, said John
Effingham
,
whose fine curvilinear face curled even more than
usual with contempt.
The ladies whispered a few explanations, and Mr. Dodge,
who fancied it was only necessary to resolve to be perfect
to achieve his end, went on with his comments, with all the
self-satisfaction of a provincial critic.
`From Notter Dam I proceeded in a
cabrioly
to the
great national burying-ground, Pere la Chaise, so termed
from the circumstance that its distance from the capital
renders
chaises necessary for the
convoys
How's this, how's this! interrupted Mr. Truck; is
one obliged to sail under a convoy about the streets of
Paris?
Monsieur Dodge veut dire, convoi
. Mr. Dodge mean
to say,
convoi
, kindly interposed Mademoiselle Viefville.
Mr. Dodge is a profound republican, and is an advocate
for rotation in language, as well as in office: I must accuse
you of inconstancy, my dear friend, if I die for it. You
certainly do not pronounce your words always in the same
way, and when I had the honour of carrying you out this
time six months, when you were practising the continentals,
as you call them, you gave very different sounds to many
of the words I then had the pleasure and gratification of
hearing you use.
We all improve by travelling, sir, and I make no
question
that my knowledge of foreign language is considerably
enlarged by practice in the countries in which they are
spoken.
Here the reading of the journal was interrupted by a
digression on language, in which Messrs. Dodge, Monday,
Templemore, and Truck were the principal interlocutors,
and during which the pitcher of punch was twice renewed.
We shall not record much of this learned discussion, which
was singularly common-place, though a few of the remarks
may be given as a specimen of the whole.
I must be permitted to say, replied Mr. Monday to
one of Mr. Dodge's sweeping claims to superiority in favour
of his own nation, that I think it quite extraordinary an
Englishman should be obliged to go out of his own country
in order to hear his own language spoken in purity; and as
one who has seen your people, Mr. Dodge, I will venture
to affirm that nowhere is English better spoken than in
Lancashire
.
Sir George, I drink your health!
More patriotic than just, Mr. Monday; every body
allows
that the American of the eastern states speaks the best
English in the world, and I think either of these gentlemen
will concede that.
Under the penalty of being nobody, cried Captain
Truck; for my own part, I think, if a man wishes to
hear the language in perfection, he ought to pass a week
or ten days in the river. I must say, Mr. Dodge, I object
to many of your sounds, particularly that of inyon, which
I myself heard you call onion, no later than yesterday.
Mr. Monday is a little peculiar in fancying that the best
English is to be met with in Lancashire, observed Sir
George Templemore; for I do assure you that, in town,
we have difficulty in understanding gentlemen from your
part of the kingdom.
This was a hard cut from one in whom Mr. Monday
expected
to find an ally, and that gentleman was driven to
washing down the discontent it excited, in punch.
But all this time we have interrupted the
convoi
, or
convoy, captain, said Mr. Sharp; and Mr. Dodge, to say
nothing of the mourners, has every right to complain. I
beg that gentleman will proceed with his entertaining
extracts
.
Mr. Dodge hemmed, sipped a little more liquor, blew his
nose, and continued:
`The celebrated cemetery is, indeed, worthy of its high
reputation. The utmost republican simplicity prevails in
the interments, ditches being dug in which the bodies are
laid, side by side, without distinction of rank, and with
regard
only to the order in which the convoys arrive.' I
think this sentence, gentlemen, will have great success in
America, where the idea of any exclusiveness is quite
odious to the majority.
Well, for my part, said the captain, I should have
no particular objection to being excluded from such a grave:
one would be afraid of catching the cholera in so
promiscuous
a company.
Mr. Dodge turned over a few leaves, and gave other
extracts.
`The last six hours have been devoted to a profound
investigation of the fine arts. My first visit was to the
gullyteen
;
after which I passed an instructive hour or two in
the galleries of the Musy.'
O, donc?
Le Muse, mademoiselle.
`Where I discovered several very extraordinary
things, in the way of sculpture and painting. I was
particularly
struck with the manner in which a plate was
portrayed
in the celebrated marriage of Cana, which might
very well have been taken for real Delft, and there was one
finger on the hand of a lady that seemed actually fitted to
receive and to retain the hymeneal ring.'
Did you inquire if she were engaged?Mr. Monday,
we will drink her health.
`Saint Michael and the Dragon is a
shefdowvry
.'
Un quoi?
Un chef-d'uvre, mademoiselle.
`The manner in which the angel holds the dragon
with his feet, looking exactly like a worm trodden on by
the foot of a child, is exquisitely plaintive and interesting.
Indeed these touches of nature abound in the works of the
old masters, and I saw several fruit-pieces that I could have
eaten. One really gets an appetite by looking at many
things here, and I no longer wonder that a Raphael, a
Titian
,
a Correggio, a Guide-o.'
Un qui?
Un Guido, mademoiselle.
Or a Cooley.
And pray who may he be? asked Mr. Monday.
A young genius in Dodgetown, who promises one day
to render the name of an American illustrious. He has
painted a new sign for the store, that in its way is quite
equal to the marriage of Cana. `I have stood with tears
over the despair of a Niobe,' continuing to read, `and
witnessed the contortions of the snakes in the Laocoon with
a convulsive eagerness to clutch them, that has made me
fancy I could hear them hiss. That sentence, I think,
will be likely to be noticed even in the
New-Old-New-Yorker
,
one of the very best reviews of our days,
gentlemen
.
Take a little more punch, Mr. Dodge, put in the
attentive
captain; this grows affecting, and needs alleviation, as
Saunders would say. Mr. Monday, you will get a bad
name for being too sober, if you never empty your glass.
Proceed, in the name of Heaven! Mr. Dodge.
`In the evening I went to the Grand Opery.'
O, donc?
Au grand Hoppery, mademoiselle, replied John
Effingham
.
`To the
Grand Opery
,' resumed Mr. Dodge, with
Vol. I.  17
emphasis, his eyes beginning to glisten by this time, for he
had often applied to the punch for inspiration, `where I
listened to music that is altogether inferior to that which
we enjoy in America, especially at the general trainings,
and on the Sabbath. The want of science was conspicuous;
and if
this
be music, then do I know nothing about it!'
A judicious remark! exclaimed the captain.Mr.
Dodge has great merit as a writer, for he loses no occasion
to illustrate his opinions by the most unanswerable facts.
He has acquired a taste for Zip Coon and Long Tail Blue,
and it is no wonder he feels a contempt for your inferior
artists.
`As for the dancing,' continued the editor of the
Active
Inquirer, `it is my decided impression that nothing
can be worse. The movement was more suited to a funeral
than the ball-room, and I affirm, without fear of
contradiction
,
that there is not an assembly in all America in which
a
cotillion
would not be danced in one-half the time that
one was danced in the
bally
to-night.'
Dans le quoi?
I believe I have not given the real Parisian
pronunciation
to this word, which the French call bal-
lay
,
continued
the reader, with great candour.
Belay, or make all fast, as we say on ship-board. Mr.
Dodge, as master of this vessel, I beg to return you the
united, or as Saunders would say, the condensed thanks of
the passengers, for this information; and next Saturday we
look for a renewal of the pleasure. The ladies are getting
to be sleepy, I perceive, and as Mr. Monday
never
drinks
and the other gentlemen have finished their punch, we may
as well retire, to get ready for a hard day's work
to-morrow
.
Captain Truck made this proposal, because he saw that
one or two of the party were
plenum punch
, and that Eve
and her companion were becoming aware of the propriety
of retiring. It was also true that he foresaw the necessity
of rest, in order to be ready for the exertions of the
morning
.
After the party had broken up, which it did very
contrary
to the wishes of Messrs. Dodge and Monday,
Mademoiselle
Viefville passed an hour in the state-room of Miss
Effingham, during which time she made several
supererogatory
complaints of the manner in which the editor of the
Active Inquirer had viewed things in Paris, besides asking
a good many questions concerning his occupation and
character
.
I am not quite certain, my dear mademoiselle, that I
can give you a very learned description of the animal you
think worthy of all these questions, but, by the aid of Mr.
John Effingham's information, and a few words that have
fallen from Mr. Blunt, I believe it ought to be something as
follows:America once produced a very distinguished
philosopher
,
named Franklin
Comment, ma chre! Tout le monde le connait!
This Monsieur Franklin commenced life as a
printer
;
but living to a great age, and rising to high
employments
,
he became a philosopher in morals, as his studies
had made him one in physics. Now, America is full of
printers, and most of them fancy themselves Franklins,
until
time and failures teach them discretion.
Mais
the world has not seen but
un seul Franklin!
Nor is it likely to see another very soon. In America
the young men are taught, justly enough, that by merit
they may rise to the highest situations; and, always
according
to Mr. John Effingham, too many of them fancy
that because they are at liberty to turn any high qualities
they may happen to have to account, they are actually
fit for anything. Even he allows this peculiarity of the
country does much good, but he maintains that it also does
much harm, by causing pretenders to start up in all
directions
.
Of this class he describes Mr. Dodge to be. This
person, instead of working at the mechanical part of a
press, to which he was educated, has the ambition to control
its intellectual, and thus edits the Active Inquirer.
It must be a very useful journal!
It answers his purposes, most probably. He is full of
provincial ignorance, and provincial prejudices, you
perceive
;
and, I dare say, he makes his paper the circulator
of all these, in addition to the personal rancour, envy, and
uncharitableness, that usually distinguish a pretension that
mistakes itself for ambition. My cousin Jack affirms that
America is filled with such as he.
And, Monsieur Effingham?
Oh! my dear father is all mildness and charity, you
know, mademoiselle, and he only looks at the bright side
of the picture, for he maintains that a great deal of good
results from the activity and elasticity of such a state of
things. While he confesses to a great deal of downright
ignorance that is paraded as knowledge; to much narrow
intolerance that is offensively prominent in the disguise of
principle, and a love of liberty; and to vulgarity and
personalities
that wound all taste, and every sentiment of right,
he insists on it that the main result is good.
In such a case there is need of an umpire. You
mentioned the opinion of Mr. Blunt. Comme ce jeune homme
parle bien Franais!
Eve hesitated, and she changed colour slightly, before
she answered.
I am not certain that the opinion of Mr. Blunt ought to
be mentioned in opposition to those of my father and cousin
Jack, on such a subject, she said. He is very young, and
it is, now, quite questionable whether he is even an American
at all.
Tant mieux, ma chre. He has been much in the
country, and it is not the native that make the best judge,
when the stranger has many opportunities of seeing.
On this principle, mademoiselle, you are, then, to give
up your own judgment about France, on all those points in
which I have the misfortune to differ from you, said Eve,
laughing.
Pas tout  fait
, returned the governess
goodhumouredly
.
Age and experience must pass
pour quelque chose.
Et Monsieur Blunt?
Monsieur Blunt leans nearer to the side of cousin Jack,
I fear, than to that of my dear, dear father. He says men
of Mr. Dodge's character, propensities, malignancy,
intolerance
,
ignorance, vulgarity, and peculiar vices abound in
and about the American press. He even insists that they
do an incalculable amount of harm, by influencing those
who have no better sources of information; by setting up
low jealousies and envy in the place of principles and the
right; by substitutingI use his own words, mademoiselle,
said Eve, blushing with the consciousness of the fidelity of
her memoryby substituting uninstructed provincial
notions
for true taste and liberality; by confounding the real
principles of liberty with personal envies, and the jealousies
of station; and by losing sight entirely of their duties to
the public, in the effort to advance their own interests. He
says that the government is in truth a
press-ocracy
, and a
press-ocracy, too, that has not the redeeming merit of either
principles, tastes, talents or knowledge.
Ce Monsieur Blunt has been very explicit, and
suffisamment
eloquent
, returned Mademoiselle Viefville, gravely;
for the prudent governess did not fail to observe that Eve
used language so very different from that which was habitual
to her, as to make her suspect she quoted literally. For the
first time the suspicion was painfully awakened, that it was
her duty to be more vigilant in relation to the intercourse
between her charge and the two agreeable young men whom
accident had given them as fellow-passengers. After a short
but musing pause, she again adverted to the subject of their
previous conversation.
Ce Monsieur Dodge, est il ridicule!
On that point at least, my dear mademoiselle, there can
be no mistake. And yet cousin Jack insists that this stuff
will be given to his readers, as views of Europe worthy of
their attention.
Ce conte du roi!mais, c'est trop fort!
With the coat laced at the seams, and the cocked hat!
Et l'honorable Louis Philippe d'Orleans!
Orleans, mademoiselle; d'Orleans would be
anti-republican
.
Then the two ladies sat looking at each other a few
moments
in silence, when both, although of a proper
retenue
of manner in general, burst into a hearty and long-continued
fit of laughter. Indeed, so long did Eve, in the buoyancy
of her young spirits, and her keen perception of the
ludicrous
,
indulge herself, that her fair hair fell about her rosy
cheeks, and her bright eyes fairly danced with delight.
17 *
CHAPTER XVI.
And there he went ashore without delay,
Having no custom-house or quarantine,
To ask him awkward questions on the way
About the time and place where he had been.
Byron
.
Captain Truck
was in a sound sleep as soon as his
head touched the pillow. With the exception of the ladies,
the others soon followed his example; and as the people
were excessively wearied, and the night was so tranquil,
ere long only a single pair of eyes were open on deck: those
of the man at the wheel. The wind died away, and even
this worthy was not innocent of nodding at his post.
Under such circumstances, it will occasion no great
surprise
that the cabin was aroused next morning with the
sudden and starling information that the land was close
aboard the ship. Every one hurried on deck, where, sure
enough, the dreaded coast of Africa was seen, with a
palpable
distinctness, within two miles of the vessel. It
presented
a long broken line of sand-hills, unrelieved by a tree,
or by so few as almost to merit this description, and with a
hazy back-ground of remote mountains to the north-east.
The margin of the actual coast nearest to the ship was
indented
with bays; and even rocks appeared in places; but
the general character of the scene was that of a fierce and
burning sterility. On this picture of desolation all stood
gazing in awe and admiration for some minutes, as the day
gradually brightened, until a cry arose from forward, of a
ship!
Whereaway? sternly demanded Captain Truck; for
the sudden and unexpected appearance of this dangerous
coast had awakened all that was forbidding and severe in
the temperament of the old master; whereaway, sir?
On the larboard quarter, sir, and at anchor.
She is ashore! exclaimed half-a-dozen voices at the
same instant, just as the words came from the last speaker.
The glass soon settled this important point. At the distance
of about a league astern of them were, indeed, to be seen
the spars of a ship, with the hull looming on the sands, in
a way to leave no doubt of her being a wreck. It was the
first impression of all, that this, at last, was the Foam; but
Captain Truck soon announced the contrary.
It is a Swede, or a Dane, he said, by his rig and his
model. A stout, solid, compact sea-boat, that is high and
dry on the sands, looking as if he had been built there.
He does not appear even to have bilged, and most of his
sails, and all of his yards, are in their places. Not a living
soul is to be seen about her! Ha! there are signs of tents
made of sails on shore, and broken bales of goods! Her
people have been seized and carried into the desert, as usual,
and this is a fearful hint that we must keep the Montauk off
the bottom. Turn-to the people, Mr. Leach, and get up
your sheers that we may step our jury-masts at once; the
smallest breeze on the land would drive us ashore, without
any after-sail.
While the mates and the crew set about completing the
work they had prepared the previous day, Captain Truck
and his passengers passed the time in ascertaining all they
could concerning the wreck, and the reasons of their being
themselves in a position so very different from what they
had previously believed.
As respects the first, little more could be ascertained;
she lay absolutely high and dry on a hard sandy beach,
where she had probably been cast during the late gale, and
sufficient signs were made out by the captain, to prove to
him that she had been partly plundered. More than this
could not be discovered at that distance, and the work of the
Montauk was too urgent to send a boat manned with her
own people to examine. Mr. Blunt, Mr. Sharp, Mr.
Monday
,
and the servants of the two former, however,
volunteering
to pull the cutter, it was finally decided to look more
closely into the facts, Captain Truck himself taking charge
of the expedition.While the latter is getting ready, a word
of explanation will suffice to tell the reader the reason why
the Montauk had fallen so much to leeward.
The ship being so near the coast, it became now very
obvious she was driven by a current that set along the land,
but which, it was probable, had set towards it more in the
offing. The imperceptible drift between the observation of
the previous day and the discovery of the coast, had
sufficed
to carry the vessel a great distance; and to this
simple
cause, coupled perhaps with some neglect in the
steerage
during the past night, was her present situation to be
solely attributed. Just at this moment, the little air there
was came from the land, and by keeping her head off shore,
Captain Truck entertained no doubt of his being able to
escape the calamity that had befallen the other ship in the
fury of the gale. A wreck is always a matter of so much
interest with mariners, therefore, that taking all these things
into view, he had come to the determination we have
mentioned
,
of examining into the history of the one in sight, so
far as circumstances permitted.
The Montauk carried three boats; the launch, a large,
safe, and well-constructed craft, which stood in the usual
chucks between the foremast and mainmast; a jolly-boat,
and a cutter. It was next to impossible to get the first into
the water, deprived as the ship was of its mainmast; but
the other hanging at davits, one on each quarter, were
easily
lowered. The packets seldom carry any arms beyond
a light gun to fire signals with, the pistols of the master,
and perhaps a fowling-piece or two. Luckily the
passengers
were better provided: all the gentlemen had pistols,
Mr. Monday and Mr. Dodge excepted, if indeed they
properly
belonged to this category, as Captain Truck would say,
and most of them had also fowling-pieces. Although a
careful
examination of the coast with the glasses offered no signs
of the presence of any danger from enemies, these arms
were carefully collected, loaded, and deposited in the boats,
in order to be prepared for the worst. Provisions and water
were also provided, and the party were about to proceed.
Captain Truck and one or two of the adventurers were
still on the deck, when Eve, with that strange love of
excitement
and adventure that often visits the most delicate
spirits, expressed an idle regret that she could not make one
in the expedition.
There is something so strange and wild in landing on
an African desert, she said; and I think a near view
of the wreck would repay us, Mademoiselle, for the hazard.
The young men hesitated between their desire to have
such a companion, and their doubts of the prudence of the
step; but Captain Truck declared there could be no risk,
and Mr. Effingham consenting, the whole plan was altered
so as to include the ladies; for there was so much pleasure
in varying the monotony of a calm, and escaping the
confinement
of ship, that everybody entered into the new
arrangement
with zeal and spirit.
A single whip was rigged on the fore-yeard, a chair was
slung, and in ten minutes both ladies were floating on the
ocean in the cutter. This boat pulled six oars, which were
manned by the servants of the two Messrs. Effinghams,
Mr. Blunt, and Mr. Sharp, together with the two latter
gentlemen
in person. Mr. Effingham steered. Captain Truck
had the jolly-boat, of which he pulled an oar himself, aided
by Saunders, Mr. Monday, and Sir George Templemore;
the mates and the regular crew being actively engaged in
rigging their jury-mast. Mr. Dodge declined being of the
party, feeding himself with the hope that the present would
be a favourable occasion to peep into the state-rooms, to run
his eye over forgotten letters and papers, and otherwise to
increase the general stock of information of the editor of
the Active Inquirer.
Look to your chains, and see all clear for a run of the
anchors, Mr. Leach, should you set within a mile of the
shore, called out the captain, as they pulled off from the
vessel's side. The ship is drifting along the land, but the
wind you have will hardly do more than meet the send of
the sea, which is on shore: should any thing go wrong,
show an ensign at the head of the jury-stick forward.
The mate waved his hand, and the adventurers passed
without the sound of the voice. It was a strange sensation
to most of those in the boats, to find themselves in their
present situation. Eve and Mademoiselle Viefville, in
particular
,
could scarcely credit their senses, when they found
the egg-shells that held them heaving and setting like
bubbles
on those long sluggish swells, which had seemed of so
little consequence while in the ship, but which now
resembled
the heavy respirations of a leviathan. The boats,
indeed, though always gliding onward, impelled by the oars,
appeared at moments to be sent helplessly back and forth,
like playthings of the mighty deep, and it was some
minutes
before either obtained a sufficient sense of security
to enjoy her situation. As they receded fast from the
Montauk
,
too, their situation seemed still more critical; and with
all her sex's love of excitement, Eve heartily repented of
her undertaking before they had gone a mile. The
gentlemen
,
however, were all in good spirits, and as the boats
kept near each other, Captain Truck enlivening their way
with his peculiar wit, and Mr. Effingham, who was
influenced
by a motive of humanity in consenting to come, being
earnest and interested, Eve soon began to entertain other
ideas.
As they drew near the end of their little expedition,
entirely
new feelings got the mastery of the whole party. The
solitary and gloomy grandeur of the coasts, the sublime
sterility,for even naked sands may become sublime by
their vastness,the heavy moanings of the ocean on the
beach, and the entire spectacle of the solitude, blended as
it was with the associations of Africa, time, and the changes
of history, united to produce sensations of a pleasing
melancholy
.
The spectacle of the ship, bringing with it the
images of European civilization, as it lay helpless and
deserted
on the sands, too, heightened all.
This vessel, beyond a question, had been driven up on a
sea during the late gale, at a point where the water was of
sufficient depth to float her, until within a few yards of the
very spot where she now lay; Captain Truck giving the
following probable history of the affair:
On all sandy coasts, he said, the return waves that
are cast on the beach form a bar, by washing back with
them a portion of the particles. This bar is usually within
thirty or forty fathoms of the shore, and there is frequently
sufficient water within it to float a ship. As this bar,
however
,
prevents the return of all the water, on what is called
the under-tow, narrow channels make from point to point,
through which this excess of the element escapes. These
channels are known by the appearance of the water over
them, the seas breaking less at those particular places than
in the spots where the bottom lies nearer to the surface, and
all experienced mariners are aware of the fact. No doubt,
the unfortunate master of this ship, finding himself reduced
to the necessity of running ashore to save the lives of his
crew, has chosen such a place, and has consequently forced
his vessel up to a spot where she has remained dry as soon
as the sea fell. So worthy a fellow deserved a better fate;
for this wreck is not three days old, and yet no signs are
to be seen of any who were in that stout ship.
These remarks were made as the crew of the two boats
lay on their oars, at a short distance without the line on the
water, where the breaking of the sea pointed out the
position
of the bar. The channel, also, was plainly visible
directly
astern of the ship, the sea merely rising and falling
in it without combing. A short distance to the southward, a
few bold black rocks thrust themselves forward, and formed
a sort of bay, in which it was practicable to land without
risk; for they had come on the coast in a region where the
monotony of the sands, as it appeared when close in, was
little relieved by the presence of anything else.
If you will keep the cutter just without the breakers,
Mr. Effingham, Captain Truck continued, after standing
up a while and examining the shore, I will pull into the
channel, and land in yonder bay. If you feel disposed to
follow, you may do so by giving the tiller to Mr. Blunt, on
receiving a signal to that effect from me. Be steady,
gentlemen
,
at your oars, and look well to the arms on landing,
for we are in a knavish part of the world. Should any of
the monkeys or ouran-outangs claim kindred with Mr.
Saunders, we may find it no easy matter to persuade them
to leave us the pleasure of his society.
The captain made a sign, and the jolly-boat entered the
channel. Inclining south, it was seen rising and falling just
within the breakers, and then it was hid by the rocks. In
another minute, Mr. Truck, followed by all but Mr.
Monday
,
who stood sentinel at the boat, was on the rocks,
making
his way towards the wreck. On reaching the latter, he
ascended swiftly even to the main cross-trees. Here a long
examination of the plain, beyond the bank that hid it from
the view of all beneath, succeeded, and then the signal to
come on was made to those who were still in the boat.
Shall we venture? cried Paul Blunt, soliciting an
assent
by the very manner in which he put the question.
What say you, dear father?
I hope we may not yet be too late to succour some
Christian in distress, my child. Take the tiller, Mr. Blunt,
and in Heaven's good name, and for humanity's sake, let
us proceed!
The boat advanced, Paul Blunt standing erect to steer,
his ardour to proceed corrected by apprehensions on
account
of her precious freight. There was an instant when
the ladies trembled, for it seemed as if the light boat was
about to be cast upon the shore, like the froth of the sea
that shot past them; but the steady hand of him who
steered
averted the danger, and in another minute they were
floating at the side of the jolly-boat. The ladies got ashore
without much difficulty, and stood on the summit of the
rocks.
Nous voici done, en Afrique, exclaimed Mademoiselle
Viefville, with that sensation of singularity that comes over
all when they first find themselves in situations of
extraordinary
novelty.
The wreckthe wreck, murmured Eve; let us go
to the wreck. There may be yet a hope of saving some
wretched sufferer.
Toward the wreck they all proceeded, after leaving two
of the servants to relieve Mr. Monday on his watch.
It was an impressive thing to stand at the side of a ship
on the sands of Africa, a scene in which the desolation of
an abandoned vessel was heightened by the desolation of a
desert. The position of the vessel, which stood nearly
erect, imbedded in the sands, rendered it less difficult than
might be supposed for the ladies to ascend to, and to walk
her decks, a rude staging having been made already to
facilitate
the passage. Here the scene became thrice exciting,
for it was the very type of a hastily deserted and cherished
dwelling.
Before Eve and Mademoiselle Viefville gained the deck,
the other party had ascertained that no living soul remained.
The trunks, chests, furniture, and other appliances of the
cabin, had been rummaged, and many boxes had been
raised from the hold, and plundered, a part of their contents
still lying scattered on the decks. The ship, however, had
been lightly freighted, and the bulk of her cargo, which
was salt, was apparently untouched. A Danish ensign was
found bent to the halyards, a proof that Captain Truck's
original conjecture concerning the character of the vessel
was accurate. Her name, too, was ascertained to be the
Carrier, as translated into English, and she belonged to
Copenhagen
.
More than this it was not easy to ascertain.
No papers were found, and her cargo, or as much of it as
remained, was so mixed, and miscellaneous, as Saunders
called it, that no plausible guess could be given as to the
port where it had been taken in, if indeed it had all been
received on board at the same place.
Several of the light sails had evidently been carried off,
but all the heavy canvas was left on the yards which
remained
in their places. The vessel was large, exceedingly
strong, as was proved by the fact that she had not bilged in
beaching, and apparently well found. Nothing was
wanting
to launch her into the ocean but machinery and force,
and a crew to sail her, when she might have proceeded on
her voyage as if nothing unusual had occurred. But such
a restoration was hopeless, and this admirable machine, like
a man cut off in his youth and vigour, had been cast upon
the shores of this inhospitable region, to moulder where it
lay, unless broken up for the wood and iron by the
wanderers
of the desert.
There was no object more likely to awaken melancholy
ideas in a mind resembling that of Captain Truck's, than a
spectacle of this nature. A fine ship, complete in nearly
all her parts, virtually uninjured, and yet beyond the chance
of further usefulness, in his eyes was a picture of the most
cruel loss. He cared less for the money it had cost than
for the qualities and properties that were thus destroyed.
He examined the bottom, which he pronounced capital
for stowing, and excellent as that of a sea-boat; he admired
the fastenings; applied his knife to try the quality of the
wood, and pronounced the Norway pine of the spars to be
almost equal to anything that could be found in our own
southern woods. The rigging, too, he regarded as one
loves to linger over the regretted qualities of a deceased
friend.
Vol. I.  18
The tracks of camels and horses were abundant on the
sands around the ship, and especially at the bottom of the
rude staging by which the party had ascended, and which
had evidently been hastily made in order to carry articles
from the vessel to the backs of the animals that were to
bear them into the desert. The foot-prints of men were
also to be seen, and there was a startling and mournful
certainty in distinguishing the marks of shoes, as well as
those of the naked foot.
Judging from all these signs, Captain Truck was of
opinion
the wreck must have taken place but two or three days
before, and that the plunderers had not left the spot many
hours.
They probably went off with what they could carry at
sunset last evening, and there can be no doubt that before
many days, they, or others in their places, will be back
again. God protect the poor fellows who have fallen into
this miserable bondage! What an occasion would there
now be to rescue one of them, should he happen to be hid
near this spot!
The idea seized the whole party at once, and all eagerly
turned to examine the high bank, which rose nearly to the
summit of the masts, in the hope of discovering some
concealed
fugitive. The gentlemen went below again, and Mr.
sharp and Mr. Blunt called out in German, and English, and
French, to invite any one who might be secreted to come
forth. No sound answered these friendly calls. Again
Captain Truck went aloft to look into the interior, but he
beheld nothing more than the broad and unpeopled desert.
A place where the camels had descended to the beach
was at no great distance, and thither most of the party
proceeded
,
mounting to the level of the plain beyond. In this
little expedition, Paul Blunt led the advance, and as he rose
over the brow of the bank, he cocked both barrels of his
fowling-piece, uncertain what might be encountered. They
found, however, a silent waste, almost without vegetation,
and nearly as trackless as the ocean that lay behind them.
At the distance of a hundred rods, an object was just
discernible
,
lying on the plain half-buried in sand, and thither
the young men expressed a wish to go, first calling to those
in the ship to send a man aloft to give the alarm, in the
event of any party of the Mussulmans being seen. Mr.
Effingham, too, on being told their intention, had the
precaution
to cause Eve and Mademoiselle Viefville to get into
the cutter, which he manned, and caused to pull out over
the bar, where she lay waiting the issue.
A camel's path, of which the tracks were nearly
obliterated
by the sands, led to the object; and after toiling along
it, the adventurers soon reached the desired spot. It proved
to be the body of a man who had died by violence. His
dress and person denoted that of a passenger rather than
that of a seaman, and he had evidently been dead but a
very few hours, probably not twelve. The cut of a sabre
had cleft his skull. Agreeing not to acquaint the ladies
with this horrible discovery, the body was hastily covered
with the sand, the pockets of the dead man having been
first examined; for, contrary to usage, his person had not
been stripped. A letter was found, written by a wife to her
husband, and nothing more. It was in German, and its
expressions and contents, though simple, were endearing
and natural. It spoke of the traveller's return; for she who
wrote it little thought of the miserable fate that awaited her
beloved in this remote desert.
As nothing else was visible, the party returned hastily to
the beach, where they found that Captain Truck had ended
his investigation, and was impatient to return. In the
interest
of the scene the Montauk had disappeared behind a
headland, towards which she had been drifting when they
left her. Her absence created a general sense of loneliness,
and the whole party hastened into the jolly-boat, as if
fearful
of being left. When without the bar again, the cutter
took in her proper crew, and the boats pulled away, leaving
the Dane standing on the beach in his solitary desolation
a monument of his own disaster.
As they got further from the land the Montauk came in
sight again, and Captain Truck announced the agreeable
intelligence that the jury mainmast was up, and that the
ship had after-sail set, diminutive and defective as it might
be. Instead of heading to the southward, however, as
heretofore, Mr. Leach was apparently endeavouring to get
back again to the northward of the headland that had shut
in the ship, or was trying to retrace his steps. Mr. Truck
rightly judged that this was proof his mate disliked the
appearance
of the coast astern of him, and that he was anxious
to get an offing. The captain in consequence urged his
men to row, and in little more than an hour the whole
party were on the deck of the Montauk again, and the boats
were hanging at the davits.
CHAPTER XVII.
I boarded the king's ship; now on the beak,
Now in the waist, the deck, in every cabin,
I flam'd amazement.
Tempest
.
If
Captain Truck distrusted the situation of his own ship
when he saw that the mate had changed her course, he liked
it still less after he was on board, and had an opportunity
to form a more correct judgment. The current had set the
vessel not only to the southward, but in-shore, and the send
of the ground-swell was gradually, but inevitably, heaving
her in towards the land. At this point the coast was more
broken than at the spot where the Dane had been wrecked,
some signs of trees appearing, and rocks running off in
irregular reefs into the sea. More to the south, these rocks
were seen without the ship, while directly astern they were
not half a mile distant. Still the wind was favourable,
though light and baffling, and Mr. Leach had got up every
stitch of canvas that circumstances would at all allow; the
lead, too, had been tried, and the bottom was found to be a
hard sand mixed with rocks, and the depth of the water
such as to admit of anchoring. It was a sign that Captain
Truck did not absolutely despair after ascertaining all these
facts, that he caused Mr. Saunders to be summoned; for
as yet, none of those who had been in the boats had
breakfasted
.
Step this way, Mr. Steward, said the captain; and
report the state of the coppers. You were rummaging, as
usual, among the lockers of yonder unhappy Dane, and I
desire to know what discoveries you have made! You will
please to recollect, that on all public expeditions of this
nature
,
there must be no peculation or private journal kept.
Did you see any stock-fish?
Sir, I should deem this ship disgraced by the admission
into her pantry of such an article, sir. We have tongues
and sounds in plenty, Captain Truck, and no gentleman
that has such diet, need ambition a stock-fish!
I am not quite of your way of thinking; but the earth
is not made of stock-fish. Did you happen to fall in with
any butter?
Some, sir, that is scarcely fit to slush a mast with, and
I do think, one of the most atrocious cheeses, sir, it was
ever my bad fortune to meet with. I do not wonder the
Africans left the wreck.
You followed their example, of course, Mr. Saunders,
and left the cheese.
I followed my own judgment, sir, for I would not stay
in a ship with such a cheese, Captain Truck, sir, even to
have the honour of serving under so great a commander as
yourself. I think it no wonder that vessel was wrecked!
Even the sharks would abandon her. The very thoughts
of her impurities, sir, make me feel unsettled in the
stomach
.
The captain nodded his head in approbation of this
sentiment
,
called for a coal, and then ordered breakfast. The
meal was silent, thoughtful, and even sad; every one was
thinking of the poor Danes and their sad fate, while they
who had been on the plain had the additional subject of the
murdered man for their contemplation.
Is it possible to do nothing to redeem these poor
people
,
father, from captivity? Eve at length demanded.
I have been thinking of this, my child; but I see no
other method than to acquaint their government of their
situation.
Might we not contribute something from our own means
to that effect? Money, I fancy, is the chief thing
necessary
.
The gentlemen looked at each other in approbation,
18*
though a reluctance to be the first to speak kept most of
them silent.
If a hundred pounds, Miss Effingham, will be useful,
Sir George Templemore said, after the pause had continued
an awkward minute, laying a banknote of that amount on
the table, and you will honour us by becoming the keeper
of the redemption money, I have great pleasure in making
the offer.
This was handsomely said, and as Captain Truck
afterwards
declared, handsomely done too, though it was a little
abrupt, and caused Eve to hesitate and redden.
I shall accept your gift, sir, she said; and with your
permission will transfer it to Mr. Effingham, who will better
know what use to put it to, in order to effect our benevolent
purpose. I think I can answer for as much more from
himself.
You may, with certainty, my dearand twice as much,
if necessary. John, this is a proper occasion for your
interference
.
Put me down at what you please, said John
Effingham
,
whose charities in a pecuniary sense were as
unlimited
,
as in feeling they were apparently restrained. One
hundred or one thousand, to rescue that poor crew!
I believe, sir, we must all follow so good an example,
Mr. Sharp observed; and I sincerely hope that this scheme
will not prove useless. I think it may be effected by means
of some of the public agents at Mogadore.
Mr. Dodge raised many objections, for it really exceeded
his means to give so largely, and his character was formed
in a school too envious and jealous to confess an inferiority
on a point even as worthless as that of money. Indeed, he
had so long been accustomed to maintain that one man
was as good as another, in opposition to his senses, that,
like most of those who belong to this impracticable school,
he had tacitly admitted in his own mind, the general and
vulgar ascendency of mere wealth; and, quite as a matter
of course, he was averse to confessing his own inferiority
on a point that he had made to be all in all, while loudest
in declaiming against any inferiority whatever. He walked
out of the cabin, therefore, with strong heart-burnings and
jealousies, because others had presumed to give that which
it was not really in his power to bestow.
On the other hand, both Mademoiselle Viefville and Mr.
Monday manifested the superiority of the opinions in which
they had been trained. The first quietly handed a
Napoleon
to Mr. Effingham, who took it with as much attention
and politeness as he received any of the larger
contributions
;
while the latter produced a five-pound note, with a
hearty good-will that redeemed the sin of many a glass of
punch in the eyes of his companions.
Eve did not dare to look towards Paul Blunt, while this
collection was making; but she felt regret that he did not
join in it. He was silent and thoughtful, and even seemed
pained, and she wondered if it were possible that one, who
certainly lived in a style to prove that his income was large,
could be so thoughtless as to have deprived himself of the
means of doing that which he so evidently desired to do.
But most of the company was too well-bred to permit the
matter to become the subject of conversation, and they soon
rose from table in a body. The mind of Eve, however,
was greatly relieved when her father told her that the young
man had put a hundred sovereigns in gold into his hands as
soon as possible, and that he had seconded this offering with
another, of embarking for Mogadore in person, should they
get into the Cape de Verds, or the Canaries, with a view
of carrying out the charitable plan with the least delay.
He is a noble-hearted young man, said the pleased
father, as he communicated this fact to his daughter and
cousin; and I shall not object to the plan.
If he offer to quit this ship one minute sooner than is
necessary, he does, indeed, deserve a statue of gold, said
John Effingham; for it has all that can attract a young
man like him, and all too that can awaken his jealousy.
Cousin Jack! exclaimed Eve reproachfully, quite
thrown off her guard by the abruptness and plainness of
this language.
The quiet smile of Mr. Effingham proved that he
understood
both, but he made no remark. Eve instantly
recovered
her spirits, and angry at herself for the girlish
exclamation
that had escaped her, she turned on her assailant.
I do not know that I ought to be seen in an aside with
Mr. John Effingham, she said, even when it is
sanctioned
with the presence of my own father.
And may I ask why so much sudden reserve, my
offended beauty?
Merely that the report is already active, concerning the
delicate relation in which we stand towards each other.
John Effingham looked surprised, but he suppressed his
curiosity from a long habit of affecting an indifference he
did not always feel. The father was less dignified, for he
quietly demanded an explanation.
It would seem, returned Eve, assuming a solemnity
suited to a matter of interest, that our secret is discovered.
While we were indulging our curiosity about this
unfortunate
ship, Mr. Dodge was gratifying the laudable industry
of the Active Inquirer, by prying into our state-rooms.
This meanness is impossible! exclaimed Mr.
Effingham
.
Nay, said John, no meanness is impossible to a
demagogue,a pretender to things of which he has even
no just conception,a man who lives to envy and traduce;
in a word, a
quasi
gentleman. Let us hear what Eve has
to say.
My information is from Ann Sidley, who saw him in
the act. Now the kind letter you wrote my father, cousin
Jack, just before we left London, and which you wrote
because
you would not trust that honest tongue of yours to
speak the feelings of that honest heart, is the subject of my
daily study; not on account of its promises, you will
believe
me, but on account of the strong affection it displays
to a girl who is not worthy of one half you feel and do for
her.
Pshaw!
Well, let it then be pshaw! I had read that letter this
very morning, and carelessly left it on my table. This
letter
Mr. Dodge, in his undying desire to lay everything
before
the public, as becomes his high vocation, and as in
duty bound, has read; and misconstruing some of the
phrases, as will sometimes happen to a zealous circulator
of news, he has drawn the conclusion that I am to be
made a happy woman as soon as we reach America, by
being converted from Miss Eve Effingham into Mrs. John
Effingham.
Impossible! No man can be such a fool, or quite so
great a miscreant!
I should rather think, my child, added the milder
father, that injustice has been done Mr. Dodge. No
person
,
in the least approximating to the station of a
gentleman
,
could even think of an act so base as this you
mention
.
Oh! if this be all your objection to the tale, observed
the cousin, I am ready to swear to its truth. But Eve has
caught a little of Captain Truck's spirit of mystifying, and
is determined to make a character by a bold stroke in the
beginning. She is clever, and in time may rise to be a
quiz.
Thank you for the compliment, cousin Jack, which,
however, I am forced to disclaim, as I never was more
serious
in my life. That the letter was read, Nanny, who is
truth itself, affirms she saw. That Mr. Dodge has since
been industriously circulating the report of my great good
fortune, she has heard from the mate, who had it from the
highest source of information direct, and that such a man
would be likely to come to such a conclusion, you have
only to recall the terms of the letter yourself, to believe.
There is nothing in my letter to justify any notion so
silly.
An Active Inquirer might make discoveries you little
dream of, dear cousin Jack. You speak of its being time
to cease roving, of settling yourself at last, of never
parting
,
and, prodigal as you are, of making Eve the future
mistress of your fortune. Now to all this, recreant,
confess
,
or I shall never again put faith in man.
John Effingham made no answer, but the father warmly
expressed his indignation, that any man of the smallest
pretentions
to be admitted among gentlemen, should be guilty
of an act so base.
We can hardly tolerate his presence, John, and it is
almost a matter of conscience to send him to Coventry.
If you entertain such notions of decorum, your wisest
way, Edward, will be to return to the place whence you
have come; for, trust me, you will find scores of such
gentlemen
where you are going!
I shall not allow you to persuade me I know my own
country so little. Conduct like this will stamp a man with
disgrace in America as well as elsewhere.
Conduct like this would, but it will no longer. The
pell-mell that rages has brought honourable men into a sad
minority, and even Mr. Dodge will tell you the majority
must rule. Were he to publish my letter, a large portion
of his readers would fancy he was merely asserting the
liberty of the press. Heavens save us! You have been
dreaming abroad, Ned Effingham, while your country has
retrograded, in all that is respectable and good, a century
in a dozen years!
As this was the usual language of John Effingham, neither
of his listeners thought much of it, though Mr. Effingham
more decidedly expressed an intention to cut off even the
slight communication with the offender, he had permitted
himself to keep up, since they had been on board.
Think better of it, dear father, said Eve; for such
a man is scarcely worthy of even your resentment. He is
too much your inferior in principles, manners, character,
station, and everything else, to render him of so much
account; and then, were we to clear up this masquerade
into which the chances of a ship have thrown us, we might
have our scruples concerning others, as well as concerning
this wolf in sheep's clothing.
Say rather an ass, shaved and painted to resemble a
zebra, muttered John. The fellow has no property as
respectable as the basest virtue of a wolf.
He has at least rapacity.
And can howl in a pack. This much, then, I will
concede to you: but I agree with Eve, we must either punish
him affirmatively, by pulling his ears, or treat him with
contempt, which is always negative or silent. I wish he
had entered the state-room of that fine young fellow, Paul
Blunt, who is of an age and a spirit to give him a lesson
that might make a paragraph for his Active Inquirer, if not
a scissors' extract of himself.
Eve knew that the offender had been there too, but she
had too much prudence to betray him.
This will only so much the more oblige him, she said,
laughingly; for Mr. Blunt, in speaking of the editor of
the Active Inquirer, said that he had the failing to believe
that this earth, and all it contained, was created merely to
furnish materials for newspaper paragraphs.
The gentlemen laughed with the amused Eve, and Mr.
Effingham remarked, that there did seem to be men so
perfectly selfish, so much devoted to their own interests,
and so little sensible of the rights and feelings of others, as
to manifest a desire to render the press superior to all other
power; not, he concluded, in the way of argument, or
as an agent of reason, but as a master, coarse, corrupt,
tyrannical and vile; the instrument of selfishness, instead
of the right, and when not employed as the promoter of
personal interests, to be employed as the tool of personal
passions.
Your father will become a convert to my opinions, Miss
Effingham, said John, and he will not be home a
twelve-month
before he will make the discovery that the government
is a press-ocracy, and its ministers, self-chosen and usurpers,
composed of those who have the least at stake, even as to
character.
Mr. Effingham shook his head in dissent, but the
conversation
changed in consequence of a stir in the ship.
The air from the land had freshened, and even the heavy
canvas on which the Montauk was now compelled
principally
to rely, had been asleep, as mariners term it, or had
blown out from the mast, where it stood inflated and steady,
a proof at sea, where the water is always in motion, that
the breeze is getting to be fresh. Aided by this power, the
ship had overcome the united action of the heavy
ground-swell
and of the current, and was stealing out from under
the land, when the air murmured for an instant, as if about
to blow still fresher, and then all the sails flapped. The
wind had passed away like a bird, and a dark line to
sea-ward
,
denoted the approach of the breeze from the ocean.
The stir in the vessel was occasioned by the preparations to
meet this change.
The new wind brought little with it beyond the general
danger of blowing on shore. The breeze was light, and
not more than sufficient to force the vessel through the
water
,
in her present condition, a mile and a half in the hour,
and this too in a line nearly parallel with the coast.
Captain
Truck saw therefore at a glance, that he should be
compelled to anchor. Previously, however, to doing this,
he had a long talk with his mates, and a boat was lowered.
The lead was cast, and the bottom was found to be still
good, though a hard sand, which is not the best holding
ground.
A heavy sea would cause the ship to drag, Captain
Truck remarked, should it come on to blow, and the lines
of dark rocks astern of them would make chips of the
Pennsylvania in an hour, were that great ship to lie on it.
He entered the boat, and pulled along the reefs to
examine
an inlet that Mr. Leach reported to have been seen,
before
he got the ship's head to the northward. Could an
entrance
be found at this point, the vessel might possibly be
carried within the reef, and a favourite scheme of the
captain's
could be put in force, one to which he now attached
the highest importance. A mile brought the boat up to the
inlet, where Mr. Truck found the following appearances:
The general formation of the coast in sight was that of a
slight curvature, within which the ship had so far drifted
as to be materially inside a line drawn from headland to
headland. There was, consequently, little hope of urging
a vessel, crippled like the Montauk, against wind, sea and
current, out again into the ocean. For about a league
abreast of the ship the coast was rocky, though low, the
rocks running off from the shore quite a mile in places, and
every where fully half that distance. The formation was
irregular, but it had the general character of a reef, the
position of which was marked by breakers, as well as by
the black heads of rocks that here and there showed
themselves
above the water. The inlet was narrow, crooked,
and so far environed by rocks as to render it
questionable
whether there was a passage at all, though the
smoothness
of the water had raised hopes to that effect in Mr.
Leach.
As soon as captain Truck arrived at the mouth of this
passage, he felt so much encouraged by the appearance of
things that he gave the concerted signal for the ship to veer
round and to stand to the southward. This was losing
ground in the way of offing, but tack the Montauk could
not with so little wind, and the captain saw by the drift she
had made since he left her, that promptitude was necessary.
The ship might anchor off the inlet, as well as anywhere
else, if reduced to anchoring outside at all, and then there
was always the chance of entering.
As soon as the ship's head was again to the southward,
and Captain Truck felt certain that she was lying along the
reef at a reasonably safe distance, and in as good a
direction
as he could hope for, he commenced his examination.
Like a discreet seaman he pulled off from the rocks to a
suitable distance, for should an obstacle occur outside, he
well knew any depth of water further in would be useless.
The day was so fine, and in the absence of rivers, the ocean
so limpid in that low latitude, that it was easy to see the
bottom
at a considerable depth. But to this sense, of course,
the captain did not trust, for he kept the lead going
constantly
,
although all eyes were also employed in searching
for rocks.
The first cast of the lead was in five fathoms, and these
soundings were held nearly up to the inlet, where the lead
struck a rock in three fathoms and a half. At this point,
then, a more careful examination was made, but three and
a half was the shallowest cast. As the Montauk drew
nearly a fathom less than this, the cautious old master
proceeded
closer in. Directly in the mouth of the inlet was a
large flat rock, that rose nearly to the surface of the sea,
and which, when the tide was low, was probably bare.
This rock Captain Truck at first believed would defeat his
hopes of success, which by this time were strong; but a
closer examination showed him that on one side of it was a
narrow passage, just wide enough to admit a ship.
From this spot the channel became crooked, but it was
sufficiently marked by the ripple on the reef; and after a
careful investigation, he found it was possible to carry three
fathoms quite within the reef, where a large space existed
that was gradually filling up with sand, but which was
nearly all covered with water when the tide was in, as was
now the case, and which had channels, as usual, between
the banks. Following one of these channels a quarter of
a mile, he found a basin of four fathoms of water, large
Vol. I.  19
enough to take a ship in, and, fortunately, it was in close
proximity to a portion of the reef that was always bare,
when a heavy sea was not beating over it. Here he
dropped
a buoy, for he had come provided with several
fragments
of spars for this purpose; and, on his return, the
channel was similarly marked off, at all the critical points.
On the flat rock, in the inlet, one of the men was left,
standing
up to his waist in the water, it being certain that the
tide was falling.
The boat now returned to the ship, which it met at the
distance of half a mile from the inlet. The current setting
southwardly, her progress had been more rapid than when
heading north, and her drift had been less towards the land.
Still there was so little wind, so steady a ground-swell, and
it was possible to carry so little after-sail, that great doubts
were entertained of being able to weather the rocks
sufficiently
to turn into the inlet. Twenty times in the next
half hour was the order to let go the anchor, on the point
of being given, as the wind baffled, and as often was it
countermanded, to take advantage of its reviving. These
were feverish moments, for the ship was now so near the
reef as to render her situation very insecure in the event of
the wind's rising, or of a sea's getting up, the sand of the
bottom being too hard to make good holding-ground. Still,
as there was a possibility, in the present state of the
weather
,
of kedging the ship off a mile into the offing, if
necessary
,
Captain Truck stood on with a boldness he might
not otherwise have felt. The anchor hung suspended by a
single turn of the stopper, ready to drop at a signal, and
Mr. Truck stood between the knight-heads, watching the
slow progress of the vessel, and accurately noticing every
foot of leeward set she made, as compared with the rocks.
All this time the poor fellow stood in the water, awaiting
the arrival of his friends, who, in their turn, were anxiously
watching his features, as they gradually grew more distinct.
I see his eyes, cried the captain cheerily; take a
drag at the bowlines, and let her head up as much as she
will, Mr. Leach, and never mind those sham topsails.
Take them in at once, sir; they do us, now, more harm
than good.
The clewline blocks rattled, and the top-gallant sails,
which were made to do the duty of top-sails, but which
would hardly spread to the lower yards, so as to set on a
wind, came rapidly in. Five minutes of intense doubt
followed
,
when the captain gave the animating order to
Man the main-clew garnets, boys, and stand by to
make a run of it!
This was understood to be a sign that the ship was far
enough to windward, and the command to in main-sail,
which soon succeeded, was received with a shout.
Hard up with the helm, and stand by to lay the
fore-yard
square, cried Captain Truck, rubbing his hands.
Look that both bowers are clear for a run; and you,
Toast, bring me the brightest coal in the galley.
The movements of the Montauk were necessarily slow;
but she obeyed her helm, and fell off until her bows pointed
in towards the sailor in the water. This fine fellow, the
moment he saw the ship approaching, waded to the verge
of the rock, where it went off perpendicularly to the
bottom
,
and waved to them to come on without fear.
Come within ten feet of me, he shouted. There is
nothing to spare on the other side.
As the captain was prepared for this, the ship was steered
accordingly, and as she hove slowly past on the rising and
falling water, a rope was thrown to the man, who was
hauled on board.
Port! cried the captain, as soon as the rock was
passed; port your helm, sir, and stand for the first buoy.
In this manner the Montauk drove slowly but steadily
on, until she had reached the basin, where one anchor was
let go almost as soon as she entered. The chain was paid
out until the vessel was forced over to some distance, and
then the other bower was dropped. The fore-sail was
hauled up and handed, and chain was given the ship, which
was pronounced to be securely moored.
Now, cried the captain, all his anxiety ceasing with
the responsibility, I expect to be made a member of the
New-York Philosophical Society at least, which is learned
company for a man who has never been at college, for
discovering
a port on the coast of Africa, which harbour,
ladies
and gentlemen, without too much vanity, I hope to be
permitted to call Port Truck. If Mr. Dodge, however,
should think this too anti-republican, we will compromise
the matter by calling it Port Truck and Dodge; or the
town that no doubt will sooner or later arise on its banks,
may be called Dodgeborough, and I will keep the harbour
to myself.
Should Mr. Dodge consent to this arrangement, he will
render himself liable to the charge of aristocracy, said
Mr. Sharp; for as all felt relieved by finding themselves in a
place of security, so all felt disposed to join in the pleasantry.
I dare say his modesty would prevent his consenting to
the plan.
Why, gentlemen, returned the subject of these
remarks
,
I do not know that we are to refuse honours that
are fairly imposed on us by the popular voice; and the
practice of naming towns and counties after distinguished
citizens, is by no means uncommon with us. A few of my
own neighbours have been disposed to honour me in this
way already, and my paper is issued from a hamlet that
certainly does bear my own unworthy name. So you
perceive
there will be no novelty in the appellation.
I would have made oath to it, cried the captain, from
your well-established humility. Is the place as large as
London?
It can boast of little more than my own office, a tavern,
a store, and a blacksmith's shop, captain, as yet; but Rome
was not built in a day.
Your neighbours, sir, must be people of extraordinary
discernment; but the name?
That is not absolutely decided. At first it was called
Dodgetown, but this did not last long, being thought vulgar
and common-place. Six or eight weeks afterwards, we
We, Mr. Dodge!
I mean the people, sir,I am so much accustomed to
connect myself with the people, that whatever they do, I
think I had a hand in.
And very properly, sir, observed John Effingham,
as probably without you, there would have been no people
at all.
What may be the population of Dodgetown, sir?
asked the persevering captain, on this hint.
At the census of January, it was seventeen; but by the
census of March, there were eighteen. I have made a
calculation
that shows, if we go on at this rate, or by
arithmetical
progression, it will be a hundred in about ten years,
which will be a very respectable population for a country
place. I beg pardon, sir, the people six or eight weeks
afterwards, altered the name to Dodgeborough; but a new
family coming in that summer, a party was got up to change
it to Dodge-ville, a name that was immensely popular, as
ville means city in Latin; but it must be owned the people
like change, or rotation in names, as well as in office, and
they called the place Butterfield Hollow, for a whole month,
after the new inhabitant, whose name is Butterfield. He
moved away in the fall; and so, after trying Belindy,
(
Anglice
Belinda,) Nineveh, Grand Cairo, and Pumpkin
Valley, they made me the offer to restore the ancient name,
provided some
addendum
more noble and proper could be
found than town, or ville, or borough; it is not yet
determined
what it shall be, but I believe we shall finally settle
down in Dodgeople, or Dodgeopolis.
For the season; and a very good name it will prove
for a short cruise, I make no question. The Butterfield
Hollow
was
a little like rotation in office, in truth, sir.
I didn't like it, captain, so I gave Squire Butterfield to
understand, privately; for as he had a majority with him,
I didn't approve of speaking too strongly on the subject.
As soon as I got him out of the tavern, however, the
current
set the other way.
You fairly uncorked him!
That I did, and no one ever heard of him, or of his
hollow, after his retreat. There are a few discontented and
arrogant innovators, who affect to call the place by its old
name of Morton; but these are the mere vassals of a man
who once owned the patent, and who has now been dead
these forty years. We are not the people to keep his old
musty name, or to honour dry bones.
Served him right, sir, and like men of spirit! If he
wants a place called after himself, let him live, like other
people. A dead man has no occasion for a name, and
there should be a law passed, that when a man slips his
19 *
cables, he should bequeath his name to some honest fellow
who has a worse one. It might be well to compel all great
men in particular, to leave their renown to those who
cannot
get any for themselves.
I will venture to suggest an improvement on the name,
if Mr. Dodge will permit me, said Mr. Sharp, who had
been an amused listener to the short dialogue. Dodgeople
is a little short, and may be offensive by its
brusquerie
. By
inserting a single letter, it will become Dodge-people; or,
there is the alternative of Dodge-adrianople, which will be
a truly sonorous and republican title. Adrian was an
emperor
,
and even Mr. Dodge might not disdain the
conjunction
.
By this time, the editor of the Active Inquirer began to
be extremely elevatedfor this was assailing him on his
weakest sideand he laughed and rubbed his hands as if
he thought the joke particularly pleasant. This person had
also a peculiarity of judgment that was singularly in
opposition
to all his open professions, a peculiarity, however,
that belongs rather to his class than to the individual
member
of it. Ultra as a democrat and an American, Mr. Dodge
had a sneaking predilection in favour of foreign opinions.
Although practice had made him intimately acquainted with
all the frauds, deceptions, and vileness of the ordinary arts
of paragraph-making, he never failed to believe religiously
in the veracity, judgment, good faith, honesty and talents
of anything that was imported in the form of types. He
had been weekly, for years, accusing his nearest brother of
the craft, of lying, and he could not be altogether ignorant
of his own propensity in the same way; but,
notwithstanding
all this experience in the secrets of the trade, whatever
reached him from a European journal, he implicitely
swallowed
whole. One, who knew little of the man, might have
supposed he feigned credulity to answer his own purposes;
but this would be doing injustice to his faith, which was
perfect, being based on that provincial admiration, and
provincial
ignorance, that caused the countryman, who went to
London for the first time, to express his astonishment at
finding the king a man. As was due to his colonial origin,
his secret awe and reverence for an Englishman was exactly
in proportion to his protestations of love for the people, and
his deference for rank was graduated on a scale suited to
the heart-burning and jealousies he entertained for all whom
he felt to be his superiors. Indeed, one was the cause of
the other; for they who really are indifferent to their own
social position, are usually equally indifferent to that of
others, so long as they are not made to feel the difference
by direct assumptions of superiority.
When Mr. Sharp, whom even Mr. Dodge had discovered
to be a gentleman,and an English gentleman of course,
entered into the trifling of the moment, therefore, so far
from detecting the mystification, the latter was disposed to
believe himself a subject of interest with this person, against
whose exclusiveness and haughty reserve, notwithstanding,
he had been making side-hits ever since the ship had sailed.
But the avidity with which the Americans of Mr. Dodge's
temperament are apt to swallow the crumbs of flattery that
fall from the Englishman's table, is matter of history, and
the editor himself was never so happy as when he could lay
hold of a paragraph to republish, in which a few words of
comfort were doled out by the condescending mother to the
never-dying faith of the daughter. So far, therefore, from
taking umbrage at what had been said, he continued the
subject long after the captain had gone to his duty, and with
so much perseverance that Paul Blunt, as soon as Mr. Sharp
escaped, took an occasion to compliment that gentleman on
his growing intimacy with the refined and single-minded
champion of the people. The other admitted his
indiscretion
;
and if the affair had no other consequences, it
afforded
these two fine young men a moment's merriment, at a
time when anxiety had been fast getting the ascendency
over their more cheerful feelings. When they endeavoured
to make Miss Effingham share in the amusement, however,
that young lady heard them with gravity; for the meanness
of the act discovered by Nanny Sidley, had indisposed her
to treat the subject of their comments with the familiarity
of even ridicule. Perceiving this, though unable to account
for it, the gentlemen changed the discourse, and soon
became
sufficiently grave by contemplating their own
condition
.
The situation of the Montauk was now certainly one to
excite uneasiness in those who were little acquainted with
the sea, as well as in those who were. It was very much
like that for which Miss Effingham's nurse had pined,
having
many rocks and sands in sight, with the land at no
great distance. In order that the reader may understand it
more clearly, we shall describe it with greater minuteness.
To the westward of the ship lay the ocean, broad, smooth,
glittering, but, heaving and setting, with its eternal
breathings
,
which always resemble the respiration of some huge
monster. Between the vessel and this waste of water, and
within three hundred feet of the first, stretched an irregular
line of ripple, dotted here and there with the heads of low
naked rocks, marking the presence and direction of the reef.
This was all that would interpose between the basin and
the raging billows, should another storm occur; but
Captain
Truck thought this would suffice so far to break the
waves as to render the anchorage sufficiently secure.
Astern of the ship, however, a rounded ridge of sand began
to appear as the tide fell, within forty fathoms of the vessel,
and as the bottom was hard, and difficult to get an anchor
into it, there was the risk of dragging on this bank. We
say that the bottom was hard, for the reader should know
that it is not the weight of the anchor that secures the ship,
but the hold its pointed fluke and broad palm get of the
ground. The coast itself was distant less than a mile, and
the entire basin within the reef was fast presenting spits of
sand, as the water fell on the ebb. Still there were many
channels, and it would have been possible, for one who
knew their windings, to have sailed a ship several leagues
among them, without passing the inlet; these channels
forming a sort of intricate net-work, in every direction from
the vessel.
When Captain Truck had coolly studied all the
peculiarities
of his position, he set about the duty of securing his
ship, in good earnest. The two light boats were brought
under the bows, and the stream anchor was lowered, and
fastened to a spar that lay across both. This anchor was
carried to the bank astern, and, by dint of sheer strength,
it was laid over its summit with a fluke buried to the shank
in the hard sand. By means of a hawser, and a purchase
applied to its end, the men on the banks next roused the
chain out, and shackled it to the ring. The bight was
hove-in
,
and the ship secured astern, so as to prevent a shift of
wind, off the land, from forcing her on the reef. As no
sea could come from this quarter, the single anchor and
chain were deemed sufficient for this purpose. As soon as
the boats were at liberty, and before the chain had been got
ashore, two kedges were carried to the reef, and laid among
the rocks, in such a way that their flukes and stocks equally
got hold of the projections. To these kedges lighter chains
were secured; and when all the bights were hove-in, to as
equal a strain as possible, Captain Truck pronounced his
ship in readiness to ride out any gale that would be likely
to blow. So far as the winds and waves might affect her,
the Montauk was, in truth, reasonably safe; for on the side
where danger was most to be apprehended, she had two
bowers down, and four parts of smaller chain were attached
to the two kedges. Nor had Captain Truck fallen into the
common error of supposing he had so much additional
strength in his fastenings, by simply running the chains
through the rings, but he had caused each to be separately
fastened, both in-board and to the kedges, by which means
each length of the chain formed a distinct and independent
fastening of itself.
So absolute is the sovereignty of a ship, that no one had
presumed to question the master as to his motives for all
this extraordinary precaution, though it was the common
impression that he intended to remain where they were until
the wind became favourable, or at least, until all danger of
being thrown upon the coast, from the currents and the
ground-swell, should have ceased. Paul Blunt observed,
that he fancied it was the intention to take advantage of the
smooth water within the reef, to get up a better and a more
efficient set of jury-masts. But Captain Truck soon
removed
all doubts by letting the truth be known. While on
board the Danish wreck, he had critically examined her
spars, sails, and rigging, and, though adapted for a ship two
hundred tons smaller than the Montauk, he was of opinion
they might be fitted to the latter vessel, and made to answer
all the necessary purposes for crossing the ocean, provided
the Mussulmans and the weather would permit the transfer.
We have smooth water and light airs, he said, when
concluding his explanation, and the current sets
southwardly
along this coast; by means of all our force, hard
working, a kind Providence, and our own enterprise, I hope
yet to see the Montauk enter the port of New York, with
royals set, and ready to carry sail on a wind. The
seaman
who cannot rig his ship with sticks and ropes and
blocks enough, might as well stay ashore, Mr. Dodge, and
publish an hebdomadal. And so, my dear young lady, by
looking along the land, the day after to-morrow, in the
northern board here, you may expect to see a raft booming
down upon you that will cheer your heart, and once more
raise the hope of a Christmas dinner in New York, in all
lovers of good fare.
END OF VOL. I